      "identifier" : [
         "8_06911_512"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "HAT PHANTOM, THE UN-HIRED GIRL H E .XXL No. 16 C ANADJ A N September 16th, 1916",
         "TIIE COURIER. Cars for So Lit Yo an' beat or even eciual these c anywhere naar such prices. Order one to-day and enrich your i the lives of. every member of yoiir with the freedomx and wider activit3 possible by such a car. Overland dealers evexrywhere..",
         "TH1E COURIERI The Defence of the Automobile By James Grant. \"UMMONED: The Automobile! Be- fore the Bar of Publie Opinion : Ia the Igh Court of Econoniy! Ithe Domninion of Canada! In the ,!rd year of our great war! To an- v'er the inddttmont laid against il, to it-that the eaîd automobile is and ',1 been a menace to the economical tentions of tbousands, of people wbo Ou]d otberwise have spent theïr OfleY on sometbing else; that the iii automobile, hereinatter ca lled the ~fendant, did, bas done and continues do wrong by invdting men and wo- en1 to Wear out tire', instead of sboe- itbeQ' and gasolene instead o! time. TIV therefore, Pris4oner ai the Bar, 11 do you p]ead: guilty or not guilty \u003e,0 belli you?\" AnI tbe voîce of the automobile leýS1nan, ris-ing in Ibe busb'led air of e' 50 i -tsPeak cou-rt-roorn responds: rot guilty, your 1Jlonour!\" l'be automobile sa lesman is usuaïly SOrt of lawyer-gene-wrong. Tbat is sa-'y, he bas many of the qualities the real mnan of law. In defending alutomobile against those wbe .say tmbl..are *wrong\" in tbese days 8Uffering and loss, bc bas no rival 'ong lirofessLona] idv-oeatt-s in tbre tarlaw-courts. le makes for tbe tInoibile--and especilally for lbe tOiflobile In whicb bie isý. interested seemingly unanswerab]c cage. \",V , Lccessful is bis argument is ýwn by the' factithat' ail the auto- 'hiite roQYpauies ln Canad-a are alike r'elorting greater sales for the 'O1b cf August, 1916, tban in any '1viO)us August since tbe automobile ýLIne a reality. Thousands upon Usdsof cars bave beenâ sold in tloininion in tbe 'last eigbteen rItbý and tbe sales instead o! f ail- Off aýre increasing. 'l'il tell you wby the automobile ilnn11es to be sold in the face of war ,ditiOias,, saîd ibe general sales t oge 0 a famous tompany. \"It becý,ause the automnobile, if bougbt Sdu(, reflecëtiion, and witb full \"'ldge of ail the different points' ýt'01aobi.l esp and constru4ction, oIl a bond-on--wbeels, or a stock-on- ý'W-Tany other sort of glt- eil sIecurly \u003con wheels) that yen e to mention. ,The automobile is; 'nvesltment. The Sales OUT conr- Ybaebeen mraking in Canada are at ]î unlike the sales of munici- 411ads or mortgage debentures -be- inarie\u003eted by your 'bond and de- t'Ire brokers.' The bond or deben- ý Yï(eld, intlerest teI~ owner. S tý be aýutomobile. 'f il doeýsn'i il, nl ever bave be-en sold to that ~ldw tb'tIora1nt conde-scen- f~roe t me, wesaid indulgpeaiv ~~Pari affordi an antorpubile, The '1en'ý froIn wbaiït you s1 seist ta\"t àany man at ail can procfit by ~lO5ibe!\"retort.e4 tbesae \"Not everybody can afford Sbonds or- debentuires. A mian Can breî neýet bis current: ex- donesn'itt buy oe(ýan-gojing yacbts, nue Amn wbo cannot afford to 1l fIndaý in an automnobile does not \"Ille8 buy a five tbous4and car. Butl, 'te Ille 4pare fuindse, we miotor ryeIY th1e motor is an investmont, a I'iaurY. Often il is a botter in- t'el tbhan the -ane a.mount of ni)~ ini a five or SIX per cent. rI'8umXent. lis, I suppose, that erest 'by lis service?,$ vidend on an aureFmobile- le Oliergy 4aved--and healtb. you, the ma-n Wio 11uys a- big eYlinder ca fr runnlng the citv'snt an 'inveetor.' p - New Prices,-August lst, 1916 The following prîces for Ford cars wifl be- effective on and after August lst, 1916 Chassis * e e e $45000 Runabout. Touring Car Coupelet Town Car . Sedan 0 a a 0 47500 4 9500 69500 78000 89000 f.o.b. ýFord, Ontario These before prices 'are positively guaranteed against any reduction August lst, 11917, but there is no guarantee against an advance in price at any time. Ford 'Motor Company of Canada Limited For, ntario. Assemhbly and Service Branches at St. John,, N.B., Montreal, Que.; Toronto,, Ont.; London, Oir.; Winnipeg, Man. ; 'Saskatüon, SaiJk,; Calgary, Alta.; and Vanjcolvýer, B.Ç., E-qual 63v te«t to the ,ery bes%, 'Muich botter than all the res ~ MASOto your f.eJer-he km.ws. EVERYWH ERE At home, on the street, art the club or in the field they.ail 'eT GOOD TOBACCO\" Trhe tobacco you cut fresh from the plug, 80 as to, get ail the fragrance and aromna. £-HIE R\u003coCî\u003c Gi-tv l^ACCO Co. -iJmtiTEo",
         "THE COURIEI. On. Good Taste Deserv.s Another cf- WHITE LABEL RODUCED specially fi ~ting better din l~u aie.\" It bas a piquancy that is irresistibli SOLD BY ALL GOOD DEALERS AND HOTEIS Brewed and Bottied by DOMINION BREWERY CO., Limite T OR ONTO e-- WIG",
         "T Il E C'OIUJRTEIR. e than a man wbo bougbt a ýk at a top market price - 'arity for instance. The buy- car requiTes the same study uying of an ordinary security. stocks for, say, ready nego- prospect of a rise. They buy )r reliability, steady income n1. So the man wlio does flot tUse hîs car for touring, or who 2licate wife who cannot face d-or, well you know the )f cars and the variety of bu- lirernents. The best motor in- Ls fl ot the one that looks the Lnd shiniest, but the one that ýtS the buyer's need. 0f course llness of the smaîl car is f ar- ilgbt to be famous in this con- Jones finde a small car en- nl to see tbree turnes as inany 's as lie used to be a\u003eble to Street car and foot power. S Jo-neses are trebling their by getting around more Mien le Jones don't want because they eat up foo much or tmp-keep compared to the 7S. On the other hand the ad- of the big car for the man afford it and who wants to take bis friends touring, lui ehat excuse has a man to in- n howadays in a car for mere Purposes ?\" and salesnian smiled. tire, rny dear sir, is as neces- mlan as food. Fresh air, new ~he joy of motion and aclven- 'se things renew a man's rhere is no0 better agent for these things than the motor- dlid.not wait to answer. angerous lisýtening to the de- the motor by skilled counsel. VE AND THE LADIES. 1arle a f ew prove;rbs and wisel '0111 a vairiety of sages and ages '11, relevant Vo the eternal pa.s- the cternel femiai-ne: r You inurry or not you'Il be Ikes time pass and time miakes the love.sîýckitt takes onie in1- 1Ieal another. are like, puzzles; yeu loee lin- en YOu have guessed them. 1 'f onan la more to be feýare\u003cl WI'Sth of man. m.a.n's1 troubles corne frein not Lt hoyre. \u003e Sthe bell of horseis, the puTga- 'en1 and the heaven of wSmen. ý\"noun9 it Is too Doon to nipiaTy; it k; too late. ,rs of love are more powea-ful et bneýt woman is one of wbomn the es ý'I1 lauglis wben §he crn amil IL' she Winl. L.espa.rk. woman's the tInder, the deavll that blows.. OIt f love thn apprentices know ~5theý inarters. n'd a -cougb cannot be con-cealed. fOlk want fto get weJl except 'QOfne'n sud a goose miale a snar- 1lilas a shadow; follow her flee fq-om ber a.nd she fol- riýt ýofu1Ieel aiiways o! a woman; Ixtflarriage between a bllind adeof and dusnb wffe. F'AVOURiTE PLAVS. Otglas of Men\"-Ald. Sam Me- A2n Counter\"l-Every woman. 'AWho Game Back\"-Russla. le\\\"\" ~W.rk Shop\"-The Kaiser. 'l*Volce\"-Teddy Roosevelt. H I1use-~.The card sharp. lt\"-rOrimyAtklns. MalUrried\".Ay* girl. nry Of the People\"-The Ho- 11 ltthe Truth\"l-The pr.sq If you are this week a chance Reader of the Courier and find it \"good atuff\" you may count upon it that it 18 80 regularly. It improves on acquAintance. Your subscription solicited. Circulation Manager The A. B. C. of Fu el Saving Alwayqs Buy Coal1 from The Standard Fuel Co. and so secure quality, quantity and service in your coal orders. The Standard Fuel Co. of Toronto, Limited 28 Kîng Street East TeL Main 4103 THE COMPANY VITU TUE COAL AN~D TUE SERVICE Fast a'nd Frequent Service That is what the Wbolesaler and Retailer wants. WE HAVE IT to Thornhill Queensville Richmond Hill Keswîck Aurora Jackson's Point Newmarket Sutton Schomberg Toronto and a number of smaller places in the County of York. You ouglit to get ail the facts. It will pay you. Write or telephone the Traffic Department. Toronto and York Radial Railway Company Head Office: Toronto Telephones Main 7044 North 4517 \"Express Delivery at Freight Rates.\" The Hall Million Dollfar Motor at ILoeronto Exhibn ition N The latest Briscoe beauty bas talcen Canada b\u003e' The 105-incli Wbecl Base, Floating Type Rear storm. At the Toronto Exhibition. the crowds AxIe, Full Elliptic Springs and deep Upbolstery who thronged the Automobile Section wcre Insure the utmoat case and comfort, wben enthusiastic in their praiac of Benjamin Briscoe's motoriflg. masterpie.ce-the Briscoe 4-24-tbg car with the Bujit on beautiful Uines, with 5 passenger Touring Italf Million Dollar Motor. or 4 passenger Roadster bodies. Splitdorf electria It ia the Car that all Canada bas bpen waitlng for Starting snd Lighting, fulI\u003e' equlpped tlroughout. -a beautiful car-a luxuriously comfortable ca You areintderestedofcoiirse. You wanltcom- -a powerful car-at a price that is w'tbUin ey P.'ete dela ils? Weli4 sezd for a copy 0 f Mr. reach of the man of every-day income. Briscoe s own sto,-y of -The Hall Miion Such a car for 8825 la possible becana. of Mr'. Dollar Molor\". Jts a bgmans's warrative of I Briscoe's success ina perfecting the Haîf Million aci civmn jsiaigpn ue I Dollar Motor-the longest long-stroke of pluck, virîity and rmneq i SMotor i4r the world'......311g' bore to 5W.\" torld p~athsos and get-uworld saccess. stroke-a nmotor that mnade 32 mraies on a Maikrf free. Write to-day/or i. galon of gasoline. 27 The Canadian Briscoe Motor Co. Limited, Brockville, Ont",
         "THE COURIER. Belgians are Starving While Canadians Have Plenty Our Heroie Allies Deserve E More Help tlian We are Giving An accident of geography, andi the fortunes of war, have subjected Belgium to the cold-blooded, calcniated cruelty and attempted starvation of the Germaxi coniquerors-while we in Canada, secure front danger, are makzing money out of the War. I\u003cegitimate thougli our profits are, we surely owe a substantial share of thein to our Allies, who are destitute because they dared stand up for their riglits and defy the enemy. We have given inuch-but barely enougli to help keep \u003c\"\\JjZ the ]3elgiaus alive. More of for help, as their own re - sources are exhausted, anid k~Au every onle of the millions- shouid have somethÎig more than the three slices- of bread and the plut of ___ soup which is ail the Relîef Commission can supply out of present contributions if -you have been helping, do =ore if yott can tili the war is over and Bel- gium is free., If you have not given yet, will you make up for lost timne- with a substantial contribution? _____________________ ]3etter still, will you give, every nonth, enough tfo feed one or more Belgian families, at the rate of $2.50 each per .~~A very daînty piece of lingerie. dcsigned to impart; inonth? beauty and grace you f!od gie, endyoursubcritionweelyD 8\u0026 A Good Shape Brassieres Whatever yucan afodto gie edyu usrpinwelare regarded as the Iast word in luxurîous lingerie. ,nonthly, or in one lump sum. to Local or Provincial Cominittees, or They have the style, beauty and elegartce so essential in these garmnents Send Chqma AUesU45your Caretiere to ehovyou our e rain Payale C flKCIC~[UlCIDOMINION CORSET COMPANY 59 St Peter St., MontreaL 22 am a Diva Corsets $p2.50 Feeds a Belgiaft Faimily One Month. THE 1 INDEPENDENT ORDER 0F FORESTERS t3ot PE NLWRSHCO FURNISHES A COMPLETE SYSTEM OF INSURANCE Crftvrîh. hruhn Folicles lssued by the Society arefor the protection et aedretonpliton à your family, and cannot b. bought, sold, or 'piedged., Benelite are payable to the Beneficlay lu eaue of death, r or te the member lu case of bis3 total dîsabllity, or te the IGE niember on attalning seventy years ot age. I~r Policles lssued from $500 te $5,000. I an NH RA lS8. TOTAL BENEFITS PAID. 49 MILLION DOLLARS. Uses H a dAle ne For 1lurther Information and lterature apply te ___________________________________ FRE J. DARCH, S.S. E C. STEVENSON, S.CR. Temple Buildings, - TORONTO. E e ti e v c Means comfort, convenience, economy, and The home that is completely equipped wit Na~n~ rus A poitme tstrical devices is a happy oe AUl the drudgery of housekeeping is e1imii1i Sometimes w. arc advised by our client that we have been electricity. appoitd bis executor. Sometimes we do net kziow ef the. You ean wash, iron, sew, sweep, cook, keep qnpointmat \"ni the death of the testator who made it. summer and'warm in winter, by meanz of el Either course permits effective servicer-but nlot so, effective aprtsdsge seilyt eiv as f ollow when clients discuss wEtlh us in advauce th apaaubdsge 8pcalstteiv methods of scuring the results they desire in the future di\"sal unneeesary and fatiguing labor. of their property. At our showrooms ail these devices are rel IL your inspection. Competent demonstrato 4120ltQîiQ4IU -tQ 4p1~ if operate and explain them for you. Capital Paid-up, Roserve The Toôronto Electric Light Co., Limiled $1.500,000. $1,500.000. -U AT YOUR SERVICE,. 18-22 KING STRERr.. EAsT. TORONTO.",
         "HE COURIER xSeptemnber 16th, 1916 No. 16 HAT DID THEY BURY THIS TIME? jof the Parliamentary Corner-Stone at Ottawa Suggests a Few Reliés TY-FIVE years ago Queen Victoria placed ,er on a map of Canada f air on top of the BYtown and sai\u0026-so they say-\"Let be the new capital of *united Canada.\" bas always seemed more probable than ,Dicture of the Afghan potentate wIIU asked iat made England so great, and the Emi- nl had a Bible brought in, saying, \"Tbat et of EJngland's greatness.\" to be grawing out of these old-fashioned le ]aying of thecorner-stone of the new buildings in Bytown last week brings a in back. We must nlot forget that thie 'Mn was changed to the Indian word Ot- '1h1ch tume the,' Duke of Connaught was ýrn; that just twenty years later 'when s eider brother, the Prince of Wales, was Empire, he laid the original corner-stone Enfgs that were burned last 'winter. Now 'ars after that event in the old city of Duke of Connaught inys the new stone enCe of a large number of important peo- Duke made a speech. Since he himself eorner-stone of the Empire in this part Ihe bas neyer had so good a chance to \"Y unusuai things when he f elt hiniself to do just the opposite. Corner-stone re neyer unusual. This one may have ePtion. But the Duke, perhaps, reflected agalin would he do sucli a thing in this reMay have remembered that about the ne Out here two other parliamentary cor- weere laid in Canada. Responsibie gov- 'as domniciied in Saskatchewan and AI- OlIt the same time. Xleember Bytown again. Had Sir Wil- ~been present he might have remeru- hob5e of the new Capital very vividly, for Sir R ob er t nl in 1841, the year when a united Canada Borden propos- f'It 0f the English and the French province H. thre H.thheersfaned ý71 as the capital. In that seventy-five for the DuesAHn Rort ogsmd a ýda bas become a big country. Bytown for f h Conuglit slirysaesai .w'a took its place. The saw-mills van- wo lonaug thech Ottawa. The politicians came. That ai- Woe lai theu S deveîopment. Soe nd.Ado hsaoeblwteDk kea customi of burying in corner-stones ing se he prob- a nIaiainntol h Ords which in generations to come ma- n abl Cnda 1as relics of a bygone age. ÈYtowfl was In the compli th Il-Cnd ta i rs )ttawa. Saw-mill Ottawa was obliterated atrtewr *Intary Ottawa. In the fifty-five years metli lrst corner-stone 'was laid on Parliament lita great many things 'have become agoenuhfrot 'le should have pried under the old stone grandfathers is g o o d 'Ofa Prophet he might have seen sealed enough for our grand- r ail time to come most of the lte-a children; the equal fal- hat llsed to dominate this country lu the lc httebgIsia lies. tiens which led to the dis- coverY and settlement 11still more of the prophet's eye, Sir adtepoerubid 5 1Oster might have iooked under tisat lng of this country dled a 18 't swung to place and the silver trowel natural death in the Vic- Ia' it and have seen being buried there Asia arlel ot to cOule many more things that a greater -the -od fRoa îo flIIUg9 into the discard. It takes a polti- In ordbs oin Roa 'Amon to, knoyr what these thng are. Ail we lria i rct ook \"Aa- o\u003e conjecture a few of them. On a. rough niilgbt find buried under that new cor- mc eCndas a' great future Parîjament for a land of \" .Let us put this first then 11-8O epe hefloigies -the lost epic consclous- Cf Pople th foiowln itms: 4,,ness of the Amerîcan is at ,l%diirm party-worshlp; provincialaxa the root of' the unprepared, Qxlebec or Ontario or la any other in- timorous phase of our na- 9the country, narrow sectarlan bige- tional lfe which to-day d te85re on the part'!f any communities puts us In f. diiemmna Epie to lW as littIe as possible of one an- con'sciousness Is the con- Elt ey mnay continue to argue more; lack eoss -hh mae te eSsentiai greatness of Canada as a America a poemIn lathe failIrete bllee tht wen w sa thermid;, It ls the very thing e ltiaton beiv the at whfnthe say t whlch makes the French e\" W atio is l the apd o! th o dsitîcan-. people one anýd al and tha ItIs a te hndso! oliicinseverywhere refer to la idlittle patrIots; the spiritual bilnd-thBitnfo iytsig k Caadins rox rellzng hatconsclousness which fires ýDare more important to a nation teBîe ta t beileve i U lotdwealth; the smug belle! that what bu-6blev i Rl",
         "8 THIE COURIER. THAT PHANTOM, THE UN-HIRED GIR The Experiences of Henry Hatch, as Told by Henry CONSIDEIING al te experienes my wife lia had in two years~ of getting on in the world with other women, 1 arn (lite entitled te sionai refuge ia poetry. In this connectio et the hlred girl, I suddeniy burst out on to her with this ef Wordsworth: \"She was a phantomn of deliglit When first she dawned upon my si~ A iovely apparition sent, To be a moinent's ornament- \"Oh fudge!\" says she, fiinging down th section of the evening paper, our daliy Ili 1\"Weli, isn't it an exact description? El we get one ef those people doesn't she sta 'be.lng an ideai and end with being a nuis Blie, couidn't deny this. \"Hlenry,\" she sald, \"I think Eve must a happy weman.\" \"Why?\" quury I, knowlng very weli answer is. \"Because she neyer liad to have a hireK both repeat, s1multaneausly. \"Yes; but she had a snake.\" \"Really, is tbat any wo\u003erse ?\" This was the language o! exasperated i On al other matters xny wlfe is the soul tien, In politics, religion, fashion and soc! she lm eveniy unruffled. On this hired gi: magoria sbe lias become a pillar e! cloud a fire by nlgbt. Since we entered the domes.tlc zone of our career througli space girl probIeum bas shown woerse symptom cost of livIng or the course ut moral refo other strenuosity. Nuw Chat saldiers ha, bal'! the avalliable girls and ninte-tenths of halt have become mualtionettes, tlie pr become what statesmun call a crisis. chance that ten-elevenths of marrled Peel ada have had experlences along this Ili unexpressed lu ulthur poetry or prose, liberty ot ruvlewing the vis ta of female bas been our vilege to entertain Iîkeý awares; t'he Offagins, Onegins, Gonegins gins who have corne u'pon us lîke hum. into a garden. F IRST came Arethuisa-blaçl-liaired, and taciturx, nationaiity uncertal towards Scotch. The third evening she h in the kitcheu-a man who toid lier qu t hrough the dinlng-room idoor that she to bu living lu that suburb and must bu o Very next evendng Arethusa announc-dI malden aunt in Montrual was very i11 an. go to nurse lier. In an hour's timu com~ the front door: \"Is that trunk ready?\" asked a red-f one-and It was lie. 1 heiped hlm humbly dowa with tbe b to a dray which bu said was net bis, but Vt that drove It was 111, and the old lady i was curtainly in a bad way. \"Shu's got ammonia,' said he. \"04î nurse ber.\" And that was the last of Aretbusa. Our next was a miracle of 100 per cent a Scatch-Canadlan. Hleaven seemed te lis Maggie with ail tbe vîrtues of! good hoc She loved the baby. She kept the suiE betide me If witb breakfast tLmutaibled arrivu'd at 8.05. Maggie neyer scolde-d mi 1 arn thankful, for she. iad a capable tL luaked douiriy. That was- enougli. No. fiung th4ngs on the table. Al' she ever with was tbat uncom'promlsligly scorni thougl I had any business being a mnan 1 couidn't kuup my engagermts. It with the dIiner. And «wil dishes wash' or two, Maege was ready four evenings the long trail Into thie city, neyer once six months et governiiig our bousehold by aa.ytbing s0 superflnum as a maie. mldnlght, sometilues at one and two a.n ba(k alone througb streets that sklrt traclis and xulgh't have harboured foot shu tlmid? We neyer dared suggest ItL bave been a bold bad sandbagger wbu dared to molust Maggie. And 1 s;omne that If I bad been less humble and lad to be mure domlnieering we mîglit have k TRANSCRf BED BY AUGUSTUS BRIDLE taxe occa- witliout lncruasing lier wages or building lier a advanced i n, apropes private staircase or bribing lier with a taxi twlce was at lesa Le evening a week to take lier dowa town. But Maggie liankerud and had once again to be ia a factery, wlieru shu liad a ruai to the goo mnan boss, higlier wages and ail lier evenlngs to do she seeme as she piuased. The iast I huard et lier she had She aftr~ ght; rusigned lier position ln a munitions facetory at liushand b $14.50 a week, nnd was un route in a Pink sIlk-knit tîîng of a cout te the Oid Country te se w'lat the Zeppelins maid, a se e want-ad. looked like. Madam teratliru. Next la uine ef succession came Myra, a dimpie on accomplisi ~vury time the chia of inexpurlunce. As the baby was six whicli she rt off with months oid nov we thouglit a young girl tliat could put any b 5ancu?\" take him. eut perambulatIng, play witli hlm a bit and weary of gîye a little first ald witfi the muais miglit do us and hast have been very weil. Myra vas a sanl bundie o.! incoaceivable the bacby proclivities; a quiet, shy littie favu vho somutimes ot -joy. 1 ,what the over the scullery siak sang sweetly the latest popular, baby wa.s got on good turms with tb. beby, went out e' niglits, evean.ng ey I grl,\" vu came back at unconveatienal heurs, sometimes sat tavourite on the boulevard with a Young man who slie argued kupt a lit was lier very owa brother. neyer pretendud to cook, aests of vas net partial te cleanlng, ketýt lier room lu a state et micu w mpatiunoe. ot disheveimeact and made up for wliat few defects because of tolera- she had by skiitully annexing my 'wife's silk stock- Inliabit. al matters ings, haa'dkercbiefs ani other sinail articles tee With wha ri phantas- aumerous to mention. Wheruby vu decided to cines al by day and separate lier frein the baby and te lut ber go. fon of assistant- duties. I the hiredt I/YRA vas followed by another experimeat. The fine folk t han the M young damosel bail beun a fallure. Wu de- was'debir rIn ex aay cided to try the other extremity la emergency, a She went ~e married weman of experleace. The net result ef advertise-- the other ments and interviews galore vas Rebecca; agu, sixty T oblum bas and upwards, alluged 42; black-haired, thin, anaemice N wwe Ona the off and weird; a màldun lady wbo scorned men as she tautun me lie la Can- aiways bail aind loeked at first as thougli she m1glit thure are Le bitherte bestride the carpet-swuepur, ki-dnap the baiby and longer ai I talte the neyer bu huard of again. Rubecca had maay ail- comparud swhom it ments, the chie! et whicli was nurves. She had a ot those' angeis un- liorrer of struet-cars and transiters, and she made ail yen are and .F'Inne- lier jeurneys on foot. Wliunuver she got back about is CorralE mlng bîrds il o'clock she perslsted lu settling dewn in au ar!n- you ceme chair lu tie parleur te tell my vite ail about lier lier, as y way«ldu expetiunces, net even recogaizlng uiy is asleup diarp-nq!sud existence. got târed a, leaniag And o! course lier tenure vas brief. Rebecca vas Your nan ad a cmi1er an expuriment ln psycliology. Tie expuriment tailed. One da It buily Hovr, she sal! she hate-d te lenve us la the larcli lite-I ýv vas a tool and aay turne vu touai! oursulvus alonu In tne verld Kate, s0 if eut et it. shu would bu glad te retura fer a day or se. She adventur thLn ant oh! has neyer ruturned. She retu d she miust Afier tua days' etra rust in the kitchen doing but dry sa rap at our ewnwork atter the tua weuks et hysturia vlth curuss me Rebucca---came another youing person, Pauline. This te effuct a.cud, burly candidate for a hiappy marriagu liai many qualities frem 'Coi te recommen! lier. She wasý madly fond of tbe baby, wdfe's fa aggage, eut perfectly trustwerthl' la taktng him eut, liked te n dlrty r lue teanstur have hlm la thu kitdhen, and was despernteiy la love fer breal i Mentrual with oe or other oftwIo Young mua, whicli et thera vent the most vas liard te dutermine, Onu vas absent, the Nov w rl's get te otier les,, se. Eac'h came la upon eccasdea from te try a somuvwhere or down from the nonili. Onu got jealous must bu et thu ether. He criticized Pauliau's clethus. That efficleacy, vas quite uikind. Shu dii! the best s'he coul! with Waatud vu endoed the togs shu lad, but neyer sernud te lit upon a lars a mo usuekeeplnig. hnappy ensem-Trble ot boots and bat, and in the nuatter te struet-, sdule. Woe et anythiag between depended largely upon lier own If desfred at 8.00 1 craft with the needie, vbldli vas quite as precarlous -best of e, for whicli ns lier cheice o! colours. Th(, othur saal used te n n ongue. ShA find tanit with the way Pauline wore lier hair, ivhlcl Wu ch she neyer te be sure vas a bit capricieus, but neyer bad ieneugli Hs.vag vlsitud me te cause a loverq' quirrel. munts or anl look, as Pauline vas mai!ly la love. Sh. vas coatrivud brlag lie et affatirs If that way. Lite ýte ler, -in service or eut. vas onu s0 that a vas se aiseo long dream et. valks la the park, geing.a echurcli, We shali ed in a jiffy cireuses~. nickel s.hows and! tairs. Whereby at lait as soon a week for shu swiftly tlrev overbeard beth the jualous levers the first lu al lier and took up with a sudden flame tint had once are te b acrompan1pà burned on a neîgh.bourlag farm and now came down days. ) Promptly at trom the bush country te sue the clty and wanted Yen Wâll a. sie came at once te consumne Paulinu. He had enllsted, but assistaxi ed raiiway liad bouglit himself out, preferring te show is love manage pads. Was et couatry by marrylas 'Pauhline and bringing up a conclude le mould family, if she would lut hlm. She annuuce-d that she a very d would have would marry the Yonng man, and vent \u0026bout sing- famouaiî times thînk ing, \"Neyer Let the Oid Fiag FaIT.\" Sb. did se. And That ever (dared tint vas the iast et Panline lu our househiuld, probahly ept lier evz'1 Nrt came Madam Maypole.» Dy this turne baby ahe lias was 'becemÎng expuriuacud iiu 1 kind and able te adaPt te aaybody. Madain Mayp0i' na years, lad an everPlus ot respect st tua yuars eider than the census 0 long visita of memories extenin, dold days la Halifax and Montreal, d te have spent tvo successive gir v'ari!s got mnrried, happily relleve\u003ed y the latter's death, and vas 110w compromise'betweein a demlestic, ai nier housekuepur, a nurse and a g0v vas a taatalizing uxperlifent. Onue imunts was siaging eh! oeratic dii! la a querulous quaver that w0111 Eut a dent chili! te slee'p. Whea thesu she lad recourse te Loch Rose o! Summer, which shu dingi!oi la vuird portamuantes and littie Yý 3y the time lier rupurtoire was dc tast asluep nd she vas ready for 'f readiug the patent medicine ai!5 newspalper, whidli she paid for bers ter e! tlium on tylu la lier rool ,heum ia the cuphoards. 6lie lad a hicli suemed te take a joy la follcrw she lutt se maay comfortable lit But lier feut gruw weary lawe ,t mnaey sh liai! saved trem pateln yays the iatest cure-ait, esPecially vine-she decided te retire front beileve she ha! n secret desire tO 5 Chan balbiltuallY came te our lieuse, lbus about dresses, functions an! fi ,mach te our regret \"- an uni ert5 le prctbium is up again and it wili ne must have a maid. Munition tactori st ot theai; seldiers have married fev Imnmigrants; dexWes tic serv4u' ,ecessity Ia a land wliure welfleeariX te the jobs tînt wa:nt thern. we ti bureaus, a machine thnt telePhoe5 putting the baby te bei! that a cr ed one mile away at the bureau deva te sue lier before son'.ebgdy ou have first cliolce? By the tinlet the tuluphene rings te sav that the vaiting and lias taken another eln- eu Is still on the waitiag list. y xnisfortunu tlirust a bureau gil t ~as away-In the Persa et Iate I gather trom tie recital et bel, e under our roof, vas the puer eft suif te get hursult aaythîng fer b brund and' tua,'àad whua the 'bu\"~ ut ber wîtli my vite devil tewa' 1 the transfur o! Katu's passageno -k, shu up and told the (VeI, n ce tînt Mrs. Hatcbhlad put lier t0 oomn an! had rufused te givu ber fast but dry brund an! tua. Se rond. e are recoasid8riag thu probluai. nev dodge. WB mnust advertise- alluriag. It must rend about as tollb -a young lady assWsant te n . adY q,ç lîglit. ne vashing nor [ýorig,, utS\u003e; plenty Of the lateat novels 9v e yur avoAlble.at anY tjme; nO tilC cars; two blocks ft rin church ai ver\u003e' littie nomlpan\u003e'; peope st,Y!tl, refereneus, etc. ApPlY EItufl0te ,' steraoon. oose the hoitel Ia ordur taentc ungaged her amid the glailoroug a tua-reoon, vu Propose te sen4d *r eut by night, going clear roun lie neyer can fiud her vay de'WU o put ber te bed Ia the best r0ou il J as she arrives, take lier breakfat't mernlng and say unto lier, Clrs e our guest vitheut a dot et 'vr rour pay vili go on as usial.- gradually do vbatever you. fuel lx ce until Yeu feel lucilned te tax nent et the bouse. By that tn that ve are very nie PelOl,'a ealrable cempanlon and vu shalla is the. preseut plan. How it Wl depends somuvihat upon Cllia l net yetarl vd",
         "THE COURIEn. ýERVISHES RISK DEATH 01 COLO ON A HILLSIDE. two pictures are ta be observed triles of feminine activity in this On the one hand, sportive Cana- les doing what unkind people 'Y were anti-fat exercises, but more likely a modern revival 0f lng mania of the midle ages In ýd field behind Montreal. On the fld, two young women of Ontario Staking a practical and saber in the wellfare of our men on the neC. No doubt these modern ladies also knit, and no doubt tlie couple have been known ta dance flot necessarily in the confiding, Y candid manner indicated in the cture. There can be no question att those in the lower picture are rhere has been much discussion le real cause of the ecstacy in r one.* Our phatographer was ýo determine whether it was a the grass or the prickly quality le On the sales af tender feet, or 'undance of joy. He inclined ta lèr hypothesis. We remaîn neu- leC is remlnded, in perusing the ew, af the gentleman who, seeing in her Iatest decollette gown, Drt akirt, enquired: '\"What are Scd for now, dear? Opera? Or ope ration?7\" Y' )w Watch other war B y SI1D oves be- la the San )nie relatively insignificani li the entry of Roumani ne the war Ibegan would ,ded with sucli gravities es are bardly inaving iu t] 7eatherweight, tbhat counte, 'ch more than a featherwe It nuilitary power. She c IrMY a! three-quarters of ild- She saved herseif the ,hat Dvertaook Bulgaria, Ser Ont Balkan wars. She ha Preparatian sud she avail nOst- lier people are ns eS'Wards of victory are do laities o! defeat. But the lils le o the chie! factor le a large anc. The (ire 11oumnina's deciaration i~ the road is now open for 14 bave becn aseemlbling LU'POse. Secondly, we hav 9 now camplctely surroni except for the aarrow. c \u0026nd, tbirdly, wo may con EtOUManîa's practical avow Allies muet 'wfa and tha -t end. iOtbe too qulck ta assume ýOerelY waiting la order ta ýb~OOýe the winning sîde. ýS aibolit that maay inantbe 1 cie bas eeemed to lbe lie swoxrd, sud tliere bas se Of the actual steel.I fall back into the ecabba ýO laugli at bier timldity anc there bas been no lacko ýen farce was lafluenclug h was playiag a game dir SPart-from beyond ber i nXOnent at the situation, ithat we are graping in th~ teeare not twenty mca ýlI]1iat1c tacts. Nor are w 3151! a century. the military meeting bvlous intention a! th Y and ta compel ho This would rexnove nild extlnguisb Bulg~ flatch le extiagulsee Our Diplomacy N EY CO RY N They wouid be in- Fraciso Agonutstantly isolated, and lu comparison the terme ta ibe off ered them a. At no other would await their uncondi- this event bave tional surrender. But even as now. When if Austria could nlot bo ia- heir equilibrium duced ta sulbmlt, there was and Roumania stili the possibillty that Hun- ight evea as an gary mlgbt cut the painter, an put a fineiy sever lier coanection with a million men Austria, and make for herseif exhaustion and wbatever arrangements miglit 'bia, sud Greece be possible. But Hungary s had a long would nlot (be likely ta do this ed berseif o! It if Rouinania sbould once intervene. Rau- turally warllke, mania would demsnd territorial sdvan- Ébtless as large tages, la other words bier price, and the military power price would bave ta be paid at the cost o! la the situation, Hungary. Se long as. there was any tand most real possibillty that Hungary migbt sue for a separate sthe attendant peace 4t was obviously the part of wlsdam ta avold thei armiez of the creation of a new# creditor wba must eventually on the frontier bo paid ;by Hungary bers elf. Natblng could be botter e the tact that calculated ta drive Hiungary ta desperation tban a nded by enemy new situation that would make ber surreader a! no onnection with avail. Now titis may lbe the explanation o! Rau- sider the moral inania's delay. She may bave been beld back by the al that she be- Allies la thefr desire ta raise no obstacles ta the t lier aid wfll hoped-for retirement o! Hiungary. That the delay bas now came ta an end xnay be dlue, on this tbeory, that Roumanla ta anc of twa causes. Eitber the Allies may bave make sure that decided ta wait no lon~ger, or they may have found lie -«as probaibly somne way ta rewsrd Roumania witbout menace to aga. !Over snd the Interests o! Hungary. One tblng at lest 8eemis on the point of! certain. The Hungarian. people must \u003cbe wondcrlng been more than why tbey are at war. 0f ail the belligerents thcy 3ut it bas been are the most Inoffensive and uaaggressive. Loyalty rd, and whlle it to a palitical psrtnier le good, but It niay bbe carrled ta sneer at ber too far, and there are evidently Hungarian statesmon f evidence that wbo thia¶\u003c that It bas alresdy been carrled too far. ber movements Every nation now at war secs certain definite bene- ected, porbaps- fits that mnust rosuit from. vkotory--except Hlungary. orders. Let us There le no adjacent terrltary that Hungary coyote. but witb a full In point of tfact she coyote nothing. She bas neither ie dark and that ambitions nor projects that coul* d antagonIze any alive wba know one. No ane bas ever suggested any bondfit ta Rlun- e ikely ta know gary fram the wsr except the dublou.8 benoîit etf seeiag Germsny In occupation o! Belglum, and Aus- tria witb mare of those Slav peaples who have at Paris It bas slrcady worked bier rula. Hlungary- weat ta war \u003crom c Allies ta crush, an honauraible sentiment, but It was a sentiment r to eue for a toward ber psrtncr Austria, and flot toward Ger- Germany's chief maay. She may well thinkc that she bas now donc, tria and Turkey bier whole duty, and that sbe eau do nothlag more d la the oçean. for Austria, but perhaps a -good dcai for hersel!. 1111FIE situation is ln the hands of Russia, ani Rus- 1isia is the master of ail devious diplomacies. It looks as though there were a good deal more ln the situation than the mere addition of a new belli- gerent. It is quite within the power of Russia ta reward Roumania by giving up ta bier Besarabis, and sa avoiding a new tbreat to Hungary. It is aise .within, thc power of Russia ta offer sometblng ta Bulgarla that might eall ber out of the fray. She xnlght persuade Roumania ta cede the Dobruja ta Ilulgarla ln return for Besarafbia. wblcb would. be Infinltely more valuabie. Rou'manla filcbed the Dcibruja, or part of it, from Buiaria after the last Balkan war, and Bulgaria would, mucli lke to have It back. Russia cauld well afford ta -give Up Besarabla ln return for an agreement wîth Bulgarla snd the possilbillty of tempting Hungary. Bulgaria may bave been proof agalnst sucb blaadlebments wblle the roseate dream. of a participation ln world conquest still persisted. But a change must have corne over the spirit of that dreamn by this tie. She bas seen lierseif coafronted with an army of aearly a millon men ln the south, and practically denied' the heïlp of ber great allies. And now sho finds that ber wbole northern frontior Is menacod ib~y a new and, pow erful enemy and that Russa has the comnmand of a hlgli road over that frontier. The Kiag of Bulgarla is by no means a fool. Hie le oniy an extraordlnarlly cunnlng mnan, and of the klnd of cunning tbat always over-reaches ltself. liHe led his country ta dIsster durIag the Balkan wars, and no anc knows better than' ho that he can net do tbat twlce, and tbat a second fiasco w111 cost hlmi bis, throne, and prabably hie; lîfe. How fàr dermalay may: ho la practical con- trol id Bulgarla, it la bard ta say, 'but at the rlek of belng tiresame It' may Êbe repeated once more that",
         "THE COURtIER. the probabilitios of Bulgarla joining the Allies were nover se strong as tbey are now. Lt miay easily be eue of that series of speetacular events that will bring the war to a close. Bulgaria may be \".le to strîbo a few shrewd blows bore and thore, but sbe must know well that ber position is absolutoly bope- less, that aho bas not the chance of the proverbial snowball In Hades. The war bas nover been popular among the Bulgarlans, who have not evon yet real- izod that tbey are fighting on the side of the Turks and against tbe Russians. Lt would be a great triumph for Russian diplomacy if she could produco a state df concord Ibetwea Roumania, Bulgaria, Ser- bia, and Montonegro and wel thoma into a Balkan Slav federatien. Lt le almost certain that she bas beon tryiig te do sa. Lt la lIt-oly that sbe bas been holding baek Roumanla ln that hope, and Lt is also liboly that abe now looks to Rouinanian intervention as the -final deinonstrati-on to Bulgaria as well as to Hungary of the hopelessness of their position. Lt is therefore well to bear lu nin.d tbiat thore may be more Ia the prosent situation than tbe addtione of a aew nation and a new arxny, that it may bo another tura of the screw te force both Bulgaria an.d Hungary te ask for torms that would not bo onerous, and that migbt even give to Bulgaria a place ln that Slav union that les always near to the beart of Ruasian diplomnacy. S OME sncb tbeory as this wonld go far to account for the curions situation now lu Greece and the dolay In the Alled advaaee that seomed te bave begun serlously some two weeks aga. The delay may ho caused by unreadiness, wbleb seema unIlely; It may be duo te the expectation et Roumaniax belp and the desiro for a coacerted advaaco; or wo may fiad the reasen Ia an unwillingness te prose Bulgarla too bardi at some critical diploematie moment. But Ia the meâutimo wheu wo hear et Bulgarlan successes, and of the capture by Bulgarlans of varions towns Lt la well te value the news by a glance at the map. The Alled lUne ruas la a 'rough semicirclo from FMorins to Seres, a distance ot about 1$0 miles. The loft wing at Florlua was beld by the Sorbiaus and these wore orderoti te flaîl bacb ear a brIef resiet- ance, and tboy diti se, leavlng Florlua and Banitsa lu Bulgarlan bands. But ail the othor Bulgarlan suc- cesses were net agalnst the Alles at ail, but against the Oreeks, wltb tbeï exception of au eutpost flght at Serez. The Bulgarlans came freni the northoast aad r oved agalaat Kavala, whlcb la te the east ef 'the extremlty of the Aflled right wlng. The Oreok treepa were lnstrneted net te resiat, iaad wore assured. that whatovor territery was occnple.d by the Bulgariaus wonid ie restoreti. None the less the Grffk forces dld resist and se \u003cefled the king, andi It Is ovident that tbey have the support of the peeple l\u003eehind tbem. The situation la stili. cbaotic, but at the moment ef writlng it qeemw as though Greece Wére actually at war witb uh ra The Allied forces proper bave been Iu contact with the Bulgarisans oaly at Doiran at the nertherumost arc et the sexuicirclo, and bore the .A.lles seem te bave bean suecessful. Âssuming that saine sort et negotiatiens wlth Bul- garla are now golng on and that those negetiations will fail, thon it Is evident that the Allies intend te press northward up the Vardar River toward Uskub, witb a view to cutting the international railroad. But Lt is to ho remomlbored that this would have no imnie- diate effect against Austria except a moral one, and that the main objective of the war la the east is now ta crush Austria. At the samo time the cutting of the International railroad would have a profoundly depressing effect la Germany, and the stato of the public mind la quite as important a factor as the victories and dofeats of armies. The greatest pos- sible AMlied triumph would be the poaceful detach- ment of Bulgaria. Lt mi.gbt easily mean the end of the war. T HE Russians bave either been beld recontly or tbey bave been crouching for another spring The probabilities are that they bave been held and that Von Hindenburg's strategy bas been bearing fruit. For the war south of tbe Pripet Marsh is not wholly a matter of bard bittîng. Russia is somew.hat Ia the position of a fightor who tries te overcome his opponent by rushing at hlm with outstretchod arme la the hope to envelop hlm. One of those armes i reprosented by the forces tbat are attacking Kovel. The othor arm is creeping west along tbe foothIlîs of the Carpathians. The Austrian armies are almost witbln the circle of those arms, and Von H-inden- burg's first care must be to extricate them boforo tlioy close. He must not only witbdraw those armles la tbe best shape possible until some- defensible Une can be found, but he must also check the movomonts of the arme themselves, either by direct resistance or by soine counter'threat. Hie seems to be dolng both. On the Stokbod River he Is fiercely ro.sistlng the eueircling advance of the northern arm, but there Is another danger la the south that Brusiloif 10 evideutly dolng bis bost to ward off. Lt Is evident that as the Russian forces are advaneing westward along the Uine of the Carpathians tbey are exposing theaiseives te a damaglng attack from the south and tbrough the Carpathian passes from Hungary. Lt was an attaeb ef this same ldnd, but freai the west instead of the south, that eompelied the Grand Dube te wltbdraw la sncb precipitato haste frein Hungary. Now we do net know what forces the Germans migbt bo able to brlag from Hun.gary la order te out the leagthenlng Russ-lan lino that is creeping westward. But the Russians are evldently aware o! the possi- bilîty of sucb an attempt, and this accounts for tbe desperate ftghting to contral the passes. Lt Is o! no use \u003cor the wrestler te enfold bis opponient If be leaves himieeif open to a paralyzing blo'w on the elbow, The Russlans can net procoed lndefinitely along the Une of the Carpathians without guarding theniselves agalnst an attaeb frein the soutb. But If tbey eau seize the passes and fortif y thora they will thon ho seurs. And this muet be done bofore thelr westward-minfg Carpathian line becoes too lonzg and attonuatoti. And unlees it eau be doue quiebly the Anstrian armiez lu the centre wlll find the new and defeusible lUne for 'wblch they are lac'\u003e. Ing, and pro'bably Lt wlll be lu front of Lemberg, The atm of 'Von Hindenburg bs thon to hold baeb the enclrcllng arins nerth and south. at Kovel and the Garpathians, until their prey shalh have escaped. the present indications are that he 15 succeedîfl doing this. But if he does no more than this Lt be a negative vjctory. Lt will be the avoida-ne one more crushing disaster. But If 'he can breal Russian line along the Carpathians Lt Wil b definite and unquestionaible success, And bere we see the vital bearing of ROUIDO intervention upon the Russian camipaign. Roilfl flot only tbreatens Bulgaria on the south, but threatens also Hungary on the north and west. that threat an imminent one she Is acting as a to the Russian armies forth of the Carpathiafl. is lik.ely effectually to prevent the sending of TE forces northward through the passes. if there sufficient German forces ln Hungary tbeY guard against a Roumanian invasion and stili 0 northward through the Carpathians upon the Ri' flank. But we know that there are no snCeb Ti forces in Hungary nor are there forces e1s3O that can be sent tlbere. Even before the actîl Roumania there was not a single Teuton front where that wa\" flot badly In need of reinorCe5 And now cornes a new army of noarly a million opening up two coipetely new fronts, nearlY hundred miles in length, and exercising a O, bearing upon two of the already existing fr011 Bulgaria and Russia. The possibllties are sn sal as to stagger the Imagination. RD OUMANIAIS plan of campaign. is yet uncO IXThe bulletins speak of an incursion Transylvania, and Lt is to be neted that nearly a authoritative commentators, sncb as Take JO' of Roumania, and Gabriele Hanotaux, of, l'' speak of Transylvania as among the RoUmn prizes of war. It is significant that there 5s10u sucb unainim'ity of statement. Lt looks al1r0s' a warning to Hungary that she is at the ele hour, of ber fate and that she must pay the ROuln bill if it; once reaches the point of presentatiDIL it may be repeated that ~\"efacr of greatest 11 Is the road that has now been openoei for a XL advance into the Balkans. We need no lne pare the forces of France and England now la C' with those et Balgaria. Such calculatiOlE swamped and made of no moment by the 5ý disappoarance of the dam whicb until now ha'~ hback the Russian flood. For many monthO 1 has been massing ber -ien at the northerr Roumania to the east of Czernowitz. SteadY st of munitions have been pouring Into Roumafl Russia, and those streams have beconle verY larger s3ince the opening of Archangel. Lt 15 to resist the conviction that the group of ev8int we have Just witaessed, the declaratioli Of Italy againsit Oermany, the sendlug of It8.10ia to the Balkans, the Intervention of RouIflaiIý the deliberated and foreseen moves lu the great of dlplemnacy, ail of thom direeted toward th Il tion of Austria and each of theai played succe, and wltb cumulative force., But at least D'le seems certain. Bulgaria must maire peace or be extermlnated. Probably she eaui still horsoîf, but sée must be quick. STILL ANOTHER WAR HA.D-HEDED Hindenburg. wathing the d- feat of the flower et the Gemman army on- the Somme, was a significant figure whlch -wiUlo oum largo anti loerIng acroas the film of hlstory. It may net ho paintoti-for Lt ls a figure typlfying defeat. Yet, agaiu, It xnay be painteti by artIsts et nations yet uzrborn, as the centre et a grinl and tragle scone lu the Great Warmueh as wo paint Brutus at PhiliDpi. If we could photograph the braia of a man in action, andi tbrew the pleturo on a screen, we migbt have, iu our phetegraph et the mental precesses ef Hindenurg ou tbo Somme, au actual portrayal cf the tumning point iu the war. For it bs quite possible that, as Hindenburg saw bis Pruasiaus, Bavarlans aud Saxons-and brave Bran- dediburghers-hurlod back by the Irresistle pollua of Franco and the doggod British \"Tommiiies,\" hoe camne, rbght at that time and place, te bis fnal de- cîsion te abandon the war ou the Western front andi seb victry-or defoat-in the East. H IDNBURG is an Eastern front man. He was. a 8peciallat onteMazui'an Laereglon before ho retirEod te bis Hanoverin boer gardon. Hoe was net calboti out of hie retiremeut at the openlus ef the war-tbe Kaiser dld net tblnb ho would neeti hlm. But wben the gallant Russians bumieti au ammy By THE MONOCLE MAN into East Pnussia befere it was dreameti tboy could ho ready te fight at ail, for tbe purposeofe relleving the pressure ou Paris, the Kaiser rememberoti Hia- denburg andi bis \"fad' for Mazurian Labo s.tmatogy, and summoed hlm te tabe coonad La that dis- trict. Thore Hindenburg won bis reuowu. And the remarkbs.bb thing Is that ho bas bept It. Mackensen dld worb during his swwep acreos Galicia and Po- laud wblch shoulti bave eellopsed \"'the lien et the uortb\"l; but It did naît. Agaîn, it was Mackensenl wbe plongbed up plucby Serbia, Hindenburg romain- lug 1dbe on the Dwiua. StilI Hindenburg retaiued bis place as tho German heo ot the war. Andi wboen the Kaiser once more fouat bimsolt ln a tlgbt place, being caught by the sutdoen irruption of Roumanla bunte the figbtIng, ho sont for-net Mackensen-but Hindenburg, andi madie hlm ruler over all bis armies. The sel]ection et von Hindenburg te replace Falken- hayn was a magalficent choico. Hindienburg stands for the importance ef the Eastern front, lie would nover bave attacbed Verdun. Lt la net libely that ho beloves eithor that France eau ho 'wern ont or that Britain eau ho cowed. Ho 'would-lf acting wbolly ou bis owu judgment-tasfO3r the woigbit et the Germau ar-mies te the Est, andi finish the war there PROPH E( -if possible. Everybedy buew this wbe ehosen as GeneralissimO. A aow danger b in the East and the Kaiser sent fer an Ea -just as ho sent fer a Mazurian Labo n'a a danger 1amidst the Mazurlan Labos. But and sîgalficant differenco betweon the twe that the Mazurlan Labo man was given co only the Mazurlan Labo army, while~ the EOJ man was givon commnand o! the entire Gýer 'HIS probably mens that Hindenburg Yý »wolo German army ta meot the ne danger. He probably lntendod te do 50 polnted. But recent events ou the SoInet Meuse will have strengtbened this x'es6 is wby bis tati and stribiug figure, watcbl lied rush toward Combles, meant se ranch thon bave said te hixuself: -Lt le ef ne use net hobti thexu bore. Wo bad botter soul tbey waut until we roaeh a lino we dame dou--say, the lineofe the Meuse--a line cau hold witb a million fewer men. Thoul my releaseti million into the real battlefl war, the East.\" Joffre calenlateti latil! Germaaa bad two millions and a hait 011 i front, and onl e ~million andi a hundre",
         "THlE COURIER. on the Eastern front. Hindenburg will dealt with on change all that. H1e will transfer this war the permanen St. get fromn this Poland under Il1 admit failure on tlie West. Paris, Calais, kan Peninsula xid, will be left untaken and unpunished. Bethmann-1ol Le.-Falkenhayn plan af canipaign will so far any territory written off as a dead loss. But then Betb- [weg had practically written it off already. Sproposais have always begun by promis- AND Germ vacuation of France and Belgium. Lt was A~sbe will e or Belgium or Britain thatý Germany was year, remaifis TRIS WAR, but Russia and the Balkans. year if she as struck at because it was clear that she what diplama 1kg to the heip of Russia. Battie was ac- winter. So lo luctanty-with Britain, althougli the Ger- sbe can prete -w that their navy wouid have to go into to bold them once. These were unfortunate features basis for keep r a.galnst Russia whicb had to bie accepted. If peace neg4 were frankly accepted from the first, and it ils a good b ORNERING the most approved military plan. But t results whicb Germany bas boped to war were a new Russian frontier, a Teuton contrei, domination o! the Bal- ,and practical suzerainty over Turkey. lweg lias neyer proposed to give up necessary to retain ibese results. any will now figlit for tbem. Wbetber begîn lier retirement in the West this to be seen. She will delay it till next uan possibly do sa; for no one knows tic developments may come during the ng as Germany bolds lier present fronts nd to an easy confidence in hier ability indefinitely. This is a goad \"bluffing\" ing bier Allies in line and neutrals tame. otiations sliould by any accident open, \u003eargaining basis. But if Germany must A choose this year between leaving the East perilously weak in trolops, or retiring in the West, she wifl cer- tainly begin bier great, hunziliating but inevitable re- treat In the West. T IIE Western Allies wîll try to make it a rout. But, as the fighting on the Somme bas shown, this will nlot be easy. We shall prabably see an orderiy retirement tromn entrenched position to entrenched position, wlth a maximum of losses infiicted ùpon our brave forces. The final liait may be made at the line af the Meuse. That would be a good line for tbe Germans9 to bold-if they can. Then the big fighting will go on !D the East. We can get into it in three ways-(l) pound so bard in the West that Germany must keep a large number of men there, (2) increase the offensive colormns at Salonika, and (3) join the Italian armies whicb wil] certainly seeU to penetrate to Vienna. JUNK How Red- Cross E, la a rival in tbe field o! the liearded, t-voieed foreigner wlia politeiy enquires deprecatory, persuasdve tones: \"Anythink seil to-day?\" Lt Is the Red Cross. Sa d t1als rivalry that durIng the first f ew weeks P clety's work six hundred members o! the lect-ors' .Aeueciatlon lu Toranto offered the P Society a donation o! '$8,000 if they would v~ Sinvasion«e their domain. )(aies and botties\" men do -net bauit the 1 d scour the city lanes Pureiy for the love s xereise and fresb air. Tliey are liringlngs 3on -what more wasteful -people throw away. mg, sorting, and selling sucli things they P 1. Their llveUlhood seemed endangered. 8 lent example o! tbri!t, so long scarnfully F ctizens bora In this young and prodàgal 0 D.lght lie foloawed ta their owa undoin.g. e! tbe familiar figrure of the mlddle-aged- the sac~k wbo apies at tbe liasemnent door Elouse a bright young: woman breezes in ta .e office e! the proprietar. Tlited black laIn tary's swivel chair she enquires in thej f Canadian accents i-f bie does not vant ta t deed and incidentally make ber happy. Sae lie daes. She is chic, briglit, pretty, andt ]Y be-longs te the saine club as ber father. he expiains she às canvaasing fer donations PaPer, rags, etc., lie is s0 rahleved that It antographed cheque s-be requires tbat be E 'Omises \"*ail the junk the bouse produces tIll t-he end o! the war.\" at bas opened sa many vocatlonal avenues a, bas Ind'iced duinty !emînnlty ta assumei iy thbe raie ou! junicmaa. They are dorang It td Cross. Thls spring, wben t-be Toronito t-bat soclety started a \"vaste conservation\" It t-bey staked out a g'old mine. 'Tof labour, lack o! suffleleat freightr hi.exCesMive ocean rates aad insurance, al shertage a! materil. Prices for vaste It!Y went away up. E)verythiag possible is 9 mllde a-ver. Here are soine practical ex- f hoy wbat va ordiaarily eall vaste ma- Lve ad-vaaced la value sîace t-he heginnlng 'Ir. Rougbiy speaktn,. wol rage bave ia- 300J Par cent., and 2,000 pand o! back- 1evýwsp«er are worth more t-han a ton o! 1rstbbers aad rublier soies aow seil as higli nt-s a Pound, Instead o! 4e. A quarter o! a un~d le Pald for 01(1 fountainiess garden hase YeaX' aga vas worthless. Worn ont mot-ar ,e i-nar tubes are wortb 10c. a pouad. La 'ý1ere 6e. or 7c. Rufbaer bags vit-bout eau- ýr4c. a Pound, lnst-ead of le. Clear cappor * blggest advanee a! any serap metai. Lt iOn 7c. t-o 21c. a,,ponund. Serap Iran le grades. Roughly quoted, lt-s value ls un- atI U5c. pmer cyt. Lt-s Increase shoyws vhen raand ceet 1cM bas jumpad froua %c. t-o \"\"\", and lea. pipe ta 6c. a Pa-uad--t vas 3e. sýrevw tops are worth 5e. or 6,c. a pound 1,ap zinc basadvanced t-va cents. Mixed Of cýaiPets t-bat brouglit only 1/c. a pound e wr na-w seil at %c. t-o %Yc. Sers-p leat-ber frr dl. ta 10c. a Ponnd. Lt bas advanced prt. Newspapers, farmerly 15e. or 20e. per selfer 4,5,. Even -wrapping parper, bags, Ohrscrap papers bring 10c. per cvt. S o c i e1 ie s Beat Out the Rag - Man ly MARY DAWSON SNIDER 4agazînes that u-sed ta sel at %c. a Pound have now oubled in value, and booke or ledgers are the samie rice, or a shaide ibetter. Junk prices fluctuate from ýc. te le. aimost every week. As higli as 4c. a ound bas been paid this year for mixed rags. T'wo ,eeks later the price dropped to 2%,c. Befare the ~r %/c. to 3/4. per Pound was tbeir average price. n bousebold rags, wool Is included wltb cotton and 11k, tbough woal rags, w-lien -grade.d, become \"miii tock\"l and very valuable. Despite prohibition legis- ation, bottles aiso have increased in value fromn 10 rer cent. to 50 per cent. Pickle and liquor botties ell at lc. and beer botties at 2c. apiece. Witb the \u003exception -3 milk and other reglstered kinds every Id battie Je -saleabie. LYHEN the p-atriatic appeai for waste was made, Vféar of Infection barred the donation o! rags brougli the sc'boois, but cbîldren were asked ta bring )otties, boo'ks, magazines, papers, metals, etc., and ute waste bags for paper rags and junk were dis- r.ibuted among bousehoiders willing to help. Torcnto's cbildren have gone beart and seul into ble bus1ness of waste conservation. No store-rooma or cuphoard Iu the bouse escapes their financiaily appra'lsing eye. To tbemc -one bundred.pounds of newspa-pers means ail o! 45e. towarde reileviug somne soldier',s suffering. Tbey regard the jute waste bags as their especial ' prowperty, aird, like parent birds tbey seek ail day long to fl- the gaplng inouths. Deilght- edly tbey halil the diseovery of solelessa sboes or rioley steekings. Trousers, long past ail hope o! patcbhlng, are ta themn a And. They eonfxs.cate tattered awxxings, dilapidated carpets, bits of saoking, dis- rupted sheets an.d tea toweis, ancdent pieces of party froc.ks, pyjamas and pinatfares. Zinc rings, dis- asseiated fram broken gem. jars, are exhumed fromn (iusty boxes. Tbey stake dlaims for rainent eyeiet- hoied by maths, braken knives, dlsjolnted scissars, rai door kndbs, furnace pipes or serap Iron, and are insistent In requisitions for tea iead, auto treada, bicycle'tires, hIner teles, rubfbers, ied-gers, maga- zines, books and ail kinds of aid paper. Neyer have Toronta's atties and ceilars been quite so free from a.cumulated litter. \"Aw, Maw, let me have those for my rag bo.g,\" coax the girls when boxes are being \"!turned out\" in se-arcb of patch or pattern. \"Gee!' We can get as bigli as 8c. a pound for rub- ber. D' y' want this aid garden hase? An' say-can't 1 bave thase w'orn-out ruhibers an' the bot water bottie that ieaks?\" piead the boys. \"Our sehool could seli those for the soldiere,\" childish volees are sure ta admonish if, in any section û! tbe elty salesable rublblali is about ta bie destroyed. Heretofo re you mlglit tell thie average bay fifty times a week not ta thraw hoUlies on the etreet, 'but the forty-nine Uies you weire not watching lie would use thema as dumnb belis, see ha-w far lie couid tose them, or dash t-hem ta t-he pavement just for t-le fun of hearing tbem smash. Now bis ain is ta saivage as many as hae can and motarlst-s -bless the day sebeol bays 1became phianthropists. Iivery sehool bas a voiuateer exipress ageney. It is ru~n by boy paver. The juniors iend their tay waggons an-d t-be big bays baul ta t-b le school parceis of paper and Junk toc lieavy ta be carrled there. At Btated intervale mot-ar trucks shaped and palnted like ambulances, with a red cross blazoned on eîtber side, colleet aecumulated vaste fromn the sehools. They aiso call at private bouses and places of busi- ness tbat bave offered to contribute. After thbe first montb of the waste saving campaign, the tliree motor trucks at the service o! the Society proved irisuffi- dîent. Tliree more trucks were added. Tva o! them are driven by young ladies-volunteer workers. A staring and sarting warebouse was soon re- qulred. This the Toronto Harbour Commission danated. Locateld beside a dock at thbe foot a! York Street, It is central and easy a! acceas. Many weal-tby patrons deliver their own donations. Almast any day yen can see dainty damnseLs jockeying their cars to make more easy the deposit o! 'big bundies they bave carried. Lt is others o! these erstwbule butterfly girls who are canvassing business bouses and securing material !ormerly destroyed or sold for an Ininitesrimai part of its value. A sale o! the llrst month's donations realized $1,619. The wark vas far from fuiiy organized thlen. Lt is expected -tbat at least $25,000 wiii be netted t-bis year. The Red Cross Soc.iety realized that junli colieetlng vas a matter a! bread and butter ta the Junk mian, but Investigation showed tbat 95 par cent. o! the dona- tions they vere recelving would not have been either given or sold ta the dealers. Lt would have been buried In tbe garbage cadi or burnt. Tbey stated tbis ln declining the offer and pointed out ta the Waste Coilectar-s' Association that the -small per- centage a! legitimate business affectad wouid be more than counterlbalanted -by the tremnendous increase Ia prices. Misch o'! t-le volume o! business worked up by the Soclety's valua teers will, aftar the war, continue. But it viii then fiaow t-brougb regular busi- ness chian-nels. Wliat, ta the junkmen no-w seems a liane, wiii eventually prove a blesslng. But-wliat becoînes o! ail t-be waste? W!TH varylng ferma and tireless frejuency, schaoi chidren as.k t-bis question. Teachers t-ell o! lt-s uses and eniarge on lts econom4c value. Qulte unlntentlanaily tliri-!t bas been added ta t-le curri- culum o! Torento's public schoals. Impressions-hie yauth!ul. minds are being stamped with t-be truth tbat hardly anytb.lng is useless. Parts o! aid trunks and sboe uppers not good enaugli for silipers or s-uspender fittIngs become fer- tilirzer. Rotted scrap, leather enriebes the graunid. No use lias yet been found for tbie bard leather o! aid shoe soies. C3ottan rags and linen make the best book paper. Old ledgers, wben reincarnated, are again iedger. paper. Boc-ks are re-made bIta book paper. Sls Is the cheapest rag an t-be market. Coupied vith the worst grades of carpet It finde is way in ta raoflng or felt paper. Wooi rags vary mucb In quality. The best a! themra Iae sucli good 8saoddY that exiperts cannat dlstingulah It from new clatl, Automobile tires t-bat defy repaIr are vorth $2 or $3. They reappear as rubber cas, rublier boots, matting and stair treads. Brok~en glass is ineted and re-made. J!, .by tue conservation of 'waste t-bat would otbeTwlse have been destroyed, the Toronta Red Cross can mrake $25000O lu one year, there must be $25j;00 ta lie saved for soineliady lu t-bat same city every year. Lt is foundl money-found by tbirift. And this is a strange state o! affairs-so tbinks the baffiled ragas- mnan. Doe lie sali bis waggon? No, lie gets aiong wIth less food and lever cigarettes. CITY'S",
         "THE COURIER, OUR ARMIES, GREAT AND SMAL S UCH simutaneous smiLs from so many'distî- guished war people cauglit by a single camera caa have only one ultimate meaning-Victory. Allowing for the evident pose arranged iby the photo- grapher, It is certa in that Jolfre,« on the extreme ieft, wouid not smile so unIess lie were feeling in- dlined that way by recent events on the Western front. Hie 15 too grimaly busy a man for mere pose. President Poincare le always ur'bane and Is par- ticularly so here. Theres a reason. King George does flot aiways smile so cordllIy. He sometirnc,- H-. R. H-. the Duke of Connaught aise siffing at the gardon party given in honlour of hie farewell last woek to Toronto, at Qoverrnment House in that city. King Albert, head cf the Ilttlest armny on the Western front, Introduces hie genou-ale to Kir, a brave, soldierly remnant of a great littie staff whose herolerm has been and atili ls liiPir gallant head of a longj-sufferlng and strkcken people. lias a sad look. luis recent Investigations aiong the Western front have bivean hlm the riglit to smile, as the commander-in-chief of the potentially greatest army on that front. Gen. Foch, riext te hlm, looks 'a trifle grimmer. Next to Joffre, lue is the biggest Prencli general. According to despatches of a cor- respondent la the New York Tribune, he le a most rexnarkable personality. Generai Focl isl only five feet six !nchesý ln height. What first !rnpresses the person -who looks at him' le hie eye. Hie lias a large, wel-shaped head, rather thia iron grey liair, and a broad, higli forehead. 1711s nose le large, bis rnouth w7ide and straighit. His moustache comnes down over the corners of hie m iouth and thien Points straiglit up to his eyes. Fro in aay poit of view hie chia ie massive. l-is eyes, are grey, soet wide apeart, and have that appearance of boring through one, and whule. tliey bore they Iburn, and ail thi smile. Truly, wonderful eyes. At tis \"somewliere In France\" there is \"0 f trappIngs, to warn the Interviewer that neighbounhood of one of the great dire ýighty struggle. .During a Ïbattie General Fochi is to be big rooxn at he.adquarters. li-e stands b those large scale ruaps. with a pencil In 1~ the' telephone recelver at his ear. His la a semi-circle behind hlm. There le pe and the, only inovement îs of the geners the map as he follows tlie'biattle and detail of the district -where the fightiiig .Sir Douglas Haig, at thC xee rigl mandlng figure. lusstuile is a miere t tiiere Is an imimense reserve of stre21gth",
         "THIE COURIIER. )RK FOR WOMEN-REAL AND FANCY IÂL Work for By ESTELL Womenl' is the title of an article ln an Engflsh news- Paper which aroused great indignation, )rk, according to \"Martha,\" is done on 1 Mlunition factories-it is, in short, the )'Ir formerly sacred to the uneducated trk, indeed!\" says the mother of six, .th indignation. \"I like to see 'Martha' se for a while!\" rk\"says the principal o! a university \"Surely education is the chief thing in ~ver have such important positions been ts with a college education!\" ls Most needful, the work of the hands e -work of the head, the work of women. e, Or the labour they are perforining for Inen? Pondering these thoughts we ap- le Women's Building at the Canadian fihibition. Here we wou]d see ail that ls le atctlvities of the Canadian woman and ý\" sphere. ITow different after two years building will be, since knitting bas re- 'OlderY Lnd hospital dressings monopol- le devoted to patch-work and lace. )ur surprise, the long avenue of cases 1,s in former years with bed-spreads o! non crochet, with patch-work quilts o! ttonl-even of cigarette trophies. There rawfl-work doylies, be-ribboned tea cosys, IGw-shams-tbis in war time! Useful Su1ch1 as plain knittinýg were flot in evi- there sýeemed to be no scarcity of band- Iments decorated with roses and bunches We foît that we bad seen those vory year and the year (before last,' and go 1he dlm days 'when, grasping our mýother's tzod at tbem ln admiration. Possibly ln we might have appreciated tbe case of ered cushions, especially one which re- ctPrize; but then nearly every entry Swon a prize! A cupid floating on a Of black satin, bis body solidly ein- 1 haded grey silk, bis face in pink, and lob he carried aloft, in approximately des. Roses figured prominently in this lmres padded into bigh relief that they tlvely leave tbelr imprint on any soft lashly rested upon them. ..Nor was there l'tain spirit-is it patrlotlsma which spends Idering crossod flags on a square o! khakl? )01 cblldren's artistic efforts, showna in 'ne building, cannot be too hlghly coni- It amiateur painting should have rc- 'exhibition. There wero, bowever, solne )les of bandicrafts, lnterestlng bits of \u003eIýted in original designs, and odd pioces vi'ng and inlay. Tbe best collection o! 'ý,as contributed by the Women's Art 5.Ud lncludod a mixture o! everythlng Pun1 to 3ewelry. But there was only one 't suggested even remotoly that the 't war, and that was Lady Eaton's case cOInforts, a tlmely reminder of the accopt- ýo send our boys--mufflers and bouse- cake and jams, socks knlt by band and the latter made by tis Duchess of Con- 101!, wbo bas set the example of devot- f ber time ta war work, for in spite o! SOf fancy-worlk, we believe that there are have, not devoted. mucb o!, tbelr Work. It seems lnvidloui few where ail have done It there bas corne to our keka story of the sympa- ce O a lady who will re- 'tI, and ýpossibly rival ln 11,the beloved PrIncoss âtale of wbat anothor 5afamous namo 'bas rave soldiors oversoas. Milltary Chapter sOldler,' wlves, mothers i'3s, Mlay belong to the a re Of tbe Daugbtors of '1 algary, and tbis bas devouon for their ýýr1nn is bu\u003esy, not one, veYwoek, evon durlng \"eýon, and fivo sewlng eonstantly busy by E M. K ER R the 150 members, wbo, di- vîded into working unita of 12 to 15, have furnisbed over nine thousand articles, paying for ail the materýials. Mucb of the investîgating for the Patriotic Fund of tbat district througb deep snow and over rough roads was done by these courageous women, and the sum of $1,776 was paid out to soldiers' families before the incep- tion of the Patriotic Fund, thereby relieving great distress. S INCE September, 1914, Ibis Cbapter bas raised 0$8,903.50 by means of Military ToMurnaments, Tag Days, Band Concerts, Bridges, Teas and personal dlonations, wbicb bave been applied cbiefly to the Ried Cross Society, Returned Veterans' Home, and Servian Fund. They also furnisbed magazines and papers to the C. E. F. and presented the colours to the 137th Battalion of Calgary. The officers of the Chapter who bave beld office continually since its organization are: Mrs. Ernest Cruikshank, wife of Brigadier-General Cruikshank, ýG. 0. C. of M. D. No. 13, Alberta; lst Vice-Regent, Mrs. Geo. Mac- Donald, wife of Lieut.-Col. MacDonald, 0. C. 12th 0. M. R.; 2nd Vice-Regent, Mrs. A. T. Linton, wif e of Major A T. Linton, 103rd Calgary Rifles; Secre- tary, Miss Ethel Egbert, daugbter of Dr. W. Egbert, Hon. Paymaster, lOSrd Calgary Rifles; Treasurer, Mrs. H. J. Robie, wife o! Major H. J. Hable, 1371b Overseas Battalion, C. E. F., Calgary. Two of the mem'bers are overseas-Mrs. Bell, wl! e o! Colonel Bell, of the 31st Overseas Battalion, and Mrs. Stanley Jones, wife of the late Major Stanley Jones, Princess Pats., but whether at home or abroad every momber of this energetic Chapter is \"doing ber bit\" and setting an example of consecrated industry. Lady Byron IN the earliest daYs of the war a grieat scarcity of matches was evident, and, knowing the dire disaster this would prove to Tommy, Lady Byron lm.mediately procured and sent 10,000 boxes, wltb- \"A match for a inatchless soldier, fromn Lady Byron,\" printed on eacb box. Lady Byron, whose hus- band îs a de- scendent of the great poet. She is one of the most interest- Ing war work- ers in Eng- land, and has carried' out original plans. // Lady Maud Cavendishi, eldest daugh. ter of the Duke and Duches of Devonshire, bringlng a light meal to one~ of her patients at Blakewell Red Cross Hospital. Lady Maud cycles fromn Chatsworth every mornlng, brlnging with her many delcacles, and her kindness la much appre- ciated by the Tommies. 8he wiIl probably accompany ber parents to Canada. Off !cers of the Mill- tary, Chap- ter, I.O.DE., Calgary. M re. H. J. Roble, treasurer (lef t). Mra. Ernest Cru 1k. shanks, reent \u003cleoft). M rs. A. T. Linton, 2nd vice . preai- dent (rlght\u003e. Letters whicb. she received from scores of the lucky regiment, from the Colonel to the newest Tommy, in eager thanks, and sometimes even the little empty boxes returned, after having been car- ried through Mons and other heavy encounters, proved what a very happy thouglit this had been. Christmas came, with its cold, penetrating winds, and Lady Byron packed up 1,000 warm, brown woollen sweaters, and forwarded them to the 9th Buifs. \"A warm greeting from Lady Byron,\" on the littie card attacbed to each, must have added a'glow to both beart and body. Plum puddings by the 50s and 10Os found their way to the men in the trenches from. the same, source, and the subtle, never-failing pleasure derived from many a thousand cigarettes came as a message of cheer to the men at the front from. Lady Byron. 0 NE of the largest and most far-reacbing pieces of work bas been the establishiment of a Rest Home for miiitary nurses on furlough. BulIt on the edge of Hampstead Heath, witb its bracing air and its delicious fragrance of things growing, Sisters, exhausted with the terrible strain of war, become rested; ears dulled by the terrible song of artillery (Concluded on page 28.)",
         "THE COURIERI. o ONE 0F THE THINGS to 'be hoped for in this country is the appe'arance of mille and factories on the prairies. Sucli a de- velopment would have certain interesting effeets: By easing the prairies of their dependence on Ontario factories it would tend to reduce the friction between the East and the West; by creating a local industrial interest it would encourage in the West a more nealrly sympathetie and comprehendîng attitude toward tariff matter; by makin-g western cities producers as well as brokers and distributo'rs it would croate large and steady local markets for certain products of western farms; by increasing the number of alternatives from, which the western boy might choose a career it wnould tend to, counteract the spirit of restless migration, a spirit whic~h is useful only up to a certain point. In other wo'rds, it would help the population in each district to \"take root.\" By i¶lcreasing the variety of productive occupations it would not morely reduce the posslibilities of \"crop failures,\" but wou41d ultimately foster the graw'th of the arts, a growth whieh is by no means unrelated to the mundane foundations of an ail-round coni- munity. And hiLs consummation is by no means a dream. Heavy manufac- tories might neyer cross the Red River, but for light industries there is already a list of raw materials. We read that on the chie? rive r in Manitoïba-the Winnipeg-175,000' continuions 24-hour horse-power can bo obtained, and 313,000 horse-power under a proposed river- regulation seheme. Lu Saskatchewan and Alberta the Northi Saskatcfl- ewan River yields 14,700 horse-power at one point. A single installa- tion on the Boîw, in Alberta, yields 15,000 horse-power. The possi- bilities are infinite. In the West, quite as uiucd as in Ontario, a Hydro-BEcotrie policy co.ordin-ated with an immigration policy might, after the war, achieve important rosults. A TER ALL, CHILDREN ARE NOT TOYS for parents. A motto to this effect should be printed on suitable cards and issued by the Goverunent to family doetors to be slipped secretly, at appropriate timies, into the palms -of new possessors of infants. In the o1d world the nations, surrounded by infinite possibilities of war and, hardship, learned to regard their children seriously as the future trus- tees of national aspirations and traditions. In the new world, romote from. enemies, surrounded by casier conditions of living, there has been a tendency to regard children as niore objects of affection. Pretty pogs on which to hang our love, our -pride, and our hopes. The Aiiieri- cans have becomne a race of seotitime ntaiists, \"emotional drarn-drinkers,\" paranoics and mnaterialists partly bocause Amoericans arc bad parent. Lt is net we Vhat condeni them, but their children. We Canadians tend to imitato Amiericans and it 's time we stopped. Lt is good for man wo play with bis children. Lt is bad for his ehildrcn Vo bc played withi too mnuch. The Lord didn't invent theni to make vaudeville for doiting parents, to be exhîbited to the neighbours in showy clothing and prompted, to miake speeches or lis;p songs for tho entertainment of cailers. The cëhildren of the great in Engiand are as carefully s;h.elded as prize colts on a Canadian farma. They live quietly, hididen away fri the living roois where their sire may, if hie must, Ioe his teiper and their dami exercise her skiMl in scanda.l-mongoerýing. They are at leagt givenr haif a ehance Vo preserve their nervous systemis unitil they are fourteen years of age. But under the Amiericani systeni, -Whieh we tend Vo eopy, we produce St. Vitus dancers at fourteen, neuroties at twenty, nleurasthenics at twenty-five ai-d divorcees at thirty. The parent who foregoes the pleasure of constant fondling, and suffers the pain of donying the apple of his or her eye the bauble it thinks it wauts, je the truc lover of the child. Spare the rod and spoil the child is an unnecessary proverb in houses where children are re- garded as moral respon,-ibilities rather than toys. AMER ICANS RAVE JUST ESCAPED being prohibited froin DUy- ing Cariadian salmon amd Canadian halibut. What saved tnem at the last minute is a myvstery. What lay belhind this attempted Washinigton enaetmont was not spite, as miight first have appeared, but anxiety for Anierican flshing interests. The begt halibut waters on the Pacifie Coast are Canada's. Amierican fleshing vessels, being unable to elude our police boate, have been forced to operate out of our ports, gtg their supplies and their erews there and leaving their finny cargoes there to be packed, frozen and shipped througýh Vo Amorican markets. We exported $202,340 worth i. (11 months) 1913-14, and $33\u003e3,129 in the same perid ini 1915-16. Every dollar of Vhis serious inerease i Canadian sales Vo Amenieans was so mucli lost business to Seattle and other Puget Sound ports. The story of Canadian salmon ie even more itere4iing. Though our sales of eanned salmon to Ain- enicans are falling away Vo almost nothing, our exports of doý and fresh salmn have risen in the period just referrod Vo, froil, to $486,406. These figures illumine the attempted action of the Americar T IE SHELF WAS HLCH. The books on it had noVt beer for a long time. The volume plucked down was shaýbby, faded, titie half worn off, dust on the upper edges. 1J had been long negiected. Lt looked heavy, dumb, iifeiess, d( covers almo6t creaked with. age as théy ope-ned. .But their opening was like a flaslh of sunlight on a dripF Three linos ieapt Vo 'the oye and sang into the muner ears: \"And down the long and sulent street The Dawn with silver sandalled foot CrepV like a frightened girl.\" There are not many more beautiful descriptive passages books. Thore were others in that samne dull-looking, shabby Iow-who could have sa\u003eid that book ivas dead? Like a modes opher, its covers had to be opened. S UPPOSE SOMEBODY SAID o a hgh schoo'l boy, \"1Le L'li pay ail the expenses of a univ.ersity course for you. Jump in. Fl'l drive you to, the Registrar's office right\u0026 That boy would have to choose between Arts, Medicine, Science, Law-and so on. Before choosing hoe would have Vo cnareer hoe wished Vo follow. So no'w Lord Robent Cecil and Sir George E. Poster tall \"iworld-wide tariff seheme,\" which the Allies will draw up. is Vo -have her place in iV. fier ropresontatives wili ask and obtî concessions fron hier Allies, and wiil in turu grant reVurn fav But what favours are we to set our hearts on? And what shall we be bound Vo withhold. Our free traders would glac wide our tariff doons Vo, outside manufactuners. Our extreiie tionists wouid keep outail but those things most necessary Vo C indus Vry. One cia-ss of Canada would take advantage of the to geV new markets for our wheat. Another would say: w \"feed \" our wheat Vo 4 groat Canadianpopulation and soîl the of the labour which the wheat has made possible. In other words, what career do we soek for Canada? A vt raw materiais only? An agricuiturist only? Or an industrial And if industrial-a1ong what special linos? We are like the lad. We must get into our heads corne sort .9 about our future. One can't go a journey without an obje some sort. W E RAVE A BRAND of economnie experts -nowadays W V o be «panticuiarly fond of making prediotions. Wle big crop seems a sure Vhing in any large area of the those wise sociological investigatoýrs proceed Vo tell us exactlY metans of a tremnendlous income £romi the land, the farmens wiill- pyoff their mnortgage indeobted-nesg sud acq-uiire.wealth iii t of capital inive--tment for the future. Whieh, of course, ia the average mian foci optimistic, whieh we ai like Vo do.Ad were a'lways good and human nature aiways logically thrifty e Vake the prognostications of these eomnfortable experts as \u0026'le pabulura of good éheer. Unfortun'Vely, cno-ps are not always good, and humian natul tumes stnikos coute curious parabolie, cunves in eco-nonlies W are. So that the rosy predictione of the expert always nee4 rovision in the light of factseoven in the best.of yearc. h are less bountiful than in boom years the came experts tell1 different stony. When they1 strike a run of poor crops ove large areas they Mt once bogin Vo dilate on the privatins and4 tions that are sure Vo arise. The more flamboyant the expert 11\" Vo be in a boomi year, the more dismai his croakings in a ya poor croýps. q'hat is the poculiarity of. this brand of expert neither a consistent bulýl nor a bear. Hie is an extremist. It very little Vo himi for the sake of argument whether lie drl one extremity or the other. LHe is noV anxious Vo educate 11 more intent on exeiting us, and lie would as lief do it on1V' other. What we are iooking for no~w is a school of eco0n01e who will analyze conditions constructively year by year, p believe tlhat the average individual is noV a mere alarmistbll soute supernatural ageney cýf good or baîd tumes outside the c energies and wisdomn of the community. E D T R A",
         "THE COURIER. s T M U TUA L HE, Midnight 161h, 1916 J- L~~IILiIJI ~i4'1t~ p/i ON-SCTH *1 EEY TP The Drys are driving you out von Bachaus. YVou have lst Russia, France, part of England, snd all the bars between the Roèk- *Ontario was your Canadian headquarters, toc. Mfein Gott! how your bines are shortening. *Speaking from experience, dear Billikins, yeu've lost Rouznania, Itaby lias declared war, Bu2igaria and Turkey are ini a bad little Greece spot is pretty nearby rubbed out. I won 't advise you to take a little of your own 'medicinc. The best thing you ýre as mucli of mii as possible, Pglikins, here 's. to our, last gTeat stamping-grounds To youh Rbinie. To me-tue St. Lawrence. on Mount Royal, September DRAWN BY 3 E. H. MACDONALD TO0A",
         "TUE COURIER. A BOLT H was; very tal andi thin andi black andi lu- tellectuai looklng, with expressionless eyes and an impassive mansier; and in Urne (evorythîng toeJi time ln Santa Dominica, the earthquake was thc only thing that ever really buetIeti us), andi ln Urne vs awoke te the tact that vo had a Prophet ln our uidet. That ha vas an East Intilan vas ranch sooner apparent. When you sec a amoke-coloured gentleman lu a tur- ban andi vague, white underplnning, yeu cannot go far wrong in assura- lng hlm te be a chilti ef the orient. What vs inter realizeti was tbat Ram Zafaryab Chatiderjce, B.A., was the bearor of lis treasuros-its moral anti mystic treasures, that is -andi had fixoti on Santa Pomninica as a radlatlng centre et distribution. Net that vo learneti ail this at once. Ram didn't chase atter us-, bis idea, I suppose, was te let lis chase aftr hlm, and lu the general languor of lite in Southeru Cali- fornia, the prcucess was slow. it bogan by Our meeting him at dusk as he vas being driven in a sha.bby buggy by a Japanese servant; anti etten, ln our crude Occidental way, b\u0026t A- vo woulti honk hlm te one sidie, more as though he were a domestie road hog %n an lmported East Indian proph.et. But soon, et course, we got te sPeculatlng as te vho ho was, andi wbere he came frrnt, andi whatihe was for generally, andi by degrees workeot ourselves Into a milti frenzy of curioslty. It grev freuzler andi freuzier wben it came ont that he wwq living lu the Grierson Place-an Immense anti lonely bouse four miles tram tevu, whlch hati been bulit years beforo anti nover occupieti, the story golug that some mll- Ilouaire bati intendoti It fer bis son vhs lied dieti ef cousumption before he couli ho brought West. This mnay have been a legenti, but at aay rate the Griersen place had neyer been inhabited, anti stooti as solltary on its bill as a tomnb. Hlere on the lover Iloor the Proi\u003ebst vas selid te be installeti, andi tbc description of bis abotie varloti witb the Imagination of the narrator. Berne vould have It a scene of Oriental luxury, a satrap's camp, vith scenteti founitains, priceless muga, and mys- terlous tapestries behinti whlch volces huseet, anti feminine forms rustîsti as yoti obtrudeti your prying nose. Others declaredti hat Ram slept on the bars atones, an ascetie sali, and ate nothlng but a littie belleti horse feeod. I rode Dp thers one day to ses what it 'was lie for xnysel, but ail 1 f ound was a ghostly»i3tillns andi a fr\u003c\u003eahly paintei board with \",Sllence\" on IL. I suppose a gentleman oughtn't te have trieti the doors, whlcb were loeked, or have rLpped ioudly witb bis crop agalnst the windows, or have criei out \"Ha11oo, there,\" ln the tone of a chauffeur backing bis car mute an \u003c\u003e14 la4dy-but al this I d14, and id in\u003c1l vain, as far as rasLnhg a pin- feather of Ram Zafery\u003cb Chadderjee, B. M RBS. MARTINGALE vas mores uccessful, anti I cannot help thInklng that ber reaplen dent motor playeti Its part ln bridgiug the gulf. That Uic Prephet alloeet himself te be tilscovereti by the richest, the aiest fashionable, andi csrtalnly oe of eur meat cliarmlng women spoke weli for hie povers et divination. But lie rdfuseti aIl ber lurs, explain- 10\u003c witli what Mrs. Martingale tormeti \"e beautiful graclounesa\" that a Prophet coulti net be expecteti te call, or lunch, or ho put up at the Country Club. lie vas bere, lio explaineti, ln answer te some faith- fui hearts-unknovli, preclous, Ionging hears-thai hati been attuneti te bis across ths void of hait a world. Mn,. Martingale, who vas always delight- fully Impulsive, anÀd alvays dellghtfully eager te be first in everythlng, wanteti te lcnov what about lier own, andt vas piqusti to find tlhat lit lad playeti ne part ia calla:g the Propliet to Santa Dominlea. \"1Wben lIai meens more te you than that,\" ho lad raid, lndicatlng tas settlag suni la centrasi te the diamentis at ber neck, 1'tIen come baed te me, and as~k agala.\" \"Anid do yen 11410w,\" bubbleti Mme. Martingale, la telling us all about ht ai the club, \"there vas some- FROM By LLOYD OSBORNE Ilustrat mons by E. Fuhr 11What, was h. to de?\" he asksd, \"What was he to do?\" tbilng se hypnotlc andi sirenge about hlmi, se per- suasive andi Irresistible, that If lit hati been My garnet brooch I believe 1 voulti bave throvn It aovn, then andi there, and got my hoart into tuasi.\" -Whlle he voulti have ploketi up the gamneis, anti put tbom lato is veet pocket,\" sali Toma Martingale, who vas a railroati man with fev illusions. \"If an angel descendeti f rom heaven, anti off ereti Tom a nov religion on a. geM platter, he'd reacli for is gun, andtir in l the police alarm,\" observeti Mrs, Martingale, seily. \"Âfter ail, If anybody le. te diecever a nsv religion, why shotùldn't lt be a Hindoe, insteati ot a German scientiet or a Boston profeser? Ilaven't they been contsnsplatlng over there for thon- sanda of years, thinklag thinga eut on the tops et pillars and mouaitain peaks? Is It fair te Ram te condemu him beforo vo have heard bis side ef the case?\" .\"What le his ride ofthîl case?\" I asketi, for Mrs. Martingale, hille full of general information about the Prophet, hati net been spoclally elucidative of bis vieLys. She vrinkleti ber pretty broya as shc imieti te recail thein. \"'Hs's ratIer a oliy sert of Prophet,\" she seiti at Imt, \"ail parable anti purr, anti vit such a sutiten, brlght, chi-pmunky vay of looking at yen ihat yen have to say you ntiretanti vIsa yon don't. iel views? Let me sse! That ve are aIl lvlnd ot sodetin and earthy, andi nesti purifying anti upiifting, anti oaa only attaln lt oes stop at a time like a baby learnling t.\u003e walk. TInt le puttlng It mucli tee plalnly, I lcniw, but ii's aJbout I. Oh, yes, anti a lot more about vegetarlan'tsm, and the subordination of thc vill, andi dMng1 svorytilng ho says, andi wallvlng bare- foot on the grass every morning et tinyn, anti runlng up generally w'ith tas Infinite, vhatcver that ls.\" It sountiet te mie vsry mnch like the usuel prephet' pratilo, anti my interost in Ram rapily declîieti. The vemen, liever, were mueli more pertiacius la plylng Ifrs. Martingale yulh questions, anti It vas ovident fron ihe vay that soemo of them stuelk te the subjeot, tliat the Hlndoo heti beau vise la choos- lng Sauta Domlalca as the scens of hie opemations. lire. HedIey sali 1* vas hlgh trne vs l-ad a spiritual avakening, anti Miss Gi'bbs seemeti te think that wirelss~ ielegrapby shoeot te be a mucl mors complicateti universo than vo led givea It credit for, anti aseo us te explein (if vo coulti-but couldn'i) a truc drcam she had hati o! a drowning unele. Mrs. Wentveorth, e pale, hîgli-breti old lady oac alvays associaiet i vth lace anti smelling balte, telti us hev yen coulti bury East Indians aive for TH E indefinite perlotis, whIch she oould attest by a sine article she hati at home, If s hadn't lost 1 lndicated her Intention of i on the Prophet without dela to bury hlm allve, but te Borne of the first baby stePs '4 new religion. She saiti thIs '11 but flot without- an ufldË serîousness and a sort of fa] fiance. Then Miss Gdbbs de site would go, too, andi the began. A F'T'R thi8 we grew accus to sceing the Pr0-Pl1 sconceti in tourtng cars, an 1roundei by a.oooing band 0 shippers. Ri-s turban and bies b1aclç face madie a startiiflg1 amidst ail those parasols French'bonnets, and the rev, ~ with whicb he was trcated 'f a littie galllng to beholti. But Dominica was too lazy net tolerant; and though there gooti deal of chatter andt1 ment, nothing a.ggressive 'W temptcd. It wa8 indeed theO ef Santa Dominica that YOtI be any klnd of a Cool yon like not be bothereti ly a tyli puiblie opinion; antd perbaps this that had made it such a of wealth and culture. It W\u003c ofE the few\u003c places in A.merca the grocer aind the plutflber unable te »enforce their iron If People wanted te praflce footeti on the grass at daY and weicome the rlsing suti Oriental salutations, theY vve) to do0 it te their hcart's content ln Santa Do' The permission may have -been a trille gru di I won't, say there were not some suggestions Of prophets on rails, but ail endeti, as most things ln Santa Domtiica, la talk 'and touchiflg thJ for the walter. It was a shame about Elinor Wentworth, t Rer old-lacs-Iady mother was too unconide~ social asset for us to miss her very Iuh have our dd4'v4ne Elnur Wen.tworth withdra'wl circulation was qulte annoyin. She wa6 \u003e those exquIsite, blondes who seemt tofa ethereal, for a world wberc People eat mlut0] andi have te jostle and fight. You thought as a flower, which at a brcath could bo extn ferever-as an angel, whose littie foot toucbed the earth, andi whose fleecy wings a-qulver. I am. able to let myself goabu since evsrybody lcnows that the personl e noyer entered Into my admiration. She a sipiti littie person te sit next to, for aîter Y gazeti Into the wonderful blue of ber eyes,su over ber golden hair, andi stiflet a gasP at'3 radiant perfection, there di4dn't seem alt' te continue wlth. She vas as exbausting s lantiscape, and as Imp\u003eossi~ble te tal\u003c t«O, or' that is al-ways bow I found lier. But as dscoration, as a delicate mastenpkece Of faleace, Elinor undtedl vas a joy forer so yeu ean imagine my expration, ail otir e lion, at learuing wo wers never te set eY again, excopt perhaps in a motor 'with ta Hlndoo, Yes, the adh~erents of the new reit docideti te do wlthout us; tbelr telephe erÉ disconuected; invitations to dinner ar through the Dead Letter Office; thirt-1I friands bad ctlmbed te a higlier plane, a-O\u003cbe up the lad-der atter thom. ( 'F course, red MoCal was the har5t 'Janybody. Fred, you know, had benel to Elinor, andi beýlng a specially eartbnd bati not been lucludeti among the elect. l Elinor before lie vas a.vare of what had b4 and nov you coulti bear hlm roar, for bOe wanted somethlng dýoue about It instant1? aI up to me as aperson to do it. 1 deii't kn la, but bores andi nuisances andi people et ance rua te me as natureily as chUidei mother. Fred biad hie lawyers., nst te spo\" more iLaimate frieutis than myseif, YOtIt wa hati to bear the inflîction of bis burstn e a Fred, I ought te explain, vas the olJari",
         "THE COURIIER. 121ta Dominica H1e was a short, tbick-set cbap, vIgorous tawny hair and an energy tbat the tte had been unable to queil; hie was as dis- 11g to our aristocratie tairm as a bumiblebee in a Milto net. The dream of bis life was te make second Los Angeles, while It was the dream of to stay just as we were, and preserve the SY chlarm of -our old Mexican city. H1e was in 'Gai estate business, and would have been in o11, l'ad we allowed hlm to disfigure the beach witb cks, wbich we wouldn't. EILL, there hie was, ini a highly wrougbt-up condition, demand-ing sympathy and assist- What was ho te do? Great Heaven, what lie te do? H1e had comns straight te me as the ýer3on, et cetera-here was Elinor's letter dis- r1\u003c hlm. A letter-! And that with a bouse It and furnisbed, and the date set for the wed- Cruel? Why, it was ln- bie! They bad spirited ,way; she badl been forced rite it under compulsion; id lady had neyer thought ýrOod enough for E»inor, was5 new in calicots with bMak scountirel to break ~ What about breakin Taking Mlm by the scuif Sneck, and- LUOtbed Fred do'wn, gave a cigar, and teid hlm lly tbat hie was a darued Te tar and feather the 'et or make a martyr of h Bme other Ignomieius )II, struck me as mosi. un- Indlrectly It would be .suit to Elinor and ber 'r, and the worse hie lam- 1 the Hindoa the angrier 10re resentful they would Uiter ail, what was ýd Was n\u003c\u003et revenge, out to lie girl back. Ixnpugning d laUy's sanlty or lnbtitu- slescorpus proceedlngs thie auggestions of a luna- told Fred that the rlgbt c)deal wlth a prophet was e IM rope, lots of rope-- ere'Il be a rerw in that Plane before long,\" I an- ed. 'Prophets den't last, 3t MoU0enn ones don't, and r or later there will be a DOnllicatlon, or a missing 114 stud, or somethlng Swit4h the cash box-and Iowii they'll ail cume like Int' a busted airsbip.\" t wIat arn I to do in the- \"e\"groaned Fred. r'et it,\" I replled, in the \"lFred'a' 'ular. \"'That's the basis P111U0sephy, anclent, modem, and to corne- 't Husetie on Yeur owû lew-down plane; exert 111berant talents ln getting 'folks te l\u003euy lots; Srain rne that It wlll ali corne right.\" S8e6Dm righty sure about lt,' sald Fred, \"'IY, \"ÂAnybod-y eau see that you aren't ou- te New ReiigloulevtY He lapsed into gloern, bel, asked, somiewbat at random, whether I 't featiiers would stick te crude petroleuin. 0 easY te get crude petrx\u003eieuim,\" he Baid. eM2E than drivl.ng any sense into your slUy head' 1 exclaimed, eut of ail patience. \".Here 'tlSutlOn of great dellcacy and cornplexity, a pn1 svcr@arnng for tact, and yen propose te ý It like a weunded bull. Wbhen you are snort- 011144 the arena, stuck ail over with littie red rw1th Mr. Matador Ram, B.A., utterlng shouts %4and a delightedl audience Wboeping, then 'YQu'li wish yen had Ilstened to muh!\" on1\u003et like your slangy way of putting thinga,\" l'ed \"I am bad enough cut u~p already w1thout rald a joke of. If you can't belp a feilow, ýY 8, and let It go at that.\") Yuwho won't be helped!\" I crled. \"Now wolnen are always dazzled by renunclation; ýý8te somethlng lu them that we don't have; % 1l1111,treak lu ail of them, an hi'nate love o! ireaudi bare boards and half a sluce o! bread nýf8,If only Yeu can persuade them it's for II.tlial wellare. You neyer hear a prorphet \u0026full dianer pa.ll or pate de foie gras and champagne. H1e lifts bis emaciated haud, and says, 'My daughter, you must sacrifice eve rytbing!' If hie didn't, be'd neyer get the women! Elinor at first will be very happy, up there; the pathos of eternal separation from you will make bier deliclou8ly wretched; then sbe'll begin to get bored and miopy and cross and snapp.ish, and they'1 find ber peeping over the edge, and wondering what you are doiu.g.\" Fred sighed beavily. I realiy feit very sorry for Fred.L It was such a commounplace littie romance, bis and Ellnor's. Rising young real estate man, fiuffy blonde of twenty, generai con\u0026piracy to throw tbem. together, dinners aud dances to beip it along, pro- posai ou mooniight picnic with everyone Iu the secret, modest house with garage on De La Guerra Street, bell oif roses and Episcopalian clergyman, honeymoon aýt Del Monte, steady advance lu acre property and resultant prosperity, two tots and a Japanese nurse- it ail seemed as inevitable as deatb or taxes. And ace waa beamlng from oar te ear; he hugged me like a now it 'was ail knocked higher than a kit.e. II guesa peor Fred was entltied te sigh. «'It's (been a wonderfuî comfort te talk te you about ItV' he said. \"Yes, a wendei-ful cornfort. A fellcvw can't travel far wlthout hope, and I was a-bout ail ontut ofmlue tili yeu gingered me up. My only Idea was te lek the stufflug eut ot the H1indoo, but You have decided me to louve hlm alone and walt. Th-ough I hardly know how I -am geing te do It; waltlug la the worst thin-g I do; it's awful Just sittiug around and waitlug.\" \"You needn't stop werk,\" I observed. \"0f course, you must work. Womk Is the universai punalcea. Nf it wasn~t for work the gutters would be running with blood, and the majorlty o! the human tamlly weuid be lu juil. No, yen go out and boom for ail you're worth; siug your glad song et cuimule and oppemtunity; taik o! the profitable orange and the generous beot, and et agriltural gold mines avait- Ing the tIckie o! the hee. Take the'enchanted East- erner by the ear, sud hoid him tWlht tili yoèu've got bis 'wad. Work, rnybey, work--and beave the rest te Time.\" Fred brIgbtenod vlslbly ut the Idea. While bis fiancee had'tallen umdem the apeil o! oue prephet, bore was he surrenderlng te another! Ells fant, hie a\u003c,qulescene were 1hnmenseIy flattemlug. It put me lute quite a glow about b4in-good, old Fred. He asked me, witli a ualve nov belle! ln my omnipotence, for the probable date of Elunor's disllluslonment. I au#wered two niontbs9, flot carling te shako my posi- tien bo' au\u003e' appearance of bazinss. Woil, wby not? A raft et tbings could bappen in twe moutbs, and lie wouldn't be lkely to blame me if the youflg lady climbed down a Uittie before schedule. But what îf it were the other way around? Weil, lite is %Ii risk, especiali-y for prophets. L ATER on I wished I bad kept my good advice for inyseif, iustead of getting exclted and wastiug it on Fred. Fred ought te have been a curb- stene Socialist, hoebad sucb a talent for invective. Wben the two months bad expired and there was stili no Elinor, ho boomeranged back to me with bleod in bits oye. If I bad been a wicked railroad, side-tracklng a shipment of fresh apricets lu Death Valley, hoe couldn't bave gone for me auy worse. Busyhedy and meddier were the miidest et his expressions. Hadn't I spoiled everything by my damned officlousuess? Wasn't Ram now se securely intrenched, body.guarded, live-wIred and burgiar- belied that personai violence was almost out of tbe question? Aud fiow elso was the rascaily charlatan te be got rld of? Say. _______was 1 prepared te jein a \"mail desperate party w'ith masks and blackJacks? Wbat, cer- tainiy 1 wasn't? Thon I was not ouly a double-dyed jackass, but a coward, tee! ~ M I~ The new religion was belying ail anticipations, and putting other wiseacres than myseif to shame. Its adherents bad doubled, and It seemed te be meeting a leng-felt want. From, wbat one heard it seemed just tbe thing for dyspeptlc people, witb large fixed incomes, who were tired of Idleueas and bridge. Iu a most interestlng talk 1 bad with Miss -Gibbs, the sprightliest of old ma.lds, and an ex-couvert, wbo had breken away te have au ulcorated tooth seen to (not being satis- '\\ fled wltb the new religion's treatment)-in that deligbtful, talk wdth Miss Gibbs 1 was struck b y bier unshaken bellet lu the Prep'het's sincerlty. \"«He's a dear, good man,\" she said, \"and oh, se k.lnd and geutie and salntly that It eught te be true, even If It isn't. H1e says he Is perfect, and rpally, de yeu know, hie la. Ne, I haven't a word te say against the Purpie Brother, as we cal hlm. Lt was that horrible get- ting up at dawn, and the monetony o! the diet, and having nothlug te read, uer auy gossip or nows, that brought bear.\"1 me back. I wasn't good euough, tee earthy, you knew. I mlssed MY home com'forts and the CeuntrY Club and my breakfast ou a tray, and wben It carne te needlng a dentist and being oomed over lustead, I Just quit. Secrets? Oh, they're safe enough lu My keeplugt in net a renegade, onIy a backslider.\"- \"And Elînor?\" I Inuquired. \"Teill me aibout Elluor Wentworth.\" Miss Gibbs' faded eyes fiashed. \"TPhat's whore I f ei out withi the whole crowdw she exclaimed. \"It was a shame te make ber break it off wlth Fired MoCail, and sipoil ber 11f e. Shela simply pining away, poor baby, and moons about like a ghost. But what can ene do? The old lady is such a dernlneering oid thiiig that Elinor bas about as Much chance as a kitten tled up Iu a gunny sackY» \"Too bad, tee ýbad!\" I observedl. \"Tj UST retten,1\" replied Miss Gibbs, wlth spîrIt. J\"There ought te be an age-Ilmit fer New Re- igionios, the sarne as there la fer Minors iu saioons, nebody aliewed 'under t-wenty-five, you know, and arrested If tbey are 'found on the premlses.1\" \"It's a pretty black 1ook-eut for Fred, lsn't il?\" I sald. \"What a man's way et iooklng ut It,\"' she me- turned\u0026 lndignantIy. \"Fred wili still bo Fred when Elinor la Iylng in ber poor lîttie grave; just as boorny and hustllng and get-there, w'hen she'll be a Patch o! dalsies. It's Einor's side of It that's lbe tra«edy.\"1 I accepted the. report w1'th huxnhlty; one bas to admit thae Pre-eluinenoe *f women la sentirnent; la",
         "THE COURIER. comparison man Is a poor, lndla-rubbery article, wlth almost offensive powers of recuperation. We can lavent airships and discover Polos, but in love we have to concedo their three-miliion-yoars-old su- premacy. 1 coaceded it to Miss Gibbs, concedod it handsomeiy, and warmed by bier roturaing considera- tion, 1I bleated a little bieat a'bout my own sad position. l'Yeu see, I'vo been promising Fred It would al bust up,\" 1 said. \"As a person wbo bas outlivod a whole row of prophets, 1 feit ît was a pretty saýfe statoment. But 4t bas put me la an awful bole; Fred holds. me respoasiblo, don't you know; in the Ia- terests of peace and quiotness I beld hlm back from. ,taklg-er-\" sil T will nover bust ia our time,\" lnterrupted Miss IGiIbbs. \"At least, not from. any fault of the Purpie Brother's, If that's what you meaa. I've had hlm under a microscope too long not to know that he's transparentiy sincero, transparently honest, and se good that lt's a perpetual strain to keep up with 11 don't see bow that squares wlth his detainiag Elinor,\"1 1 said. \"Oh, ho's not detaining Elinor,\" Miss Gibbs pro- tested. \"Everybody Is as free as air. You must try and do wbat you think rigbt, that's ail; and hoe won't evon advise you wbat that Is, or puts you off wlth a parabie. Ho says the curse of ail systems bas been authority, reducing people to the lovel of sheep.\"1 \"'But Elino r is plning away for Fred,\" I said. \"Doesn't hoe see it, or doosn't hoe care?\" \"To a person on the Purple Brothor's plano,\" re- turned Miss Gibbs, \"such tblngs are about as impor- tant as the biunimlg of that fiy on the wiadow. No, THE B L CHAPTER VIL.-Contlnued. S INCLAIR, however, it appear- ed, had flot yet finîshod bis examination. 11Wil you pull down the window-curtains ?\" he dlrected. As Connery, reachiag \u0026cross the body, complied, the surgeon took a matchbox from hie pocket, and glancing about at the threo othors as though te select fromn them, the one meat likeiy to be\u003ean effici- ent aid, ho, banded It te Baton. \"WiUl yeu help me, please ?\" \"What is It you want dono ?\" \"Strike a iight and hold it as I direct-thon draw It away slowiy.\"1 Ho llfted the partly ciosod eyelid from one of the eyes of! the uncoasclous man and noddod te Baton, \"H1old the light ln front of the pupil.\"1 Baten obeyed, drawing tbe light slowly away as Sinclair liad directed, and the surgeon droppod the eyelld and exposed the othor pupîl. \"1What's that for?\" Avery now asked. \"I was trylng te dotermlne the serlousaesa of tho inury te tho brain. I was looklng te 5ec whetboer llght could cause the pupil te, centract\" \"Could it?\" Connery asked. ,*No; there was no roaction.\" Avery started te speak, checked hirneî!f-afld thon ho sald: \"lThore could be no reaction, 1 believe, Dr. Sinclair.\" \"#What de you mean T\" \"His optie nerve le destroyed.\" \"Ah! Ho was blind?\" \"YVes, hoe was blind,\" Avery admitted. \"Blnd!\" Sinclair ejaculated. \"Blind, and oper- ated upon wlthln two years by Kuno Garrt!\" Kuno Garrt operated oniy upon the all-rlch and powerfui or upon the complotely powerless and poor; the un- conscieus mnan ln the berth could belong enîy te the tlrot class o! Garrt's clientele. The surgeon'5 gaze again searched the features in the berth; then it shlfted to the mea gathered about hlm ln the alele. \"Who dld you say this -as?\" ho demandod of Avery. \"1 sald is name was Nathan Dorne,\"1 Avery evaded. \"No, no!\"~ Sinclair jerked eut impatiently. \"Isn't this-\" Hoe hesltated, and finlshed la a velue sud- denly lowered: \"Isp.'t this Basil Santoine?\" Avery, If ho still wlshed te do se, found it im- possible te deny, \"flasil Santoîne!\" Connery breathed. Te the conductor alono, among the four mon standing by the berth, the namne seemed ta have corne wlth the sharp shock of a surprise; wlth it had corne an s.dded sense o! responsibllty and horror over what hied happe2led te the passenger who lisd the real nlgger ln the woodpiie Is Mrs. Wentworth, who's one of those grabby oid octopuses that will neyer lot go anythlng tbey like. To lier the New Religion Is simpiy a sort of 'bomb-proof, in wblcb she can keep Elinor away fromn ail the Freds and Toms and Wilies and Harrys, and have her ail to herseif.\" \"lThen you don't tblnk anythlng can bo done?\" \"Nothing at all.\" \"And Elinor's bound to stay in the bomb-proof?\" \"Has to.\" \"And Fred's out in the coid forever?\" \"As far as Elinor is concorned, yes.\" \"And my position as the bligliter of bis lUfe Is to be permanent?\" \"I guess so.\" \"And the Furpie Brotlier's there for keeps?\" \"Indeed, he is.\" \"Would you mind if I uttor a loud yeli of despair?\" No, go ahead!\" I rang the bell instead. They are poisonous things, those baldheads, but what e15e had I to tura to? When ail the world is dark and drear one might be excused, even by a temperance reformer, for ordering two frappe. As I sipped mine I refiected that crude people like Fred McCall are often botter inspired la an emergency than those of the highest culture. Ho badl been for attacking tho problomn with tar and feathers, and the summary use of a rail. Woe's me that I bad dissuaded hlm. The whole dfisaster was my fault; I lied wrockod two young livos; I was a sbadow across that cold boarth on Do La Guorra Street. Yes, I was In the Cala class; unbora generations scowied at me; the air of the Couiltry Club was thick witb them, ail scowiing. They seomed to ask, \"1What are you going to do aibout It?\" and that less for lafor* IND By WILLIAM McHARG AND EDWIN Canadien Serial Rlsbts held by the Canadien Courier. boon confided to his care, which made hlm whiten as hoe once more repoated the namne to hlmiseif and stared down at the man la the berth. Conductor Connery. knew flashl Santoine enly la the way that Santoine was known to great numbers o! othor people-that lo, by name but not by sight. Thoro was, bowever, a reason why the circumotances of Santoine's lifo had romained la the conductor's mmnd wbile hoe fergot or lied. net heeded the same sert of facts ln regard te men who travelled much more often on trans-continental trains.* Thus Con- nery, staring wbltely at the !orm. la the berth, recall- ed fer Instance Saatolnie's age: Santoine was fifty- one. B ASIL SANTOINE at twenty-twe haed been gradu- ated frorn Harvard, though blind. Hlis coanec- tions-the famly was of weii-to-do Southern stock- bis possession o! enough money for hie own support, made It possible for hlm te live ldly If ho wlshed; but Santoine liad not chosen te make b *is bliadness an excuse for doing this. Ho lied disregarded, too, the thought of forelgn travel as bolng uselees for a man who liad ne eyes; suýd ho had at once settlod himieif to bis chesen profession, wbich was law. Ho had not feund It easy to got a start mn tis; lawyers bail shown ne willlngnoss ta take Into their offices a' blind bey ta whorn the surroundings were un- famîliar and te whomn everythlng muet ho road; and hoe hied eucceeded only after great effort la gettlng a place wlth a emnail and unimportant, firm.' Wlthln a short time, well within, twe years, mon liad begun te recognize that ln tile strugglng law firmn there was'a powerful, clear, compelîing mind. Santoine, a youth living la darkness, unable te soe the mon wlth whom ho talked or the documents and books which muet hob read te hlm, was beginntng te put the stamp of lits persoonality on the flrm's affaire. A year later, hie naine appearod with others o! the irin, at twenty-elght, bis was the leadlng naine. Ho had begun te speciailize long beforo that lime, la Cor- poration iaw; ho marrled ehortly afler tbis. At thlrty, the firrn name repreented te those who k11ew its particulars onlly one personallty, the por- sonality of Santoine; and at thlrty-flve--though bis indifference to money was proverbial-be wae many tîmes a mIllionaire. But except among the smail and powerfuî gro,îp of mon whe bad learned te con- suit hlm, Santoine blmself at that time was utterly unknown. There are many such monn l l countries-more, perhaps, ln Arnerica than anywbere else-aiid la ination than to rub it la. Do? Wbat could 1 d What could anyîbody do? It bad ail got away frt uls like a balloon, and we could oniy point at it the sky, and- 1 was thankful I bad to go to New York on bu ness; Fred bad got on my nerves, and besidos 1 'le an occasional glimpse of the roaring old towfl make me properly appreciate Santa Domiflica. like to stand ln the thickest of it, and decl\u0026i!e wouldn't have it if they gave it to me. I 11kG6 see Wall Street swirling, and contrast my iowiY a contented lot with those harassed'bandits of filia-u 1 like to see paper money again and oysters a straphangers and frosted windows and Washl18t Square and niewsboys darting in and out of theatre crowds-ail the lfe that once 1 shared loved and hated, and finally broko a'way fronl. PLUNGE Into it once more; I splutter anid bl Iand strike out; 1 emorge a week iater, tWO WOe later, iaucb refreshied; and hurrying lnto My clOth I cali ioudly for my ticket home. Biessed tiel homo! 1 scau the puachos and find tbom corre tbough dîssenting somewhat from My personal scriptioa thus aiso briefiy noted 'by the paie Y*IJ man that puncbed it;, 1 rua my eye iovingy aIc that two-feet slip of God's continent, and Wonder wbat preciso inch I may go over an embankJ3O!It burn ailvo in my spiintered Pullman. I buY a Po' of chocolate in case of being snowod up; seW a b dred-doilar bull in my undersbirt in case of be: held up; 1 tUp the striped highýbinders that Put into my cab; struggle wltb more hatcbetmefl at station; bid fareweil to the iast Black Rand in cavernous deptbs of the car. Home again, Reaven, to orange trees and blue mountafl5 (Concluded on page 28.) EYES B A L M E R their anonymity they Si' minds without physical IpO ity; they advise only, and se they romain pubieo view, bohind the scelles. Now and thi received publicity and reward by belag selnt Sonate by the powers that move behind the or beiag calied te the Presidont's cabinet. often, the pubiec kaows littie of them until ti and mon are astonishod by the sizo, of the f\u003c or of the seomingly baseless reputations whlic beave. So Santoine-coasuited coatinuallY b concerned ln great projects, immersed daY al\" ln vast affairs, capable of living compiotelY wished-had been, at the age of forty-six, gn nlot famous, pewerful but not pubiicly kno«g that time an evont baed occurred whilh iad the bliad man out uawillingly fromn bis eh$\" This ovent liad ben the murder of the gr0Sa ora financier, Matthew Latroa. There liad be8 ing la this affair whicp haed in any way shý dishonour upon Santolîe. So much as la bis a mind without personality Santoine ever leui lied, fought against Latron; but bis ftght l'a not agalnst the man but against mothods. had comle thon a tîme of uncertalnty and public conscîousness was ln the process of RWý to the knowledgo that strange thîngs, aPPre close te the likeness of what mon cal1 cri\"~ boon being doue uiuler the unassurniflg n2 business. Goverament investigation threatene mon, Latron amoag others; ne preced8e1t 1 been set for what this might mean; 110 On'\u003c foreseo the end. Scaadal-financial Bc breathed more strongly agaînst Latron tliaf 1 agalnst any of the other Western men. l i amongst their biggest; ho had bis eneinie8, impersonaily Santoine milht bave beofl cOOU\" and ho had bis friends, botb lu blgh places; a world figure. Thon, ail of a sudden, theO r been struck, down-kiiled, because of sOn quarrel, mon whlspored, by an obscure an1d t unheard-ef, man. T HE trembiag wires and cables, Whicl nows of Latron's conviction, carriod !liste new5 of Latron's death; and disordor fe1bO'e first public concera bad been, et course, stocks and bonds o! tbe great Latron ProertJ, Latrn'sbtgess hiad seemed oniy further eç by the stanch'ness wlth whlch, the Latron Latron i'ailroads and mines and public uttl firm. even agairist the sbock of their buide Assurod of this, public interest had ohite triai, conviction and sentence o! Latroli's (Contlnued on page 29.) M AN'S",
         "THE SOUIIJER. W ha t W ha t t he World Over New Phases of the World's Thinking Recorded in Current Periodicals The Fool Caterpillar Brusilo ff, the Man Why Ergkrd i.~ Gical EAN RE NRI FABRE, the quaint, kîndly French flaturalist 'bas recently been amusing hiniself by studying the social and other habits of a fld of, caterpillar,' the \"Pine' Processîonary,\" as il. is lied. \"R1e is a rope-dancer ail his fle,\" comments e droil student in an article in the Fortnightiy ýview- \" He walks only on the tigbt-rope, a silken rail Iced In position as hoe advanc-es. The caterpillar 10 chances to l\u003ee at the head of the procession ibbles bis tbread without ceasing and fixes it on 3 patb which bis fickle preferences cause hlm to çO. The tbread is su tiny that the eye, thouglh rned witb a magnifying-giass, suspects il ratbvr In sees it. But a second caterpillar steps on the nder foot-board and doubles it with bis tbread; bhird trebles it; sud ail the others, bowever many ý*e be, add thf' sticky spray from their spinnrer- es, Bo mucb se that, wben the procession has JFCbed by, there remains, as a record of its pass- a narrow whîtc- ribbon wbose dazzling white- ~5shimmers lu the sun. Very mucb more sumptu- thian ours, thrir systemn of road-making consista UlPhoistering witb silk instead of macadamizing. Wbat is the use of ail this iuxury? Couid tbey like other caterpillars, waik about witbout these tly preparations? 1 see two reasons for their de of progression. Lt i8 nîgbt wben the Proces- rlarles saliy forth to browse upon the pine-leaves. ýY leave their nest, situated at the top of a bough, Profound darknless; tbey go down tbe denuded 2 tili tbey corne to the nearest brandi that bas Yet been gnawed, a branch whicb becomes lower degrees as the consumers finish stripping the er atoreys; tbcy ciimb up thia untoucbed branci sPread over the green needies. When tbey have had their auppers and b-g*n te A WISE PRECAUTION. IYOU are barb-wirlng the tlegraph fines?\" In order te stop the passage of the enemny. -Le Rire, Paria. kýee niulil air, the next tbiug la te returu citer o! the bouse. Measured in a straigil distance la net great, hardly an arm's )ut it cannot bc covored tus way on foot. rpilars have te climb dowu fromi eue cross- e next, fromtheneediette twlg, from the lie branci. froma the brauch to the bough; and freim the bougb, by a nu less angular path, they go back home. \"Apart fromn sigbt and smell, what remains te guide them iu returning tu the nest? The ribbon spun on tbe road. The spreading maze of the pine- needies is, especiaily at nigbt, a labyrintb. Tbe Pro- cessionary finds bis way tbrougb it, witbout the pus- sibility of a mistake, by the aid of bis bit o! silk. At the time for going home, eacb easily recuvers bis uwn thread or ue or other o! the neigbbouring tbreads, spread fanlwise by tbe diverging berd; one by one, tbe scattered tribe lino up on the commun ribbon, wbicb started frorn the nest;-and the sated caravan finds its way bacl\u003c to the manor with abso- lute certainty. \"The use of this silk-tapestried roadway is evi- dent from a second point of view. To protect hlm- self agaiust tbe severity ot the winter wbich bie bas to face when working, the Pine Caterpillar weaves himseîf a shelter in wbich hoe speuds bis bad hours, is days of enforced idieness. Alone, witb none but the meagre resources of his sil-glauds, hie wouid find difficulty in protecting bimself on the top of a brancb buffeted by the winds. A substantial dwell- ing, proof against snow, gaies and loy fogs, requires the co-operation of a large number. Out of tbe indi- vidual'a piled-up a toms tie community obtains a spacious and durable establishment. \"The enterprise takes a long tîme to complete. Every evening, wben the weatber permits, the build- ing bas to ho strengthenod and enlarged. Lt is indis- pensable, therefore, that the corporation of workers siould not be dissolvod wiile the stormy season continues and the insects are stili lu the caterpillar stage. But, witbout special arrangements, each nucturnal expodition at grazlug-tlme would be a cause of separation. \"Tie several threads ieft on the road make this easy. Witb that guide, every caterpillar, however far hoe may be, cornes back to bis companlons wlth- out 'ever missing the way. They corne hurrylng frein a host of twigs, fromn here, froin tbere, frorn above, frorn below; and soon the scattered legion reforrns into a group. Tie silk tiread la someting more tian a road-making expedient: it is tbe social bond, the systemi that keeps the members of the comrnunity indissolubly united. \"At the bead of every procession, long or short, goes a first caterpillar, wbom 1 will cail the leader of the marcbi or file. Nothlng, lu fact, distinguishes tbis caterpillar f rom tie otiera: it just depeuda upon the, order in wbici. they happen to line up; and more chance brings birn te the front. Among the Pro- cessionaries every captain is an officer of fortune. Tbe actual leader leads; preseutly ho will be led, if tie fIle siouid break up in consequence o! soe accident and be forrned anew in a different order. \"The processions vary greatly ln length., The fin- est that I ever saw manoeuvring on the grouud rneasure twelve or thirteen yards aud uumbered about tiree hundred caterpîllars,- drawn Up wîth absolute precîsion in a wavy fine. But, if there were only two in a row, the order wouid still be perfect: thesecond touches aud foilows the first. \"By February I have seen processions of ail lengths walkIng about my greenhouse. What tricka can I play upon tbern? I propose to make the caterpil- ars describo a closed circuit after I have deiitro\u003e'ed be ribbons attached to it and lhable to brlug about achange of direction. \"On the abelf witi the layer of .sand In whl he i neats are plantedl stand some blg palm-tubs mess- uring nearly a yard and a baîf lin clrcumfereuce at t he top. Lt provides me witi a circular track al ready-made. 1 have nothing te do but wait for an \u003eceasion propitlous to my plans. \"'On January 3Oth, 1896, a littie beforo twelve D'qlock lu the day, 1 discover a numierous troop t naking ticir way up there sud gradually reaching t lie cornice. Siowly, lu single file, the caterpillars llzgb the grzeat tub, mouint tie iedge and advsuce n rogular procession, vhie otheýrs are constantly c .rrlvlng aud contlnuiug the' serles. I walt for the t trlng to close up, that la to aay, for tie leader, wio, 'j ceeps following the circular mouldlug, to return to lie point from which hoe started. My object la c ,chleved in a quarter of an bour. The closed circuita s reallzed magnlficently ln something very nearly fi approaching a circle. Wlien ail preparations are finisbed, a curluus sigbt awaits us. \"In the uninterrupted circular procession there is nu longer a leader. Eacb caterpîllar la preceded by another on whuse heels hie follows, guided by the siik track, tbe worh- of the whole party; lie again lias a companion close bebind hlm, following hlm. ln A POINTED QUESTION. Neutral. \"But, Veur Highness, how is it that a great genius like You needs s0 many generais?\"l Crown Prince: 111 muet have semneorie te bear the burden cf my errera.\"1 -Punch, Melbourne. the saine urderly ray. And ih's is repeated without variation througbout the lengtli of tbe chalu. None commands, or, rather, none modifies the trail accord- îng te is fancy; ail obey, trusting in the guide who ought normally to lead the marci and wbo bas lu reality been doue away with by my trickery. '¶krom. the first cIrcuit of the edge of the tub, tie rail of silk bas been laid in position and is soon turned Juto a uarrow rlbbon by the procession, wbicb nover cesses drlbbiing its thread as it gees. The rail la simply doubied and bas no branches any- wbere, for my brusb bas destruyed them ail. What wili the caterpillars do on tbis deceptive point? VII1 tbey walk endlessiy round and round until their. streugth gives out? Or will they, after many at- tempts, succeed lu breakingq through their closed circuit, whicb keeps themn on a roui witiout a turu- ing? WRI tiey make Up their minds to awerve te this aide or that, wbicb la th-2 unly metbod o! reaci- Ing the green branci over yonder, quite near, not two f eet off? \"I thougit tiat tbey would aud I waa wrong.\"1 Fabre then describes bow for seven daya, resting ouly at nigits, the caterpîllars marcbed round and round, looking for food. \"If the rosd dues not vary, the spood does. i measure tirce and a lisîf luches a minute as the average distance covered. But thore are more or ess lengtiy haits; the pace alackeus at times, espe- ,ially wben tie temaperature faill. At ton o'clock lu lie evenîng the walk la littie more than a lazy sway- ng efthe body. I foresee an early stop, lu conse- luence of the cold, o! fatigue sud doubtiesa aise ut îunger. \"New for a littie arlthmnetic. For seven tlmes wenty-four hours the catorpiliars have remalnod on hoe rlm o! tie tub. So as te makre an ample slow- tnce for stops due te the wearinoss o! this one or bat aud, above ail, for the rest taken durlng the, ~o Ider hours of the ulgit, we wili deduct one-hal! et hlim ne. Tile aves eigity-four heurs' walklng. ['ho average pace ;s three sud a bal! luches a min- ite. The aggregate distance covered, therefore, l8 ouslderabiy more than a quarter of a mile, whlcb la great walk for these ultIle crawlers. The clrcum- srence of theO tubt, the perluxeter of the track, la Why Erg1crd î: Ciûci",
         "THE COURIIER. exactly four feet five inches, Tberefore the circle covered, always in the same direction and always without resuit, was descrîbed 335 limes. \"Experience and reflection are nlot ia their pro- vince. The ordeal of a five hundred yards' march and tbree te four bundred turns teaches tbem notb- ing; and it takes casual circumstances to bring them back to the nest. TIiey would perisb on their insidi- ous rtbbon if the disorder of the nocturnal encamp- ments and the balts due te fatigue did nlot cast a f ew tbreads outside the circular patb. Some three or four maya along these trails, laid without an objeet, stray a littide way and, tbanks ta their wan- derings, prepare the descent, wbicb is at last ac- compllshed in short strings favoured by chance.\" BRUSILOFF, THE MAN An Inlimate View of the Great Russiani Genetal CHARLES JOIINSTON, writing in tbe Atlantic Montbiy, on '«Brusiloff,\" observes tbat there is notliing hap-bazard or extemporlzed, no aie- ment of mere luck, in wbat General Brusiloif bas accomplisbed; no Lsingle factor of effort or training or science bas been lacking in bis lifeiong prepara- lion, and no0 elemeat of devotion or consecration. Heredity, too, bas played ils part, and early environ- mient bas bad a share in the ripealng of bis geaius. Alexei Aiexelevitcb Brusiloif cornes from the great traditional scbool of Russian military prowess and skIll, the Ca~ucasus, wbare, among mountains far overtopping the Alps, the 'armiles af Russia bave fougbt for generations against tbe valorous savage tribesmen af wbom. tbe Cbierkess, In the nortb, and the Kurds, fartber soutb, are autstandlng types. His fatber, a former General Alexel Brusiloif, won re- nown la the Caucasian wars; ha was servlng wltb tbe Russian armies Ia the Caucasus wben the pres- ent war haro was bora tbere, some sixty years ago. It was natural, tharefore, tbat Alexei Brusiloif and bis two yo 'unger braîbers sbould ail tbree enter the profession of war. it was equally natural tbat, witb their old Cossack blood, tbe two saldier brothars should, wben tbey bad compîeted tbe courses in the~ Russian mililtary sebools, find their way int the Tver Drageons. Ia everything that had to do with borsemansblp, Alexel, Brusiloiff was supreme. Siendar and iight, witb the figure almost of a jockey, be is.ta-day oaa of the best cross-couatry riders la Russia. In the training and management of borses aiso ha excais; as betwaen tbe rougb metbod and tbe gentie, be strongly advocates tbe latter, and bas always enjoflned lb oa- bis regiments. In 1809, the Emperor Alexander I. founded an Officers' Cavalry 8~chooainl Petrograd, aad It became a tradition tbat the mare martial membars of tbe Imperlal House shouid give to this scbool mucb af Ibeir tima and care. The Grand Duka Nicolai Nlcolaievltch the eider put at tbe head of it Colonel Sukhomlinoff. From tbe Tver Drageons came Alexel Brusiloif. Colonel Sukhomlinoff was sa imprassed by bIs quailties tbat ha made Brusilaif bis adjutant. The Grand Duke Nicholas the eider, and two of bis sons, Nicbolai Nlchoiaievitcb the younger and Peter Nlcolalevltch. were frequent visitors at the Cavairy Sohool. Tbus Il bappened that Alexel Brusiloif was in constant association wlth the two men who were Cammander-in-Obief aad Miaister of War la the sumamer of 1914. As a resuit, ha was, at the autset, given command of oae of the tour Russian armies wblch were the first ta maya. As a resuit of his excellent work at the Cavairy School, Alexei Brusiloif was (bafore tbe war) trans- ferred from the Tver Dragoons ta ana of the mounted regîmants of the Imperial Guards, wlth the same rank--a rare and exceptional honour, and ona whicb gave hlm an opportunit'y ta prove bis quallty as a goldier. For la these crack~ regiments o! the Russian army there lu always the llkellhood tbat an atmaspheres of social elegance and easy-going gayety wlll previl over the sterner miiitary virtuas and Alexel Brusiloif immediately found bimself under the pressure of this tendancy. Ha reacted vlgorously, wlth a bumorous rasuit: ha began ta carry out the thaory, wbIch bad long lain la bis immd, that the training for war sbould. be almnosî as rigorous as war lîsaîf; tbat the condition of actual warfare shouid be the goal'of al manoeuvres. ia biis own practice, this took the forai o! long and arduous cross-country gallops, la which ha blmseif al'ways took the lead, seeking rather than avoiding darkness ond rain and foui wealber. But Ibis was not at ail acceptable ta soma of the spolled gentlemen o! the Guard, and protasîs, backed by high social influences-, found their way ta \"the 111gb- est Personages.\" Il is crediblY recorded that, ta sucb a protest, Genaral Brusiloif made answer: \"If Tour Majesty wlll guaranîee that the enemXy wlll only attaclc on fine days, I will countermnand the night- rîdîng!\" But tbe guarantea was not forthcoming, and tbe night-ridiag went.on. During the winter, when Genaral Brusiloff's troops, oflen up ta the shoulders ia snow, wera attacking la the Carpathian passes, one rememberad that wise reply. Alexai Brusiloff rose sbaadily ta, the com. nand of A Rascal he can Tackle! -PFassîng Show. London. bis regimel*t, of a brigade, of a division, and than of an army corps, the Fourteenth, stationed at Lub- lin. Saverai years earliar, ha bad xnarrled a cousin !rom Couriaad; thair son, wbo is aise an Alaxel Brusiiofi and a darlag cavalry officer, bas been decorabed for valour la the preseat war. General Brusiloif, like mosb men of bis class ln Russia, spaaks French admirably. More than bbat, ha lknows France tund the Franch army wall. Gen- eral Brusiioff knows Germany also, bas watched the great Prussian manoeuvres, and bas Iearned ail Ihat can ba learned o! the'miibary science o! the enemy. Generai Brusiloif was a widower wbea ha was made commander of the Fourleenth Corps at Lub- lin. Shortiy afler ha had taken bis new post, ha married the second daughber o! the laIe Madame Jalihovskaya. Genaral Brusiloff's bride was living la Odessa. The first important town on the raiiroad from Lublin te Odessa is Kovai. Thera Generai Brusiioff and bis bride met and wara marriad. Kovel, tharefore, aow cames labo bis biography for the second lime. AI Lublin, by virtue of an international klnsblp, 1 THE GERMAN DANGER IN THE DUTCH INDIES. German Agent: \"L.ook here, l'il give you ail the, money and ail the weapofla yau walt. 80 that you can rîse and overflow your Dutch oppreasors!\" .De Taiegraaf, Amnsterdam. had the good fortune ta ha General Brusilaff's guest, mn the laIe summer of 1911, iess Iban Ibrea years before the war. if 1 ware le saak for a single phrase, te sum Up the impression made by bis parsoaality, il 'would ha, I thmaR, distlnctioll-personal distinction in a blgh degrea. But one mnay associale the idea of distinction wlbh a certain kind o! weakness, of over-refinement. In General Brusiloif, On the ce trary, distinction i0 as the fine edge On a swor blade of higbly tempered steel. Distinction, Wl great personal ebarra, whicb expressed itself at 011\u003c la tbe perfection of bis bospitality, and in a deligb fui gift for leasing, a ceaseless flow of delicate ba ter tbat bubbled up like a spring of crystai wate creating an atmosphere in which anything like g100 or despondancy was unthinkable. Ha was aiways in uniform, wbetber. undresS, c when some function was Ia preparation, the fu parade uniform of a lieulenant-generai. And, on a occasions, tbe perfection of nealness-of grace s.ls as becomes a man wbo is an admirable dancer, well as an admirable borseman. One fait tbat slovanly or slipsbod attitude wouid be impossib for the flnely tempered steel of bis slim, muScubý body. 1 was struck by bis close personal kaoWledl of bis men, and spoke ta hlm o! It. \"Yes, \" he a 'Il know Ibem ail personally. But that is not t point. The point is,, that tbey sbould know me; that not ona of tbem shall besitate an instant, tima of war, in recogaizing bis commander!\" Two litIle incidents remain la one's mind, as pressing bis gentleness and tact. We wenlO 010 of aur waiks tbrough Lublin, ta tbe anciant gbetl ia wbicb pre-Russian Poland had canfiaed ils Jew il lies wltbaut the city gate and, oddly enougb, 01 found the aid Russian church la the same qua.rt( equally axiled by tbe Foies. Tbe Jews there Et affect the aid, costume, a klnd o! long, rather diflý overcoat, a rusty cap with a glazed peak, and S5 wbab rusty bigb boots. And tha odd bhing lB, tb Ibeir boys, even the youngesb af tbem, waar a ii atura copy o! the same costume. One of these l111 chaps, witb sieek hair and dark, keen eyes, seau' the officer's uniform, drew himself up very otraigl cljcked bis beels togetber and salilted. AckuoWieÈ ing the sainte, the general turned to me and $Mlle1 \"Il should like ta bug hlm,\" ha said, \"but tbey wOl' at once make an 'incident' of l\" Another 1111] a scene: on one of the country i'Oa aust oulside Lublin, a 11111e chap, this lime a e Ina l1111e Poie, cama trotting aioag tha road 011 aid nag. The boy's knees were puied up alinas1. bis chia. Generai Brusiloif, standing in the iiiid' o! the road, cried \"Hait!\" as tbougb tbe boy Il ben a squadron o! dragoons. The terrlfied YO'1\u003c star pulled up short. Thea the corps co0IjX15ild stepped ta the sida of the aid horse and lengthen first ana stirrup-laatber and thea the other, and P the boy's feet back mbt the stlrrups. Then, starti hlm, once more on bis way, ha commenîed WbinI cafly: \"Tbey wouid quole that as an instanlce O! t Itussian oppression of the Paies!\" Il 'was, 1»' t way, oaa o! bis griefs Ihat ail bis efforts had '« almost no cordial response f rom the Foies anid lia; Ihey remained icily aioaf, ia spite of bis b Last averbures. S i Vary like General Foch la certain qualitiaÎe i like hlm. aise la Ibis, that ha is deepiy reigions; the bighest seasa a Christian mystio. And, $pealý of tbiags mystical, ha talked oaa day of a .book had been meadling, the story 9! a modern AUticli -a man supremeiy endowed wibb intallactuai PO'% and exarclsing a fascination ovar massas of nid wba, la the name of materiai weli-being, Of t aarbhiy paradise, was seduciag mea's souls fr\u003c evary vestige of spiritual !aith. 'Il believe,\" he5 \"lthat the autbor's idea is a true ane. ThorMl Antichrîst and we shall bave ta fIgbt hlm!\" WHY ENGLAND IS GREAT Havelock Ellh Analyzes the Building Oi Race Cha radter TRE Engish ara not only, as as ofen served, tbe mosî individual of people, land is aise the most individual of natic Havaiock Ellis, la an article on \"The GenluE land,\" la Ihe North Amarican Review. Thi naburai resulî o! the pecullar position of -En a citadaI la the sea. AI the outset, the st] adveaburous aioae mlghb dare ta approach bidding shores of Ibis Island, ta seize and t( A process o! selection was thus exercisei would-be lavaders. Only the men of Vigo: original indlviduahity couid ha Iempîad t0 ardous enterprise across the waves, oniy E could overcoma the rlsks o! Ibis dangerolis E achieve success la Ibeir daring task. When once the lsland was peopied bY race Ils quaibles as a chIadai could bae ulili a tbousand years Ihera bas been no g tuae Invasion o! l9ngland, The various band iag advanturers wbo seized the land, 0on( waided tagether, have been frea te deva] native characterlstics as lndlvldualstiC E (Conîin\\ad on page 23.)",
         "TIIE COUIER. IUSIC AND PLAYS- 1anci Conductors. EN tliree liundred clarionets, )boes and Frenchi lorns began 0 sliudder into a pianissimo Ltorch-iiglited field it sounded dIY like tlie first faint liorus of daWn. Tliat many is a safe es- from tlie .aggregation of 800 neen wlio played in tlie great 2uIar tattoo fareweliug H. R. Duke on tlie occasion of bis 8it to Toronto. Tlie place was 3iidstànd cîrcus of the Canadian ,al Exhiibition. For a few mo- it seemed like a toucli of a new The vast extension of tliat ýlY cheerful body of tone from,' 3od-vinds and tlie Frenchi horns unive'rsal note tliat lost sight Ids and bandsmen, kliaki and -even, the Duke. wlio was lu- elUOusly liuddled clown in the box tlie width of the lawn from olductor. conductor was big Johin Siatter, nlan of tlie 48th Highilanders, lust have got cold creeps fromn wOod-wîncls sucli as lie neyer ýfore. Wben thie full aggregate Inassed bands played to the g Of bundreds of giims the old ire liymn, Abide Witli Mie, the rse of 20,000 people in front P~ the melody. Lt was a solemn ItL irWise--Ieaving out the agree- 'Ural hymns Sung by men's, wo- and boys voîices from behiud naulation of Westminster Abbey, Close of tlie pageant foiiowing ItOO, tlie massed bands perform- las an affair of colossal and lu- noise. No sucli aggregation rumuents was ever before heard lada; in America oniy at the Jubilee at Boston flfty year3 \u0026ell the bands from Camp Bor- mibinecl with. several local bands. n1eembie was overpoweringly In spite of a disastrous rever- \u003e11 and thie fact tbat the, band- .Was not bigli enougli Up to be ýu0uS,' the graduai building up Ulass was a great success. Tliere few seesawings of tempi which ho dld its best te oblîterate. A r Of tlie pieces were not success- therneelves seime of thie mndi- bands were not up) to a higli rd- 'But tlie general effect was Inbly good, and muet bave been ed Only at' tbe expense of some lng and bumming rebearsals at ]Borden. We bave no besitation 'ilenting Bandmaster Siatter 'ItlY, as tlie Duke dlii wlien lie ln summoned to tbe Royal box. ,hl i a veteran of souud band rew military bandmasters in 3111try wear so weli witli tlie an are so popular witli players Sregiment or battalion. HIe what lie wants and gets It; le InttILd by circumstances and Is Sure of bis grouud wben It ls ý1\"ee;s to give good mllitary pro- les, Of late years lie lias net livin1g quite tlie varlety of good 'Wltl bis own band that lie used SsOrae years ago. But he re- a big, steady and encouraging anlong the bandmasters of Can- hl) Would be sorely missed if lie Il abdbcate thie 48tli. * a * 1nMASTER CONWAY, wliose nd DiaYed twice a day at tbe 'bLbition, le a new package of l11 elernents. Conway le tlie ýetraied, popular bandmaster ýe peIrforrned at thie \"Ex.\" HIe à TInore subdued tban Rogan o! )14itTreani Guaiads, wlio some- ýe11dto be nodding a bit. Ho ' 'lot an inch one way or an- fr0Iu hie desk, and if lie were ýlyt0take a walk witli bis Itol the mldst of bis band to UDa Climax, hlf bis players f 1frOni their chairs. ClIiaxes 11111endoes are ail the same to far abis own movements are I f le gets both and every- \u003eleas eedately as a professýor lh5k from hie library elielves. y his5 band is first-rate. Tecliu nicaliy ht is Up to a lighl pitcli. But it fails in inspiration. A certain degree of abandon in a conductor is always effective in open-air work. Conway's Band seemed to be afraid to give thie people thrills-whicli everybody wants on an occasion of tliut kind. * * a O WING to liaving lost a sheet 0f our music (Information) last week we announced tliat Mr. Franki Welsman would be at the Conservatory riglit away, sprained ankie and ail, to look after bis pupils. Tliat is a mis- take. Mr. Welsman will be at lis liome at 2 Waluier Road, Toronto, for that purpose. He is reserving fromn 4 to 5 o'ciock each day for in- terviews. C ONDUJCTOR VON KUNITS, of tlie Toronto Symphony Band, cornes mucli nearer to the Creatore style without a few of Creatore's blandish- mients. Witli a smali band lie gets surprisingly big drarnatic effects, due to bis experi'n\u003c witli sympliony or- chiestras. Some people think lie lias too many extravagant motions. If so, lie errs on the safe, popular side. Lt is as necessary for a popular band- master, even in big music, to exag- gerate as it is for an actor to exag- gerate bis face by means of make-up and lis voice aiso. In his work for two seasons uow witi tlie Symphiony Band Mr. Von Kunits has demonstrat- ed that lie kuows liow to give big, serious music sometliing of tlie pic- turesque \"punchi\" that it needs to make it popular. A lot 0f people neyer NIA1NY times you have seen pictures of artists listening to, their talking machine records, but you neyer saw pictures of great artists sinýging,, in public, ini comparison with their talking machine records. Did you? The artists whose pictures you see on this page are actually singing or playing (at Mr. Edison's invitation) in direct comparison with bis ReCreation of their work by his new invention 277NEW ELDISONî TinSf is a test wldch Edison invited andthe music critics of more than Atohundred of AmericaA principal newepapers, after hearing these tests (exactly as illustrated on this page) freely admitted in th\u0026e columns of their own papers that their trained car were unable to distingmiish an arts'Bvoiceotrinlstrumental performance frontEdiode Re.Creaton ofit The New Edison is not a talking machine. wicterane!inve Creates al forme of mus\"c What wîi yen have lin your home? I you have a talkiiig n3achine? Or will you have the New Edison? THOMAS A. EDISON, INC., Dept.7629 Orange, N. J. think any big thing is good unless ht is deiivered witli sornething of a spec- tacle. To do so may bie sometinies -a serlous concession in a man of sucli thorougli and scliolarly musicianship as Mr. Von Kunits. But after ail lie is tlie \"doctor\" and a very good judge of liow mucli concession lie can afford to make for tlie sake of getting the groundlings a little biglier. Cherniavskys on Tour. T 1IE first American tour of the Brothers Cherniavsky, starting On. the Pacific Coast in October, lias been booked through thie New York offices of Maud Allan, the dancer, whço lias established herseif as an impres- sario by dîrecting lier own tour of tlie entire country this season. Tlie fam- ous trio of Russian musicians-Leo, thie violinist; Jan, the pianîst, and Miscliel, the 'ceilist-ias been appeac- ing on tlie concert stage ever since, Edison Is Thze Only One Who Invites This Comparison No talking machine man- ufacturer claims that his talking machine will re- p roduce an artist's per. formance so perfectly that the reproduction cannot be distinguished front the original. Edison alone makes this dlaim and Edison has proved its truth by hixndreds of public demonstrations. The evidence of this lis to be found ln over two hun- dred different newspapersa Waech Your Local P\"pr înr *0i muun,oiuet of a local nier chant Iloen sd by Mr. Edlou te »Il1 this .w inventIon. Go te ie ete and le- vestigate. Sand te us fer the. brochue, ' music'\u0026 Re.Cre*tlon,\" 8.4 the book1#t, . What The. Critios Say\" , 4é Do you understand these pictures?. - - - - - - - - - - - . . . . . .",
         "THE COURIER. Peaches are the most valued treasure on the pre- serve sheif. S6ugar pure cane sugar very «\"FINE\" granulation is best for ail preserving. 2 and 5-lb Cartons 10 and 20-lb Bags 'rTheAWPu£rposeSugaT\" senl ne a rei ban tra-ma fur a Fa=E book of Proeseving L\"be Atiantie Sugar Refinerles LD\u0026 Power Bidg. noutreal 83 ROYAL VICTORIA COLLEGE MONTREAL. The reeidential College for womnen students of McGILL UNIVERSITY. Courses lead to degree In Arts separate in the main fromn those for men, but under identi- cal conditions; and to degrpes in music. For prospectus and Informa- tion apply to the Warden. Bcome A Regi.mter..d Nureti and recolve pay whil.e learniu ho a *th Imree Hospital of New York City Pouended 15810 Accredite4l lu the New York State Bd»Cation Dt.Orcers a two and ouie-hail yeux course in t.inne for Dumres with allowance anid main- tenne. Arplimnts mrimt bave bad one ycar hIgb aehool instruction or ltm educational eQUIY- aient. For particulars. addres Beth Israel Hospital, 48 Jefferso St, Newn York WHO 18 VOUR FAVORITE MOVIE STAR? xinderstand ail spokeax part«. Read the Snoving lips. A good Lii, Reader under- Stands every word si:oken in, the BILENT DftAMA. -Lip Reading In the Movies,\" just pu'blii.ed, tells ho'w. Con- tains a siFe key for ail IAp Positions and Meuve«eesa e'hieh ena-bles the eye ta \"hlear\" the conversationi an tbe screen. Price 25c. Sdiool of Uip Language. Dept- C._ 24 Kansas City. Mo., Uj. S. AL DIAMONDS \"\" OCREDIT I ZOrm 2% dowp I $1 -2-3 Weekl, IBuy1ag a -Whb -rd Du%1ond Is maving mue10, mot apending IL A wr;te ieuiu'aitee given wit, oaeb diamond. AUl gouda sent Pro- paid for Inspection. Write or cali for catalogue. We seulS diaiondt to any part of caaa JmmOSLS ., 15 T«es MAs. loruisi, Os\u0026 the youxtgest, Miscliel, was five years old--egbteen years aga. Since their organization they have toured nine- teen countrles: Russia, Austria, Ger- many, Hungary, Great Britain, France, ltaly, Africa. India,, Ceylon, Burma, Straits Sett.lements, China, Manila, Australia, Tasmania, New Zealand, Fuji Islands and tbie Hawaiian Islands. * a a Maud Allan Manages Girl Violinist. ISOLDE MENGES, the girl viollnlst, wîll make a tour of the United States and Canada this season un- der the direction of Maud Allan, the dancer. Miss Allan is rapidly coming te the fore as a manager. Besides managiug berseif duming bier second American tour which beglns ln Sep- tember, she wîll direct Miss Menges' tour and, througb the Maud Allan of- lices. will book the tour of the Cherniavg-ky Trio-LeAc, Jan and ~Mischel, the violiniat, pianiat and 'celliat. Isolde Mengea bas been playing lu Landou fer the past two seasons. Rer success was lnetantaileous and lasting. The pecullar fresbness ai bier work and the manner iu whicb she grips bier audience were particularly noticed by tbe critics. She is the daugbteT ai George Meuges, a Span-isb vloliuist and teacher. Rer mother waa aiso a violin teaeher. She was boru lu Brightonai, ngland. Rer fatber was bier Instructor until abe was thirteen, wben she was su!- ftclently advanced ta give lier first concert. Tbeu follo'wed a long period ai study at the lmperial. Conservatory, Petrograd, under Professor Leopaid Auer. Tbat most reticeut o! masters said a! ber: \"She bas without daubt one ai the moat remarkabla talents for the vialin that bas ever came un- der my natice.\" * * a Supers Unappreclated. THE theatre supernumlerary, says Charles Burnham, lu the Theatre, bas been descmibed as \"one wbho plays many parts, anid yet aibtains applause lu noue.\" RIs name la not prlntad iu the pinybilis, and hie le aiways un- known ta bis audience. Even the par- sons -lie la suppasedl ta represeut upan the stage iuvariabiy remalu anauy- mous. Bath as a living and a fe titiaus creature hae Is deulad individu- ality, and bas ta lie cena4dered. collec- tively, massedl 'wth others, sud lu- separable froam bis companion figures. He la nat so much an actor, as part o! the decaratians, the anlmiatedl furnl- ture, one miglit say, ai the stage. Have you ever realized, while seated lu a theatre, watcbing with Intense lu- terest, somes excltlng and absorbing draina, what would happen shouid the \"supers\"~ refuse tai appear? Were any meuiber of! the campauy ta be taken 111 or decline ta act, their part wouid lie qulokly filied with a substitute, but the l\"mab\" o! the stage reiluIres num- bers and careful drllilng, lu fact mnauy boumrs o! preparatIan, and an army a! \"supers\"~ la net a thlng aof tbe moment, The exigieY, of tbe dmamatic situa- tion at times makea the \"super-\" the very backlbane of a melodmama, a vital necesslty in most o~f 'Sbakespeare's piays, and au Important detail in ail plays requlrlug uwnbers on the stage. What would Coriolanis do wlthaut bis t\"armny,\" Camille without ber guests for the \"hball scene,\" or any o! the numemaus wam dramas of the present timle, witbout their \"armies\"? Theme la a record of a manager -wha once endeavoured ta avercorme the need af \"supers\" for a performance of \"'Richard Ill!.,\" by havin~g the figbtlug forces eutlrely represented by a. panae- rmle hast, This Innovation 'was grected with as mucli, If flot mare de- ision than f el ta the lot of the unfor- tunate \"super.\" Tibe oustatu af aug- mentiug the real \"lmoba\" iiltb paintedl anas, stili prevals ln aur theatre3 'wlth more or less effeet. For ?flBfy years supernuinerarlea of the theatrea were the objecta o! al- n'est constant ridicule by the patrons. At many of the so-called \"popular- price\" bouses, the habitues of the gai- leries looked upon the \"supe\" as an' hereditary enemny, and considered it their po\u0026itive duty ta audi-bly instruct, admonish and otherwise criticize clnem, which tbey did ta the enjoyment of the auditors in the lower part of the bouse. When, as often bappened, the \"'supers\" appeared in tigbts, their tor- mentors would liken their lim-bs ta those of the classie beauties of the bur- lesque stage. Such remares as: \"Say! you got Lyd Thompson beat a mile!\" or -Hey! Bill! Put more stuffin' in lem!\" were frequently interpellations ai \"Richard Ili.,\" and ather plays. It was formerly the custem ln theatres whenever a play required more than ana scene in an act for its unfaiding ta use wbat were termed \"front scenes.\"1 Often they wauld represent a iurnisbed room, se that wben it be- came necesaary ta change the seene, a \"*supe\" was sent upan the stage ta carry off tbe furniture. Immediately upan bis appearance, cat-cails, whist- liug and abusive remares regarcling bis personal appearance would greet the u.nfortunate individual irom ail parts af the bouse, wbile the derisive cry af \"'supe\" \"ýsupe!\"I wauld resound thraughiout the theatre. Another a! the duties ai the \"supe\" ln farmer days wa.s ta shake a cloth painted ta repre- .......4 \u002b baSt it would bave te As You Should LxIok - free from facial ble- mishes and with a clear, soft, pealY- wbite appearance filet will be the envy of your frieâIls, Gouraud's Oriental Creami does this for you instantly. Ils effect Îs 50 subtile that its use cannot be detected. Nori,çreasy - 68 years in use- A Soud 1Oe. #«trisiseZ jFe.d. T H.pkins \u0026 Son, Moutreal. Que. BOOK ON 000 DISEASES AND HOW TO FEED Malled TRI1U1 H .CLAY GLOVERYS. tW a adareas tthe anthor lis W. siat Et.. N.Y.. USA PAUL WELLS' Concert, Plantat and Teacher. -Toronto Conservatory of MUSIC- HAIRVEY -R013E effeet of waves, wheuever a play re- p Torontfo G I9o~ Ejuired that scenlo illusion. OthersMuc crawied under the cloth ta assist in DELBERT R. PMETTE stlrring up the painted ocean. At a Specialist Teacher of performance requiring sucb an effeet Modern Pianoforte Piayiflg. given ln Niblo's Garden saime years Studlo: 684 Bathurst Street ago, the heroine of tlie play sut by \"the sad ses, waves,\" and gently purred, RICHARD TATTEB.SAJ. Ilbow caim, how beautiful the bosom. Organist, Old St. AndreW'5 Pre»bYtel of the mighty ocean. But oh, wbat Cburch. perils lurli beneath!\" At that mo- Studio: Canadlan Acaderny of MusicO0S ment a \"super\" chokIng for _want of 347 Brunswick Ave. Poe Coli. 2' air under the dusty clotb, poked bis head tbraugh an openiug and gave vent FRANK S. WELSMAXN ta a sneeze, which s0 upset the Planist. \"b-eroine,\" she was tuiable ta proceed Studio for Lessons ait Toronto conservatory of Music- and the curtain badl ta be lowered. Reaidence:- 30 Admirai Road. ALBERT DOWNING AT $8.50 PER TON. iret Tenor Adam\"c Quartette. Saoioet Bloor St Pres. church Just listen ta the coal man flow, *£tu. Dir. Doveroourt College of Id\"' His bread and butter earuing, Phone Colege 313. ict 27t. Advise us, witb a courteous'bow W. o. FORSYTU To \"lKeep tbe Home Fires Burning.\" ilns and Teacher of the Xigqlr AXt Pis=z Pla.ytug-Colte Trai1ifl f or Concert Room or Teoahlfl- PITY ITS PLIGHT. Addresa: Care Nordhetiners. Toroiri The great traveling public may have A H R O ~umIN grievances greater far than those ofA THiO F R O the railway mnen, but the \"G. T. P.\" A Brilliant Season canuot go on strike. Now Opeiig. 159 College St. Te4lephone CoflOga RUSSIAN MASTER PIANIST AND PEDAGOGUE STUDIO 0F PIANISTIC ART OPEN ENTIRE SUMMER. Er AVAILABLE FOR COCRSRCTL- SCLSFETV S 32 BLOOR ST. W., TORONTO. PHONE NORTH I SONTARIO JOCKEY CLUB TORONTO Autumn Meeting, September 23rd-3Gtb RACING - STEEPLECHASING The Spriug and Autumn Meetings. o! the Ontario Jockey Club recogulized as the greateat out-door Social and Sportlng Events Of Year lu Canada. dENERAL ADMISSION $1.50. Box Seate $1.00 extra. FIRST RACE DAILY AT 2.15 P.M. JOSEPH E. SEAGRAM, Prealdent Secretary-T F",
         "U RI E R. îs expressed aven Iu physlcaj type, and the heavy Peasaut of a Saxon focus tike Surrey and Sussex shows nothlng of te distinction of the Highlander or the Corniahmen, wh\u0026ie thase predom- luanitty Saxon reglons have producad the minimum proportion of Englshx geulus. The Anglo-Saxon lias ever possessed a aturdy obstinacy, an Inde., pendent commonsense, wellt ypfled by the South Saxon peasaut, Willam Cob- bett. Thougli \"terrible for bravery and agitity\" the Saxons were funda- meutatly eouservati4ve trom the first, the teast apt ta wander of al1 Gar- manie tribas, aud lu the great Ger- manie migrations of thie early cen- turies a!ter Christ, Saxons and Fr1- glans and Angles stili etung ta their otd ground on the bank of the Eibe. IV la, perliaps, noV an accident after atl, that Eugland lia beeu named fr0 r the Anglo-Saxon. Hs lia not been lier brain, buit ie lias .perliaps beau lier bachiione. WIthout th* Anglo-axon England, would be Impotent-, lu svary conflet o! war, In avery task o! pence. lie lins been the wenpon and the lin- plsment. The lest greaC invasion was tliat of the Normans. It was the most fate- fully decisive of ail and set the final ýseal on the genlus of England. The Norman was ultimately of the same stock as9 the North-mien of the preeed- ing wave of invasion. It was t-hat fact whicb gave so much significance to the Norman Conquest of England. 0f ail the Norman conquests in Europe, as Freeman poinited out, that of England atone proved permnanently effeotive, and the reason was that only in Eng- land were they on a soit over wihich their own seed h!ad atready been pien- tifully sprinkled. Here atone their potenrt genius could work on congeniai etemen'ts and acliieve permanent re- sults. Yet the Normans' task of inva- sion was harder than any that went before, needing ail the energies of the great generat and consummate admin- istrator who achieved Lt. Evcrry fresh invader o! England had added to the strength of England. After the Norman Conquest, no fur- ther eonquest seems th have been found possible. Engtand had become what later the Frenchi Ambassador to Charles Il. found it to, bc, \"one vast citadet.\" The Normans, it must be remembered, were the most vigorous race of thelr time. They representedl the fluest flower of strong northern in- ddviduality developed in the favourable soit o! te orderly Latin clvitization o! France. In ail things excessive, as thoir own ancienit chronloler noted, they infused someîthing of that exces- siveness into the composite Englisit blood. Yet they were no longer pir- ates. Tbey were trained In warfare and govern.ment; they knew how to found principatities and kingdoms even lu the far MedIterranean. They eulUbvated the arts with daring and briltlant saecess, and they hadl a pas- sion for taw, even ta, thé extent of con- tentiousness. Their primitive energy o! ruthlessness bail become transform- ed lnito a genlus of organization and an Instinct for just, If severe, adminietra- tIon. The extent and the signifloance o! the Norman invasion of Engiand lias sometimes beau underestimated. It la, tliroughouit, the Norman spirit whioh has dominated England and largely directed Engl.Ish poticy ln the world. It la the Norman arist\u003ecratie domin- ance, Norman orderliness, Norman ad- mulnistra'tlve enargy, whlcli have f or- mulated, the Engilali oligarchie consiti- tution and controlled the growth of Engllali dom4nion. Wiýtii the Norman Invasion the aie- ments of the Engtish eharaoter were ait brouglit togethar. Nothing furcther was needed but their parmeartion and~ elaboration, their slow devetopinent te satf-consclousness. Thera have beau mindr Infusions of new biood since, but thase have marely served to rein- force olernen±s alraady ,exis*ting. Thougli amail la amouint, these later migrations have beau Preclous ln qualty, for they have beau attraeted by that spirit of !readom and talera- in in' England whlch lias offerad a home ta the fineat-sv'lrlted refugees tram nelgttbouring lands. Thus It was thait England aecepted the Germans aud Duteli, libers.ted the Je\",. admit- ted numeroua groups of artisans from Flanders who brouglit bath their sitili ln handicraft and their sturdy Iade- pendauce to enrioli the land of their adoption, and weloomed the French 1-ug-uenote, wlio, Iu the cougeuila. Eng- Uish soil, were free so ro devetlop theïr bigl iIntelligence and 10f ty charnoter as ta Vake rautt amotig the moet; Vypîcai, rE\u003epreseutatlvas a! the Englieli genlus. TwIated Wilsdom. The more walst te iess sp eed, A thrown ks spreadis no germe. Strike whie thbe Ire la hot. It la more blessed ta give than ta be giveil away. lt's a long loa. that lias no return- ing. HOUSEKEEPING ACCOUNTS We are becoaming a cheque-using people. The convenience of It en- sures the growth ut the practice. TPhe saU\u0026llr tihings of life-41hats, slhoes, books, groceries-are no-w (bought frequently by cheque, where once only currency paased. In the esmaU tradesmnan's wallet theB green of yet unlaundered banknotes le sprinkled with the tints of clean new choques. Thie advantages of a oheque ac- caunt appeal es9pecially to the housewtfe. It is a flrst aid in automiatlcally affording system., record and receipt. We have a 'arge nunther of Ladies axnong our depositors, and welcome the aceunits of any who may wLsh to avail themselves of the facilities we afford them. No aanourt la too smail or toc, large. CANADA PERMANENT MORTGAGE CORPORATION Pald-up Capital .-$36,000,000.00 Reserve Fund . ... 4,750,000.00 Investitients ...33.546,242.74 TORONTO STREET -TORONTO Estabîlshed 1855 Western Assurance Company (Pire, Marine and Explosion) Incorporated A.D. 1851. Assets over $4,000,000.00. Laosses pald since organization over $64,000,000.W0. HEAD OFFICE - TORONTO. a\"S cecelve h4Ihesi cash pross. Ws gond monsy the samne dey the tus are eeosivsd Charge no ommiM=lon-and psy allabares. WC ha\" Wad ont Millions of dloneas te thou. tandis of trappers in Canada who send thsir Sirlto ns bsoausslhey know thorget aoquare deal. and recel.'. mors money for their fers. YonrUio Wè bormore fur\u0026\u0026=o Irýppars frU\"thon ..ny othorly fir mosL anaa.. FREE Rallamna %w Pr C.t\"oa Rallam's Pr. Stle Book M p40 sont ffoson reqossi . Âddrss as fouos JOHN HALLA\u0026M Limited 122 Hallam Building, Toronta.ý PRINTI NO. 1X71SITING CÂRDS-L«d1ea' or Gentle- Ifmen's, prlated ta oeder-aa.tetM etyles. fifty cents per hundred. poat pajld. Prank fT 'Rrnard. Printer. 35 Dundae St- To- Russell House Ottawa - Canada Amerîcan and European Plans Facing Grand Plaza Onie Block From Parliament Buildings and Central Station Giso. Morrisette, Manager THE TUSCO Comforts of your home. (prv¶.te Hotel) Moderate rates\u0026 ' ot and oold water lu every rooni. ]IL EL EM~IONDSON. Prop.. ohopping»dla- trot 2U35 arvla Street. Toronto, Ont KING EDWARD HOTEL Toronto, Canada. -Freproof- Âooooemoda±ioe fer 750 gueita. $1.60 us4 Àmnte.a andi Eurapean Plane. MOTEL KRAIJBMANN GRILL IEUROPEAN PLAN Reerne wîth bth $1.00 par day u». W. KRAUSMANN, Proprletor. Fielles eet on driaht. ORCHEsTRA.",
         "24 THE COURIER. WAR LOAN DOMINION 0F CANADA Issue of $100,000,000 Five per cent. Bonds Maturing lst October, 1931 PAYABLE AT PAR AT OTTAWA, HALIFAX, ST. JOHN, CHARLOTTETOWN, MONTREAL, TORONTO, WINNIPEC, REGINA, CALGARY, VICTORIA INTEREST PAYABLE HALF-YEARLY, lst APRIL, let OCTOBER PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST PAYABLE IN GOLD ISSUE PRICE 97ï' A FULL HALF-YEAR'S INTEREST WILL BE PAID ON lat APRIL, 1917 THE PROCEEDS 0F THE LOAN WILL BE USED FOR WAR PURPOSES ONLY The Minister of Finance offers herewith, on behaif of the Governuient, the above namied Bonds for subseription at 971/2, payable as follows - on application; 16lth October, 1916; \" îth Noveiuber, 1916; lSth Decexuber, 1916. 10 per cent. 30 d 30 27!/2 The total allotmient of bonds of this issue will be limited te one hundred million.,dollars exclusive of the amount (if any) paid for by the surrender of bonds as the equivalent of cash under the ternis of the War Loan prospectus of 22nd Novem- ber, 1915. The instalments may be paid in full on the l6th day of Octo- ber, 1916, or on any instalment due date thereafter, under dis- count at the rate of four per cent. per annuni. AIl payments are to be made to a chartercd bank for the credit of the Min- ister of Finance. Failure te pay any instalment when due wil render previons payments hîable te forfeiture and the allotment te cancellation. Subscriptions, accompanied by a deposit of ten per cent. of the amount subscribed, must be forwarded through the mediumn of a chartered bank. Any branch in Canada of any chartere 'd bank will receive subscriptions and issue provisional receipts. This boan is authorized under Act of Parliament ef Canada, and both principal and interest will be a charge upon the Con- selidated Revenue Fund. Formis of application may be obtained from any brandhinl Canada of any chartercd bank and at the office of any Assistant Receiver General in Canada. Subscriptions must be for even hundreds of dollars. Iu case of partial allotmnents the surplus depesit will be ap- plied towards payment of the ameunt due on the Octeber in- stalment. .Scrip certifleates, non-negotiable or payable te bearer in ac- cordance with the choice of the applicant for registered or bearer bonds, will be issued, after allotment, in exchange for the provisional receipts. When the scrip cer'tificates have been paid in full and pay- ment endersed thereon by the bank receiving the money, they may be exchanged for bends, when prepared, with coupons at- tached, payable te bearer or registered as te principal, or for fully registered bonds, when prepared, witliout coupons, iii accordance -%ith the application. Delivery of scrip certificates and of bonds will be made through the chartered banks. The issue Nvill be exempt from taxes-including any income tax-rnposed in pursuance of legisiation enacted by the Pal'- liament of Canada. The bonds with coupons will be issued in denominations o $100, $500, $1,000. Fully registered bonds without coupoicS wviIl be issued in denominations oie $1,000, $5,OO0 or any authoi- ized multiple of $5,000. The bonds -%ill be paid at maturity at par at the office of thle Minister of Finance and Receiver General at Ottawa, or at the office of the Assistant Reeeiver General at Halifax, St. John, Charlottetown, Montreal, Toronto, Winnipeg, Regina, Calgary, or Victoria. The interest on the fully registered bonds will be paid bY eheque, which will be remitted by post. Interest on bonds with coupons will be paid on surrender of coupons. Both cheques and coupons wvill be payable, free of exehange at \u0026\"Y branch in Canada of any chartered bank. 1 Subject to the payment of twenty-five cents for each new bond issued, holders of fully registered bonds without couPofls wvill have the right to convert into bonds of the denominatlûfl of $1,000 with coupons, and holders of bonds with coupons will have the right te convert into fully registered, bonds of author- ized denominations without coupons at any time on applicationt to the IMinister of Finance. The books of the loan will be kept at the Department OÎ Finance, Ottawa. Application will be made in due course for the listing- of the issue on the Montreal and Toronto Stock Exehanges. Recognized bond and stock brokers will be allowed a cO1' mission of one-quarter of one per cent. on allotments made iii respect of applications bearing their stamp, provided, hOW', ever, that ne commission wivll be allowed in respect of tho' ameunt of any allotment paid for by the surrender of bond, issued under the War Loan prospectus of 22nd of Nevellber, 1915. No commission will be allowed in respect of apPlica- tions on formas whicb. have not been printed by the in Printer. Subscription Liste will close en or bofore 23rd September, 1916 Depa-rtment of Finance, Ottawa, September l2th, 1916.",
         "THRE COURIER. WAR LOAN OF YIELDINC PRACTICALLY 5.1//3%RACICLL CANADA As with the preo joua Loan, we predict a great succeas for titis issue. During titis.period of stress our Government needs our help and counta upon our patriotiam. But a chance lis gen inveal ors of placing their money in securities of lte higiteat grade, upon terms the liberalify ofwhicit wili, per- hcrps, not be fully realizcd until the reiurn of normal tmes. If this Loan were issued to yield 4?f %, instead of about 5?ý %o, the price would be 105.41, instead of 97.50. A 4,%- yield (the basis on which the Dominion Government bonds sold so recently as 1914) would mean a price of 111 for the present issue. We will forward your application, procure your allotment and render other services free of charge to you. To ensure allolment application should be made ai once Invesiment Bankers A. E. A ME S \u0026CO0. 53 King St. West, Toronto, Canada Established 1889 (To avoid delay we suggest using formu below, îf regular form. is flot oni hand.) Dominion of Canada Loan Due 1931 53 King St. West, Toronto, Canada. Dear Sirs: Date ...... ......-1916 I hereby authorize you to enter my sub scription for $........................... ..................... ...... Dominion of Canada Loan in accordance with the terras of the Officail Prospectus, Mr. Nam e in full Mrs, . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ... . . . or Miss Street address (or P.O. Box) ........................................... ....... ...... ........... ......... .......... Place........................... .......... ............................ ........ Province................ The New Canadian Loan Free of any exp ense to you- -We shall make delivery and accept in -Canada or the United States. '-We shahl hold in' safe keeping, if you Interim Certificates penching delivery of payment at any point desire,. the Government definitive Bonds. -We shall attend to ail details in exchanging Interim for Final Securities, and placing the latter in your possession. ASK FOR OUR APPLICATION .FORM. DOMIIONSECURITIES CORPORATION LIMITED*. VicePresident Vice-Prendn Aatsecre.twy Aur Toeuat Account EmWablàhd 1901 HEAD OFFICE:- 26 KING STI\\EET EAST TORONTO MONTREAL BRAN CH Canada Lit*. Building K. W.Sst\"l , , Manager J. A. Moueon , Serary LONDON. ENO., BRANCHf No. 2 Austin Frîtrs A.L-PuIlerter. Manager Subscriptôb. fS~ DOMINION E. Pl~. Woodi - G. A. Morrow J.* W. Mà\"cel J. AFrase - W. S. Hodgens T. H. Andison A. F. White e~ W. Fletmng",
         "THE COURIERI. Lend to Your Country by investing in the Second Canadian War Loan announced to-day. It is your opportunity to help win the war. Those who cannot bear arms can enlist their financiai support-lIt is a patriotie duty to assist to the full ex- tent of your mfeans. The security is absolute-a direct obligation of the Dominion of Canada. At the pur- chase price the Income is 5.30% per Annum Don't deiay! Telephone or telegraph us at our expense the amount of your subseription and we wiii place it promptly. If you prefer Fi in thîs Form-Now-and Mail to Us. Wood, undy Co.,Dominion of Canada 55% War Loan Toronto. I hereby request you to record my subseription for $........ of the Second Dominion War Loan in accordance with the terms of the Officiai Prospectus, and I hereby engage to pay the instal- ments as they shall become due. Name .......................................... (State wbether Mr., Mrs. or Miss) Address ...................................... Your subscription receives ail care, without charge, if entrusted to us, and our efficient organization is at your disposai for resale of the Bonds. Wood, Montreal Gundy Canadian Pacific Railway Building Telephone Main 7437 Toronto \u0026 Co. New York A CERTAIN Canadlan thrust is bands In bis pockets. H1e bad rison from lunch. Ile was thlnk- lng about money. Right hand pocket? Two coppers and bis keys. Left baud? Three quarters, a dIrtyý dollar bill and a button. \"Pooli!\" be sald,--though he was roaliy thlnking of bis bank account, nlot bis pockets, \"Hlaven't any money!\" H1e withdrew bis hands. H1e rebut- toned bis coat. H1e ascended to tbe club's eigar stand and bouglit two two- for's. H1e Ilgbted one and strollod baék to bis office. H1e rang for bis stono- grapher and dicfated. But in every- thing ho dld ho kept saylng to hlm- self: IlHavon't any money. No. Haven't any. . . . If I bad . .. wisb I coubd . . . but I bavon't.\" By five o'clock he bolieved It. He bad to-to be comfortable, be- cause ho bad been reading about the new Canadianwar loan. Hîs living expenses, by the way, -mare about a tbousand a montb., New this man wont out that nigbt ad made a speech at a recrultlng meeting. It was a gond speech. It ran like this: -You men who bavon't enlisted aren't biug bonest w,%ith yourselves. 'You tbin thore are reasons why you can't go. You imagine you can't. YOU deceive yonrseif by saylng: 'Oh, 1 couldn't arrange for mny famlly to be booked aftor.' You think o! insurance and you say, I haven't any money-' Rlght there the speech broke down. It limped. It etopped. The Canadian sat down. People cheerod, but be was uncom- fortable. H1e burried bomne. H1e called for' bis bousebold budget. H1e drew a, blue penciL He ca-ncelled the new car ho tbought he needed. 'He wlped out tbe proposed new \u003ewlng for bis'bouse. H1e cut off the appropriation for new rugs. -Wbat witb one littie oconomy and anotber littie eoonomy be scraped Up a trlffing ten tbousand dollars and bougbt one bundrod war Joan bonds. III. There are a lot o! people that way, but tbey aren't aIl ricb people. Take the case: A grocer read about the 'var boan. \"Gee!\" ho slghed. \"Tbat'd be a pretty nîce thing.....Wsh I 'vas rich . .. H1e reacbed for a scoop witb one0 baud and a bag witb the other. He bocame ahsorbed lu weighing out \"quarter's-ý worths\" o! sugar'so as to bave 'em ready for the Saturday night trade. The store cat rubbed ber'elf against bis shoos. The cracked hdII on the store door jangled and a customer came In. S'be was a large, kixid, talkatIve wo- man and wanted four quar't sealers. She was doing-down peacbes. While the grocer got the sealers she talked. Tben he tallted, They both ]ioped .that \"everybody\" would bixy the new war loan bonds. They agreed It was a duty. 0 yes. 'Specially of rich people. Tben tbey forgot the war loan. IV. It doesn't matter what made the grocer wake up. But be did. So dld the woman. First of ail the grocer wasn't cer- tain. H1e added up bis bills payable. He t.otted up bis bills recelvable. H1e ran across some old \"bad debts\" and added 'them Up ton. They aniount- ed to two bundred dollars. .IIf I could collect bai! of chat,\" be tbougbt, 'Il would... So be trle4. And he did. The woman customer had a much barder time of it. Sbe had neyer seen a whole bundred dollars except once wben she had won a prize Iu a guessing contest. But now-she had no son to send to the front. -She had knitted ail the socks she could and rolled bandages at the churcb -so she set ber mmnd on getting te- getber one bundred dollars for a war bnan bond. It seemed as far away as a star, but sbe was determlned., It took ber a long time, but she suc- ceeded. She made a klnd o! pickle wbich only she could make and sold It tbrough the grocer. That made ber a little. She out down on the house- hold expenses and she collected soma~ money that was3 owing to ber bus- band .. .. . You understand she sueceeded. 1 -- 1Mu This Is tbe point: Every bouse in Canada cou] a war-boan bond if it wanted tO. Yeu say: \"Imupossible!\" Wrong. *You say: \"Thon show hlow Impossible. Bach man nmust show hiisE the fact Is that tbere are few who can't somehow get togetlle and then-- It isn't, meroly patriotie to war-loan bond. It Isn't just a duty. It Is the very best of GOOD) NESS. It is an opportunity. The flrst bonds of the Cailadi; boan wero sold at a prenilufi' a! ter the Issue.. They were unsurpassed 5ecuI They give over 5% Interest. They are as good as gobe its( Some rich men buy fewer W9ý bonds than tbey could afford-: oniy thougbt se. Some poor men are buYing tban soems at first porsIble. But that ricb man errs Ou1 the side; the poor man on the rigilI To subscribo to the new 1o5a11 only good cltlzenshlp but 900' uiess. A LA8TING M~pRFSSION. E. H. Sothern 'wos lnvittsd to a' luncheon a few days *go-. M gue\u0026ts wase. a lstingulshýed 1awYrE chatted wîtth the noted actOrab theatre and toid hinm 110W I joyed his acting. ,o \"Yeýs,\" ad the Iawyei', given ufi n-,afy, many IilSO.S\u0026lt e 1 tegret youir retiremeflt *-\u003eaturafly,\" says Mr. sotherrl' much pleased untfl as5 tha lunIcheo up rthe Iafwyer claspedc -Y handl 8\" *Gooclby, de\"r Mr'. \u003cIl4ec, never fûgtyou,\" Too Poor to'Buy the, War Loan",
         "THE COURIER. 20, 13-Kt6 dis, ch 20. 13B 1 (f) 21. BXB 21. Ktx]l 22. Kt-Ki 22. Q-Kt3 \u003cg) 23. RxKtch 23. R Ktsq 24. Kt-Q6 (h) 24. PxP dis, ch 25. K-Rsq 25, P-KR3 (i) 26. Q..Q5clt 26. R-R2 27. Q-K4 27. K-Ktsq (J\u003e 28. Q-K6ch 28. I7-R2 29. R-B6 (k) 29. KR-Bsq 30. Q-B5ceh 710. K-Ctsq 81. RieRch 911. R'xR 32. QxRch 1'2. KxQ 33. R-K8 mate (1) (a) PxP ls the compromised defence. Black avuids its intricacies unlY to ineet with an even more c.omplicated game. (b) ProbabIy best. Paulsen's defence, Rt-R3. seems unsatisfactory on account of 11. 13--KKt5. Q 134; 12. Q-R3. \u003cc) After 14. BxBi, Casties, Black would have had the' býtter game. (d) He has no better (e) If 17. ... .....Q-T'Gch, then 18. B-Rsq, QxKt; lu. QR4s~ch, t{t-K2; 20. RxKtch and White mates in three by 21. R-B7ch, or 21. Q-K4ch. (f) If 20.........K-Kt sq, then 21. Q-Kt3ch wins. If 20,.........Kt-34, then 21. Kt-K4, Q-Kt3; 22. BxKt, PxP dis, ch; 23. X-Rsq, QxQ; 24. Bx]3 dis. eh, K-K2; 25. Kt-B5 dis ch, etc. (g) Nor can he get a satisfactory game by giving 'ip the Qu\"en by 22 .... Q-Q4; 23. RxRtch, QxR; 24. ýR-KBsq. (h) A marvellous move. Three pieces can take it, but none with safety. (i) A fine variation runs. 25 .... QxQ; 26. KtxQ, P 137; 27. KtxlB, R--Q8;, 28. R(B5)-Bsq, P=Q; 29. R--Q8 mate. (j) Still the Knight cannot sately be taken. for if Pawn takes, mate in two follow-s: If Rook takes, then mate in three by 28. R-136 dis, ch, K-Ktsq; 2a. R-B38clh KxR; 30. Q mates. If 27 .........QxICt, then 28. R--136 dis. eh, foIlowed by RxQ and wins. (k) 'Threatening 30. RxPech and 31. Q-B7 mate. (1) A fitting conclusion to as bril1iaxnt a game as anyone could desire. The Knight, whlch fine moves ago was offered o Bl1ack, is stili en prise, the Queen ha3 b 'on sacrîfl artd the Rook hs the only thrpiec' ;hz has left. Solver's Ladder. (2'aju.'th XVeek, Sept. 9.) No. 67. No. 68 Total J. Rl. Ballantyac..2 0 49 JKay........2 2 40 P.W. *ears*a. . 0 31 38 1.G. Hunter........O 0 O 32 Rt. A. Leduc..........0 O 29 W. J. Faulkner ...2 \u0026 21 The prize for this mionth goes to Mr. Eallantyne, whose risc to the top has been of the mushroomn order, due to his dî.scov- ery of several cooks. His solutions ta Nos. 65 and 66 miust have met with mis- fortune, as they neyer came te hand. Be has our hearty congratulations. Solver's Ladder. (First XVeek.) No. 70. No. 71. Total. J. Kay...............2 3 45 P. W. Pearson .....2 3 43 R. G. Hunter........2 O 34 ýR.A. Leduc..........O O0 29 W;. J . Faulkner ...2 3 26 J. R. Ballantyne ...2 3 5 Correct solutions of Nos. 61, 62, 63 and N EW u, WAR LOAN See particulars on anothar page of this Issue. Let each 'one help raake this loan a success Send us your application, to. gether wlth cheque for Ist In. stalment, payable to THE MINISTER OF FINANCE, and we will look after It for you WITHOUT CHARGE. Send for ffircular and application forme. JOHN STARK \u0026 CO. Establlshed 1870. 504 Royal Bank BIJg., Toronto We own and offer a wide range of Can- adian City Bonds to Yield 5% to 6.30%. Pariîculars Upon Requesi NUDÔMIeEua coffNoe-I1LT 1 1",
         "64 recelved £rom \"Yukon,\" Deiwson Çity,= 44 points. 'Phere were no correct solvers of No. 69, the 4 mover by W. PaulY. Mr. Faulkner fends a cook, however, bY l. P-133; 2. R--KKt7 or K.R7, etc. Our coluxnn o« Sept. 9 was uafortunately publîshed wlthout proo! examination. The s, i-mitted probleans should nuTrxsber 75 and 76. In the, at variation cd the comamen- tary on KahnleiiVs 7 inover, 1. B-R4 et once, is, of course, at Black's cmn- mand. In columnn of Sept. 2, the pro4blems should rinmbýer 72, 73 and 74. Mr. HI-Inter'a solution of No. 66, was overlooked. We have added the two points to hLq score. To Correspondent$. (3. P. B.) In No. 68 1. Kt--K3; 2. Q-,Kt4? B-Kt4i no maete. (P. W. P.) In No. 70. 1. P-xP, QxQ! no mnate. Boit fro'm the Blue (Conciuded from page 18.) sbimmerilg seas and the spaclous, noble South. Fred was the first pereon to greet me on the Santa Dominica platform. Ris face was beaming from ear to ear; hie band closed on mine In a grip of steel, he hugged me like a bear, and waitzed me exuberantly into a brake- man, and then Into a cbeckerboard earl with an eyeglasz. Say, but wasn't lie giad to see me! Say, but it was carking to see me! Say, lie hoped I'd overlook the late unpleasantness, and corne to the wedding!, Yes, by Jupi- ter, bis and Ellnor's! Splendid, wasn't it! Slmply great, eh? Who'd have thought it a manth ago? Hadn't 1 lieard? The Purple Brother hail skipped. Yes, had- skinned out Uâke the Arabi Hadn't even stayed to fold up bis tent, but had melted like hot wagon grease! Had been traced to San Diego and across the border into M4exico, scaotIng for ail he was worth! And the New Religionists? Ail back at the old stand, except Mr. Paton, wha bad goBe to Europe and tlie Titcoxnbes, who were recu- perating at Paso Robles Hot Sprlngs. Great wasn't St! Just as I had sald, littie thougi lie bad believed it. Noth- lng doing withaut -the Purpie Brother, you knaw. Somet'hing In my look startled Fred, for he stopped In mid-career and gazed st me with open mouth. \"This isn't any news to you,\"1 lie eaiid suddenly. l'Yeu can't f001 nme! Yri knew It already!\" 111 did and 1 didn't,\" I answered, evps svely. -What does this mean?\" lie demand- ed\u003c -Only that 1 amn the mode»t* hero of tbi% occasion.\" \"*What'% that? I don't understand.\" \"O0nly that I seen my duty and 1 do,\" 1U.\" \"Then youi dld have sonaething ta do wlih gettlng rld of him.\" \"Oh, yes,\" 1 returned. \"In tact, 1 bai a whole lot.\" \"A whole lot?\" repeated Fred, more myetified than ever. 'Vo cuit a long story short.\" 1 Pxt- plalned, \"and nlot to bore vou with the mental proceasee that ]ed mne from ene brilliant deduction to ann.ther tili 1 reached the Intellectuai culmination of my 1.ife, let me say that 1 walked Jnta a Broadway telegrapli office, and lifI taklng2 a pencil tîed to a string, az!1edf (in the hope that It had been rýi1iced) what was the rate for ten wr rds from New York ta California. Indteterredl by the fact that a soullese c--iv-rition still insisted on a dollar, I grcefully seized a form, and P ,.Andi( wrote. of cour8e,\" put In Fred J1îrrvinglv \"Wrote what, that's wb at qi fter?\" \"T just took a chance, old man, a yviiiiofl to one chance, and wlth no Dm,,e ta go on than mv natural lntrep- i,-v and general disb(elief in prophets, 1 telegraplied: 'Ram Zaifaryab Ghad- d'\u003er1e, B.A., qantsi. mnia Califor- nia. Les.ve New York to-nlght. Meet mp- it 11w, train. Bline Eyes,'\" Work for Women \u003cConcluded froin Page 12.) are made glad by the note of the tliruFh and the blackhfrd. The Home le called Blue Blrd's Net In anticipa- tion that the happiness of Maeter- lnck's Blue Bird wl reign there. .AJ. tbe hangings, woodwork, and furnish- ings are of various shadeso of blue. lu caorying out tliis idea, Lady Byron con- cu.rred with the colour specialists of tbe day-tbat blue ie the colour most restful ta the nerves. Nurses fromi South Africa, Australia, Canada, as well as from ail points in Britain, liavn rested bere, and gone back ta tie'r work, ýrenewed in the strength essen- tial ta them, by the kindness and thought of Lady Byron. As chairman of the Polieli Relief Fund and on the Cominittees of Ser- bian and Montenegrin Relief and Italian Relief, Lady Byron daes good service. Perliaps because the Tabacco Fund is sa essential to the personal. caif art of aur men, Lady Byron is aiso interested in it and Is on tbe com- mittee. Reaiizing our obligation ta look after the comfort of the soldier at the front In ail ways, Lady Byron bas glven of ber thought, of ber means, and of herseif ta tbe work. After the",
         "THE COURIER. e Blind Man's Byes (Contiliued froxu page 18.) 15 during ilils trial that San- aine (had become more pub- Vil. Not tbat the blind man lOO-ted e! any knowledge- 15 o! any complioty-in the lein urder bad been because 'IY Drivaito matter; but in the istlonlng into Latron's circuin- \"Id surroundings previous to OSanteino was summoned tas a witness. 'axua o! Santeino's examina- been of the -sort the public- eforo the newspapers love. J Man, led into thbe court, sit- t11055 in the witncss chair, ro- hiuseif by bis spokon, and re by bis witbbeld, replies as ,ie unknewn guiders of tbe ýf 4:be Continent and as coun- the Most powerful,-bini.self lhardly board o! but plainly e nation's \"'uncrowned rulers,\" Lught the public sonse. The he murderer, the crime, even 1111soîf. losit temporarily tbeir in the public curiesity over ln1allty of Santoine. ,So, over iltoino bad beon a man mark- bis goings and oomings, ho- Lt t'hoy miglit actually reveal eemenîs or settiementis among ý, were the object o! unfound- Eften distlsrbing ýguesses and (Ms; and particularly at this lii the circuinstancos o! War- ,th bad proclaimed dissensions he liowerful wb*icb they had to deny, it was natural that Co~mings and goings should e4flsPicuous as possible. been reported for some days t0ime bad come to Seattle di- ,er Warden's donth; but when admaitted, bis associates had leon carefui to add that San- ivlng been a close personal Gabriel Warden, biad come ta Personal capacity, and the MI Wag givon that Santoine L'ned quietly some days before. e Prolonging o! bis stay la the ls more than suggestive that long -the powerful were trulY sýtate as Wardon had pro- thiA attack upun Santuine, s0 1) that wbieb bad slain War- delivered -within eloven days len's death, must be o! ,t he SIRY stood ovorwhelmed for liionient wfth tbis fullor recog- 'Il Of the seriousnoss o! the Whicb hall come uPon tbis rUs5ted te bis, charge ; tben bie l the surgeon. 'Ou1 do, anything for hMm bore, hoe asked. Irgcoûn glanceti down ,the car. ecufied by bis daugbter.\" t'ak c iu in there,- thon. la el4utor wont te the rear of il1' bruught the porter, wbo stationed there, witb the Re11 set tice negrfi to, mak- th berth: anti wbiea i was the four mon iiftod4ho .inert R~ag Sn'toineo, carrieiditinte 'dgroom and- laid; it ýon its \"tho bed. 'e 11Yinstrumnents,\" -8inclair '\u003c et them; but before U de- alUyting, I ouigtAo ec bis Slice llhe Is herc:' ber con- ý\"e3ayberore any' opetion irenfpoke to Avery. . Baton Aey's atari e!f recollectien tle )orne's-orm lLarri'ctSan- 11131 could net; havre, beon orler at ail durlng ithe ro- efnts. The chances- o! life 1 eBasil Santile ýevldentIy ~'3r ad dreotly Affecicd Don- e ht ho hiad been absorbeti t the Point o! forgettlng AIl eetbethn bis own. IDaCon's Uht~ d'ad gone often to ber. Iler a his directions salid tO te tralnmen. guarding Oe*othe passeugers on the tt liad frigb±ened bier of what hati happened el8'the fst sense ot somne- ýogBread back to\u003e the 'obser- vation car, wbat word had reached ber? Did she connect it witb bier father? Was she-the one rnost closely concernod-among those wbo bad been on tbe rear platform seek- ing adm-ittance? Was she standing there in the aisle o! the next car wnit- ing for confirmation of bier dread? Or bad no word reached bier, and must tbe news ef tbe attack upon bier father coe, to ber with ail thie sbock o! sud- denness? Baton bad been about to beave the car, wbore bie now was plainly o! nu use, but these doubts cbecked hlm. \"MIfss Santoine is In Cie observation car,\" Avery said. \"l'il get ber.\" SThe tene was in some way false- Eaton could net teil' exaotly how. Avery started down the aisle. \"One momenît, pleaso, Mr. Avery!\" said the conduotor. \"l'Il ask you not, to tell Missl Santoine beforo any other passengers that thero bas been an at- tack uponý ber father. Watt until you get bier inside the door o! this car.\" \"lYou yourself said notbîng, thon, that can bave made lier suspect it?\" Eaton asked. C ONNERY sbook bis bond; the con- duotor, in doubt and anxiety over exactly wbat action the situation called for,-unable, too, to communi- cate any hint of it to bis sîlperiors to tbe West because o! the wîres being dewn,--clearly bad reselved to keep. the attack upon Santoine secret for the tino. \"I said nôthing definite civen to the trainmen,\" hoe replied; \"And I want you gentlemen to promise me before you leave ibis car that you will say notb.ing until I give 1you leave.\", Ris eyes shifted frein the face o! one to another, untîl hoe had assured himseif that ail agreed. As Avery loft the car, Ewaton found a seat in one o! t'li end sections near the drawing- reom. Sinclair and the conductorihad returned te Santoine. The porter waý unmiaking the bortb in the next sec- tien which Sanrtoine had occupied, bavlng boen told te do sel by Connery; the negro bundled togeitber the linon and carried dit to the cuphoard ai the furtber end o! tbe car; ho feldcd the blankets anti put them in the upper bertb; lie ;took oui the partitions and laid iboin on top o! the blankets. Baton stared oui the window at the bank o! snow. lie did net know whether to ask to beave the car, or whetber ho ought te romain; and hoe would ýhave gene excepi for recollec- tien o! Harriot Santoine. Ho. hati beard the roar dour of the car open and.close some moments before, s0 hoe knew that she must be In the car andi ixai, in.the passage at thait end, Avery musi be ielling bier about bier father. Tiien the curtain at the end o! the car waýs:pushod furiber aside, andi Har- iet.-Sattoine came In. .,Sheý wwa very pale, but quite con- troiloti. as -Baton knew she wuuld be. She lookediait E)aton, ýbut did, net speak as- lho-ýpassed; she weit' \u003ciroctly' 'to thet deor!o! the -draw4ng-room.- opneot it -And weni ltu, followed by Avery. The: dour closoti, aùdt fert a moment Rwaton could, hear voices ,inaîde the ron aritSntie Sinclalr's, Coninory's. 'The-conductor thon came te ithe deor, ut the drawlng-roomzanti sent.,the porter fer-water -and dlean -inon;, .-aton heard(* the rip uf linon bohigý tomn, an4the, car becamo flueti with -tihe amell o! antiseptics. Donwald, Avery came eut of tho draw- lng-room. andi droppotiý Into the seat acres. fronl Baton. HoËI seemeti ,deoply thoughttul-se deeply,ý lndeeti, as to bo almosai unaware out-Eaton'a preseRce. And -Baton, ýobservlnghîm, again tati the. sease the Avery's absorption was completely in conseclucncos to hixuself o! whai w-as going on behind the door -la how Basil Santemne'à deaili or conuinueti existenceO would affect the fortunes of Donald Avery. \"la ,ho golng te opemato?\" Raïton nsked. \"-Operate? yes; he's ýdoIng it,\" Avery replieti Shortly. \"Andi Miss Sahitoinfêl\" \"She',s helping - hartding- isru molis anti so on-\" Avery coud flot have replied, as he did, if the strain this period must Im- pose upon Harriet Santoine bad been much in bis mind. Eaton turned from hlm and asked nothing more. A long time passed-how long, Blaton could flot have told; hie noted only thait dur- ing it the shadews on tlie snowbank outside the window appreciably chang- ed their position. Once during this time, the door of the drawing-room was briefly opened, while Connery handed sametbing out to the porter, and the smell of the antiseipties grew suddenly atronger; and Baron could see behind Connery sthe surgeon, coat- less and wlth sdr.t-'sleeves rolled Up. bending over the figure on the bod. Finally the door opened again, and H-1arriet Santoine came out, palier than before, and now not quite iso steadY. Baton rose as she approacbod tbem; and Avery leaped up, ail concern and sympathy for bier iLmmediately she ap- pea.red. Hie met lier in thec aisie and toek bier band. \"Was it successful, dear?\" Avery asked. She shut hier eyes before she an- swered, and stood holding te the back of a seat;, then she opened ber eyes, saw Blaton and recognized hlm and sait down in the seat where Avery had been sitting. \"«Dr. Sinclair says we will know lu four or five daYs,\" she re.plied to Avery; -she turned then directly te Eatbn. \"n1e thougbt there probably was a dlot under the skuli, and hie opera.ted to flnd it and relieve it. There was one, and we bave done, al we ean; now we may only wait. Dr. Sinclair bas appointed lhimself nurse; lie snys 1 can help him, but not just yet. 1 thouglit you would like to know.\" \"Thank you; 1 did w'ant to know,\" Baton aeknowledged. 11je moved away from them, and ,,at down in one of the scats fuutber down the car. Con- nery came out from the drawing-room, went flrst to one end of thec car, then to the other; and retiurnirig with the, Pullman conduc.tor, began to oversee the transfer of the baggage of Ail ether passengers than'the Santoine ,party to vaicanit sections in tbe forwArd sleepers. People began to pass tbrough tbe aisle; evidently the car doors had been unlocked. Baton got up and left the car, finding aft the door a porter frein one of tbe other cars statloned Vo Warn people nort to linger or speak or make other noises in going tbrough the car where Santoine was. As the door was ciosing beblind Baton, a sound came to bis cariS froun the car bie just bad le! t-a young girl suddenly crylng in abandon. Harriet Siantoine, hie understood. mat have broken down for the moment, atter the strain of the operation; and Baton balted as tbeugh to, turn back, feeling tble blood drive suddenly upon bis beart. Then, recoulectlflg that he bad no rigbt to go te ber, he'went on. CHAPTER VIII. Suspicion Fattens on Etton. A S ho entered bis own car,- Es.ton. h-aWed t hat part o! -the train b ad taken on itsusual lok and man- ner, or ýas ixear- se. ht seemed, .As the ,stopfage, la -the -,\u0026»w Ipssl. 'Knowlng what lie dld, B1libStn M\u0026red at flrst with, ýastonlshment: and the ir- rational thonght camne to ,hlm ibat the people before him. were acting, 'Thon bie reallzed thiat they were almost as u.gual beos.use they did noît know wba.t had bappened. the tact that Dasil San-, tomne had been attacked--or thaf ho was on4'he tratin-s-,tili b'ad been care- ful!y kept secret by the spreadIng of sonme-other explanation of the -trouble In the car bebiiid. Se ne)w, in their section, Amy and Constance wcre. reaing and knlttlng; tliclr parents bad immersed tbemselveo in double ffelibia.re; the Englishiman looked eut' the wlndow ait the anow wlth no dl!- ferent expression -than that wl*th wblch ho would have surveyed a landscapeý they mlght have been passing. Sm-i clail' section, of course, reminaned empty; and a porter camne and trans- ferred tho-4urgeonf's handbag and ever- eeat te the oar behlnd in whlob h8e *as caring for $antoine. B\u003eaton found his car betker filUodthan it had been bofore, for the people oh4fted frein the car behind had been Pl um Preserving Time Plum preserves mnade withn \"Royal Acadia\" Sugar are rich in flavour, have beautiful clear Syrup and wilI keep i.ndefinitely when properly sealed, as there is no adultera- tion in the sugar. Every Grain Pure Cane Refined under the moSt hygienic condi- tions and .-put up in dust proof packages and bags. Look for th e triangle Trade Mark as shown, above when buying sugar, and insist on getting \"Royal Acadia\" ugar THE ACADIA SUG ARn ]RE1 INING CO., LTDU HALIFAX - CANADA STAMPS AND COINS. ~ÂCKQIISfr0.to coliectoru for 2 cents aa\u003eoff or bundred differeut Vo., Toronto.",
         "THE COURIER. Cawhra Mulock \u0026Co. Torsnto stock Excange Brokers and Bankers 12 KING STREET EAST TORONTO, .CANADA Establilshs 1864. The Merchants Bank 0F CANADA. HEAD OFFICE *MONTREAi. Paidup Capital - $7,OOO,OW Reserlve Fund andi Un. divid.di Profits.-- $7,250,981 Me6 SfANCHE8 IN CANADA. Qmxîsvai Ban#Ing SssIns BSIG DEARTMIENT at aU upwardu irpçqlved, and Inztrant sl- soed t ben ourrent rats TORONTO OFFICE8l: CANAIANNoRTHERN ALL TÉE ýWAY From the Laurentialnsto the Rockies Serving Canada s National Playgrounds including Grand Dischlarge of the Saguenay, Laurentide National Park, Algonquin Natiolnal-Park, Muskoka Lakes, Georgian Bay Hinterland, Nipigon Forest Reserve, Quetico National Park, Vermillion Lakes, Jasper National Park, and Mount Robson National Park ALL MODERN EQUIPMENT SUMMER TOURIST, FARES For Ilterature and Information, appiy to General PaIssenger Departme'nt, 68, King St. East, Toronto, ÇJA ju Ont.; 226 St. James St., Montreal, Que.; or, Union Station, Winnipeg, Man. ~u soaittered through -the train., He fell a hand on bis arm as lie started te go te his seat, and turned and faced Con- nery. \"If you miust say anyitbing, say it was appendicitis,\" tbe conductor warn- ed wben lie bac] brought Eaten back te3 the vestibule. \"Mr. Dorne-if a name je given, it s -that-was sud- denily seized wth ai reeîîrrence of an attack of appendioltîs from wlncb lie had been suffering. An imnmediate Opt- eration wae required to save him; thait was wbat Dr. Sinclair did.\" Baton reaffirmed bis agreement to give no information. He learned by the conversation of tlhe passengers that Oonnery's version of what had hapipened had been e\"sly received; some ýone, they said, bad been takien suddenly and serîously 11i un Ihe train. Wbeir opeculation, after sons ar gument, had pitched on the riglit persor; it was the tail, distinguished- leokîng mran in the last car wbe wore glasses. At noon, food woas carrield iet the Santorne car. K EEPING hinseif te bis section, Baton watched the car and eut- side the window for sigas cf wia.t investigation Connery and Avery were, -aking. What already was knewn had made il perfectiy clear tibat who- ever hiad axtackeld Santoine musitvt] be lapon the train; for no one conid have escaped tbrough the snow. No ors could Dow 'escape. Aver y and Connery and wheever else was mak- ing investigation with then evîdently were rot lettîng any one know tbat an investigation was being made. A numnher of turnes Baton saw Connery and the Pullnar conductor pass ilireugl the aisiee. Eaton went te lunch;* on bis way back fren, the diner, le saw the conduetors with papers in their liards questioning a passerger, Tbey evidently -were starting syste- maticaiiy ilirougli the cars, examindng each person; they were makîng, the plea of necessity of a report te the raiiroad offices ef rames and ad- dressee of ail he~ld up -by the stoppage ef tbe train. As Baton haalted at bis section, tlie two -conducters finisbed with the mani frein the rear wbo bad been irastailed ir Section One, and they crossedt t be Englishman oppo- site. Baton heurd themn explair tlie need of making a report and heard tle Engflshlnrs arswer, with bais naine, bis addreïe and particularts a't te who bele wam, where he was eomirg f rom ani whtler lie was goirg., Eaton started on t»ward the rear of thie train. \"A moment, sir!\" Connery cailed. Biaton haited. The conductors con- fronted him. \"Your naine, sir ?\" Connery asked. \"Plilip D). Eaton.\" Conneryr wrote clown the answer. \"Yeur address?\" *\"I-have ne addretss.\" \"Yeu mean you dor't want te give it?\" i dI \"Ne, i have none. i waq going te n iL bote) in Cliicago--which one 1 badn't ec dec,ûidedi yet.\" le - \"Wle-re- are 4)U-OOamiflg fnm?\"' Td \"That'a lurrdly an addresls,- Mr. e' \"i1 can give Yenu ne address abroad. çb I ladl no fixed addresti ther-O. 1 was bu travelling mesf t th tim ue. Yen cOuid Ûl nef rea.cl me or place me by means b of any city or hoele there. I arrive t in Seatie by flie Astati, ,,teamer'and ID tooli Ibis train.\" i \"A!you came or the Tamba Maru.1 ai Cornnery made note ef thîs, as be , lad,( made note ef ail the other \u003cpie8- 16 fion,, and answers. TIen le sala e~ soinething te the Pullman cenduetr, w who replied In the sane, iow tone; a, wlat they said waB not audible te ex Eaton.c \",Y\" car tefl usý, ah leat wliere your 1e famiiy ls, Mr. Enter,\" Connery sug- 'h geshed.w \"I bave ne family,\" \"Frierds, then?\" ÇIs -1-I bave ne frierds.\" t \"I say tliat 1 ean roter you te ne lv '\"Nowbere?\" Île . Nrhr.I l Connery poxfderecl for several moD- it ulnt*, \"The àdz. HilIwad--Lawrence- S'Eator, preterdled 1 cou]d hear behird 1 voice'q et the condu rew fainter and fainter à furtber awav, seotiern awr tùe car. Finaliy, w ucters bad ]e!t tlie car, iagazine ,away and w er's conipartinent te aln biS nervesý. Hie, re rîca bad Païýsed tIc bon Ksners; and whal .a ý ould now lie in if-bisý acf ver Seriüxis SIu'picions -ý e lniqlied his first cigar ating wheuther to liglit ai e hear voices oufelde] t xeni-ng the~ windaw~ and e- saw connery anud 11, .ruggling througli tie sXig g, appIareýnt]ly, sQinc se aci cerne frein thle fronlt nd had passed under h-ie- ainstant before, scrE iowbark beelde the car ( oklrg under uthe car-11 ien liad erawieod under ent on. Eater closed id igbted lis second Itly Connery passed tbe )muartn enit carryitiZ Oseiy wrapped in a nlewe i.nds. Eaten finished hiJ ent back de bis seat in 1 As lie glareed at th~e se ~d ieft the magasine aul avelitg-bag, lie saW I ais -ne ]longer there. It el reen the two Seats On t Hillward, te wbom -uic telegar addres;eed whilcl you claixi morning, your associais whO have 'taken this train with Y, you give me bis addrcss?\" \"I thougblt yeu liad decided gramn wa s rot mosant for me.\" .\"I amn wnking ýyou a -questi Eater rot making explanatil isn't -Impossible tbere should Lawrence Hill-wards.\" «'I don't know 1-Eliward's ad \"Give me the address, then mran wlio sent the telegrailn.\" \"I amn unable te do that, eit Connery speke again to t man con ducltor, and theY CO inaudibly for a minute. \"Tba tbeni,\" Connery said finaiiy. He sigred bis naine te the s wbîchb le had written Eaten'5 -a and hand\"d it te thc Pullmn for, wlie ailse sigred it and rcti te hum: then tliey wient on. te t' enger now occupying SectiOt wiihout maîngý any furiber cc Bater abandoned bis idea c te the rear of the train; bie sý1 pickeld up bis magazine ard] read; but alter an instant, lie forward and loeked ai: iiseit Uitile mirror betweer the wind rea9sured hin te fird tha~t bic entireiy normal; lie lad bee) that durirg the quelstionling l bave furred paie, and bis Pal taken ir correction wiil bis I te answer tbc questions-iflig] serieusiy ilirectei tbe suSP\u003c tle conductors toward li\"] others ir tle car, who miglit ha bea-d bis refusai te repiy te i tiens, would be regarding i curiouly, since tley did rot ki reai reasens for tbe cxamintil the conduot,-crs-whaf did theY A]ready, Baton reflected, bel1 firding et the serseless ferlai Santeine, tbere bad occurred agreeabie incident of the telel atiract unfavourabie attenltion On the other band, migî t not Il tîoning of -hîm have been Pur mal? Connery certainly hll him, at the time ef the d1eco -Sartoine, -as -one rot et Oftbe 1 be suRpeeteld o! beirg-the assa Sartoine. Avery, te be sure,h ugiier, more excited and boSft Harriet Sartoire again lad hlm trustfully and frankly as 0 wbem thouglit e! connectlion 'ý attack uapon ber f atiier was .5 Btaton tcld hjinsel! thal there be ne danger to h-inself froni quiry, direct.Ed agalrne DO ne ciudirg comprebe\u003e\"Iive]Y eveil the train.. INNER TUBE BRUYERE DEAD ROOT PIPES A revelation to any wl»o have not already experienced thir tcharm. See theni at THE DUN HIL S$HOJ HARGRAFT BUILDING Scott anzd Colboný«. ,To.t",
         "TRE COURIER. ýuackeryý nd Corns ndreds of treatmrents have been ýd for corfis. me were sedatives to quiet pair. \u003eWere acids, harsh and risky. \u003e Mers quackery. t one inan-a famous chemist- ed Corns for 25 years. And ýY discovered Blue-jay. at ia now the standard treat- ,gentle, certain, scientific. It is On a mnillion corne monthly. has stopped the corn pain in- IY, 70 'million times. It bas d the corne; completely within )urs, in 91 per cent of the cases. others take a littie longer. IP paring corne., Stop treatîng i in wrong ways. Use Plue-jayp that ends thein in a gentie, easy Prove that tonlght. Blue.jvay Ends Corns rld 25 cents-at Druggists -4130 Blue-jay Bunion Plasters ýR\u0026Z BLACK,Chicago and New Yorkt IlAkeoe of Surgical Dressingi., etc. Stained, Decorative and Memorial Windows LIJXFER ?RISMS passengers, whicb showed hlm that bis discovery of this had flot been no- ticed, sbowed also tbat they liad flot seen the bag opened. Tbey would have been watching him if they bad; clearly the bag bad been carried out of the car during bis absence, and lafer bad been brought back. He set it on the floor between bis knees and checked over its contents. Nothing had been taken, so far as he -could ,tell; for the bag had contained only clotbing, the Chinese dictionary and the box of cigars, and these ail ap- parently were still there. He bad laid out the tbings on the seat across froin hlm while checking them up, and now he began to put them back in the bag. Suddenly be noticed that one of bis socks was missing; what had been eleven pairs was now only ten pairs and one odd sock. I RHE disappearance of a single sock Lwas so -strange, so bizarre, so per- plexing that-unless it was acci- dental-be could net account for it at ail.' No one opens a man's bag and steals one sock, and be was quite sure there had been eleven complete pair-, there earler in the day. Certainly then, it bad been accidentaI: the bag badl been opened, îts contents taken out and examined, and in putting thein back, one sock had been dropped un- noticed. The absence of the sock, then, meant no more than tbat the contents o! the bag had been thor- ougbly investigated. 13y wbom? By the man against whom tbe telegram directed to Lawrence îHillward had warned Eaton? Ever since bis receipt of the tele- gramn, Enton--as bie passed througb' the train In going ýto and froin the dîner or for other reasons-had been trying covertly to determine wbicb, if any one, among the passengers __a tbe \"one\" wbo, the telegram bad warn- ed hum, was \"following\" hlm. For at first he bad lnterpreted it ta mean that one of 'ýthem\" wbom he had to fear must be on the train.\" Later be had felt 'certain that tbis could not be the case, for otherwise any one -of \"thein\" who knew hlm would have spoken by tbis turne. Re bad watebed partIcularly for a turne the man who bad clalmed, the telegrain and given the naine o! Il1ward; 'but the only conclusion be bad been able to reach was tbat the man's naine mlgbt be Hlllward, and that coincIdence- strange as sucb a tbing seemed- mlgbt have put aboard tbe train a per- ,son by this naine. Now bis suspicions that one of \"thein\" must be' aboard the train returned. The bag certainly had flot been car- ried out tbe fcrward door of the car, or be would have, seen it froin the compartinent at that end o! tbe car wbere be bad sat smoking. As he tried to recall *ho had passed. t1he doorý of the -cozupartinent, be remein- bered no one except tralumen. The bag, therefoire, bad been carrled ont the rear door, and the mnu whoý had opeued it, If a passenger, must stilli beý In the rear part of the train. Eaton, -refllllng bis eigar-case to.gIve bis action a look of casuainess,* got up and went toward tbe roar of the train. A porter was stili. posted 'at the door o! the Santoîne car, *ho warned hlm to be quiet lu passfng tbrough. Tbe car, ho found, was en- tlrely exnptY: tlhe door ta the drawlng- rooxn where',Santoine lay was closed. Two bertbs near the !arther end of! the car had been made uip, no doubt for the surgeon aud Rarriet Sautoine to rest there duriug the intervals of their watchIlng; but the curtains o!. these berths were !olded back, show- lng bath of thern ta be empty, tbougb one apparently had been occupied. Was Harriet Santoine wlth bier father? (To be continued.) KE\u003eEPING IT Up. \"7h. Kaiser dlstrIbiited iron crosse\" anid mnad a spee c:hes,\" runs a repo0rt in dally paper. susiness as usuali WH IRE? Saine statstil as f1gur\u003ctd It out __.ý _-..lt4h _f ti.q ýviflf.. SLet Us Build You a Greenhouse, Now!. S By consulting our designers and engineers wltbout delay, a greenhouse can be erected for you and be in operation during the early months of the coming w inter. Now, decidedly, is the timUre to, wrIte for the book. S Address: DePt. C. GLASS GARDEN BUILDERS, LIMITED Kent Bldg., Toronto. Transportation Building, St. James St., Montreal. Factory-Georgtowfl, Ont. THE CANADIAN BANK 0F COMàME-RCE SIR EDMUND WALKER, C.V.O., LL.D., D.C.L., Presidont. JOHN AIRD, General Manager. H. V. F. JONES, Aus't. Genoral Manager. CAPITAL, $15OOOPOOO RESERVE FUND, $,13e500OO6O SVNSBANK ACCOU\"4%%jvNTS interest at the cur~rent rate le allowed on ail depooite *f $1.00 -and upwards. Careful 'attentionlà1, given to every accotint Small accounte are welcomed. Accounts mnay be opened and operated by mail. AccOUts may be opened In the. names of ,two or moreperggons, wiLtdrawale to b. made by lani one of them or by the survlvor. !tSaves and'U Prudence will lead you, ta inake investigation before you dide on your new hieatîng sYstem. Investigate the \"Kin Ro ater Boilers and Radiators. j F Thee are points which, maire the Kinglig RtWater Boiler the most econoin- i-IOrTWATEFR cal, the easiest ta manage and most satisfactory in its work of 1OI L ER eating the bouse. Our Bookletsfully explain. lid s your namne and address and we orill \"tuas copy of \"Comfortable Homes\" by return ma. STEEL AND) RADIATION, LIMITE\u003eP 2MMO n 1",
         "-DORT ReadL"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian courier. : Vol. XX. No. 16 (September 16th, 1916)"
      ],
      "type" : "document"
   }
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_460/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "doc" : {
